
CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

Carlton Ramsey, 54,
lawyer and executor of Jackson Elias’ estate

Erica Carlyle, 26, millionaire businesswoman

• Link: Jackson Elias’ radiogram mentioning the Carlyle
Expedition (Carlyle Papers: The Expedition #1).
• Link: sister of Roger Carlyle, leader of the ill-fated
expedition (Carlyle Papers: The Expedition #9–11).

• Link: Ramsey contacts the investigators to invite them to
the reading of Elias’ will (The Funeral, page 127).
• Link: Jonah Kensington knows Ramsey and suggests that
the investigators get in touch with him if they want to
continue their friend’s work (Prospero House, page 128).
• Link: a meeting at Jackson Elias’ funeral (The Funeral,
page 127).

Erica Carlyle is the sole heir to the Carlyle
fortune since the Kenyan courts declared
her brother Roger dead and the New York
state courts concurred. She now manages
the family interests in transportation,
munitions, and international trade,
proving far more competent than her
wastrel brother.
A single woman, Miss Carlyle is often
the subject of speculation in society pages.
In practice, she is largely uninterested in
romantic attachments as they prove a distraction
from her work. Despite this, she attends a near
constant stream of galas, dinners, and cocktail parties in
order to maintain her business contacts. Whether out on
business or attending a social function, Miss Carlyle is
usually accompanied by her bodyguard, Joe Corey. She is
quick to call upon his talents of dissuasion to deal with
people who irritate her.

Ramsey has been Jackson Elias’ lawyer for as
long as Elias has been a professional writer.
As well as dealing with contracts and the
occasional legal entanglement, Ramsey
also manages Elias’ finances and carries
out administrative functions whenever
his client goes traveling the world in
search of a story. His office is located
in Harlem, on 124th Street and Lenox
Avenue.
Ramsey acts as the executor of Elias’ estate,
contacting the investigators to invite them to the
will reading. Over the years Ramsey and Elias have
become friends, and while he handles his duties as executor
with professionalism, he is obviously deeply upset.
• Description: a small, wiry African-American man, filled
with nervous energy. His eyes flick around as he speaks, and
he constantly fidgets with his pen, coffee spoon, or anything
else that comes to hand. The expensive bespoke suit he wears
looks a little shiny and frayed. While he is clearly going bald,
Ramsey tries to mask this by pasting strands of well-oiled
hair across his crown.
• Traits: Ramsey speaks quickly, often appearing to lose track
of what he is saying before he reaches the end of a sentence.
His speech is punctuated with asides and digressions, some
of which are complete non-sequiturs. Despite appearances,
he has a sharp intellect and a sound knowledge of the law,
and those who underestimate him because of his eccentric
manner risk being caught off guard.
• Roleplaying hooks: as part of his duties as executor of Elias’
estate, Ramsey is in charge of his former client’s funds. Elias
left instructions that these are to be used to carry on his
work, and as such, Ramsey is in a position to finance the
investigators’ travels, act as a central point of contact for
disparate groups, and potentially recruit new investigators
when others fall to injury, madness, or death (Replacement
Investigators, page 27, Introduction). Ramsey is also in
possession of copies of some of Elias’ notes, allowing him
to provide the investigators with any useful handouts they
may have missed at Elias’ hotel room.

• Description: a natural beauty, she uses her looks to
intimidate rather than beguile. Her skin is clear and pale,
accentuated by carefully applied makeup. Her clothes are
always fashionable, favoring European designers. She wears
her blonde hair in stylishly short cropped curls.
• Traits: as a busy woman, Carlyle is short-tempered with
people she sees as wasting her time. She is especially illdisposed to people who harass her with what she sees as
pointless or rude questions about her late brother.
• Roleplaying hooks: if persuaded to do so, Miss Carlyle
may provide the investigators with background information
about her brother and some basic details about the rest of
the expedition members. More usefully, she may provide
the investigators with access to the books that Roger
read, including a number of Mythos tomes (The Carlyle
Mansion Library, page 134).

108

AMERICA
Joe Corey, 37, bodyguard to Erica Carlyle

of value to tell, or if the investigators
somehow otherwise convince him to do
so, he will arrange a meeting with Erica,
though it may take a week or so.

• Link: usually found in the presence of or near Erica Carlyle.
• Link: Erica Carlyle may send Corey to dissuade
investigators who prove a nuisance.

• Description: a slender, slightly foppish
white man with dark, wavy hair that
is graying at the temples. A brilliantly
white smile, his otherwise fine features
are marred by worry lines around his eyes
and mouth.
• Traits: projects a professional manner and urbane
charm, which sometimes strays into overfamiliarity.
He often touches people on the arm or knee while talking
to them, although not in a solicitous manner. This superficial
charm evaporates when he is frightened, leaving him
flustered; when this happens, he reddens visibly and develops
a slight stammer.
• Roleplaying hooks: if handled correctly, Grey may provide
an introduction to Erica Carlyle.

Erica Carlyle’s bodyguard, Corey, is a huge
man who carries a proportionately huge
.45 revolver in a shoulder holster, and
brass knuckles in a special pocket up his
left sleeve. In public he remains close
to her, ready at any time to brush off
opportunists, elbow photographers, or
roust mashers. He was an enforcer for a
mobster whom Erica once bested in a deal;
the gang-leader disappeared just before Corey
went to work for Erica.
• Description: a tall, solid man with a Mediterranean
complexion; he wears an aura of threat like a pungent
aftershave. His wavy black hair is usually neatly swept
back but breaks loose into ringlets when he exerts himself.
Corey’s nose has been broken so many times that it lacks
any real shape, framed by two sharp-blue eyes that hint at
an intelligence his brutish appearance masks.
• Traits: studiously polite in his dealings with Miss Carlyle’s
contacts and acquaintances, but all pretense at pleasantness
vanish toward anyone he suspects of posing a threat or
annoyance.
• Roleplaying hooks: investigators who get on Miss Carlyle’s
bad side may find themselves visited by Corey. He will use
any method short of outright murder to convince rude or
intrusive investigators to leave his employer alone.

Miriam Atwright, 47,
Harvard University librarian

• Link: letter sent to Jackson Elias concerning a
missing book (Carlyle Papers America #6).

• Link: mentioned in newspaper reports concerning Erica
Carlyle’s takeover of the family business.
• Link: investigators are directed to Grey if they wish to set
up an interview with Erica Carlyle (Meeting Erica Carlyle,
page 132).
• Link: present during any formal interview with Erica
Carlyle (Erica’s Interview, page 133).

A reference librarian at Harvard
University’s Widener Library, Atwright
specializes in anthropology and has
a high degree of expertise in the field.
She is utterly at home in the maze-like
library, with an almost uncanny facility
with its dozens of miles of shelves.
Two months ago, Jackson Elias contacted
Atwright to ask her to track down a copy of
Africa’s Dark Sects but she was unable to fulfill the
request, as the book had vanished under mysterious
circumstances. Atwright is unaware of Elias’ death and
will be genuinely saddened if the investigators break the
news to her. Atwright could prove a suitable replacement
investigator if an academic is required.

Erica Carlyle’s chief confidant is Bradley Grey, a partner in
the law firm of Dunstan, Whittleby, and Grey, at West 57th
Street, New York City. His name is frequently mentioned
in newspaper reports concerning the shift of control of the
Carlyle fortune to Erica.
Bradley Grey did not like Roger, and he knows virtually
nothing about M’Weru’s influence on Erica’s brother. Grey
is discreet but tends to panic if publicly embarrassed or
compromised. If he thinks the investigators have something

• Description: a slender, angular woman with curly, graying
blonde hair. She wears a conservative dress, round-framed
glasses, and a necklace of cultured pearls. Her normally
unassuming manner is at odds with the almost mischievous
grin she breaks into when discussing the more macabre
aspects of anthropology and folklore.
• Traits: fascinated by cults and strange religious practices,
and was a great admirer of Jackson Elias’ work. His
sometimes-irreverent approach tickled her ghoulish sense

Bradley Grey, 41, counselor to Erica Carlyle

109

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

Ewa Seaward Cowles, 20,
student and dutiful daughter

of humor, and she wishes she could have met the man
before his untimely death.
• Roleplaying hooks: as well as providing information about
Africa’s Dark Sects (Appendix C: Tomes, page 641), Atwright
could help the investigators with research, especially relating
to anthropology and cults (Meeting Miriam Atwright, page
136). She has minimal knowledge of the Mythos, none of
which she believes, although she may be able to gain access
to some Mythos tomes, if required.

• Link: Ewa is often found in the company of her father,
Prof. Cowles.

Prof. Cowles’ daughter, Ewa, lives with her
father in Arkham. She is a student at the
university and sometimes helps her father
with his work. While she is developing
a growing sense of independence, Ewa
views herself as her father’s protector
since her mother’s death.
Ewa has decided to move out of
her father’s home when she reaches 21,
accepting any out-of-town teaching job
she can find. Alternatively, if a replacement
investigator is required, she could be persuaded
to join the party.

Professor Anthony Dimsdale Cowles, 46,
professor of anthropology

• Link: a handbill for his lecture, “The Cult of Darkness
in Polynesia & the Southwest Pacific” (Carlyle Papers
America #7).

An Australian, currently lecturing at
Miskatonic University, Prof. Cowles
temporarily
resides
in
Arkham,
Massachusetts. Since the death of his
wife, Cowles has watched over his
daughter, Ewa, with some intensity,
something she understands but feels
hampered by. Each loves the other, even
if they frequently rub each other up the
wrong way, and would seek vengeance if the
other came to harm.
Cowles collects tales about strange doings, a
hobby that more than once has gotten him into
trouble with university officials, who see him as keeping
bad company. Cowles believes sorcery exists and has an
open mind about things like monsters and underground
cities, though he always wants proof. A voluble man, one
or two questions can keep him lecturing for an hour.

• Description: a pretty, graceful young woman, she wears
her red hair a little longer than current trends dictate. She
favors the lighter, shorter dresses currently in fashion. Ewa’s
accent is still notably Australian, although her time in the
U.S. has Americanized it slightly.
• Traits: constant attention from her father’s students and
the other young men to be found around the university
have made Ewa somewhat guarded when talking to strange
men. While she appears diffident toward her father at first,
it soon becomes apparent to anyone paying attention how
protective Ewa is of his well-being.
• Roleplaying hooks: if Ewa thinks that the investigators
are abusing her father’s gregarious nature, she will politely
remind them that he is a busy man and cannot waste too
much time on such nonsense.

Arthur Emerson, 53,
unwitting cult associate and importer

• Description: a heavy-set, ruddy-faced white man with
a bushy red beard. Prof. Cowles uses large, expansive
gestures in conversation. He has a broad Australian accent,
a booming voice, and an equally booming laugh.
• Traits: friendly and cheerful, always quick to expand on
references made by the investigators and offer them any
helpful tips he can, whether about anthropology, surviving
the Australian Outback, or altogether more esoteric matters.
• Roleplaying hooks: mentions the MacWhirr diary and
David Dodge (Meeting David Dodge, page 461, Australia).
As he is learned in the Mythos, Prof. Cowles can provide
the investigators with information few other friendly NPCs
would know.

• Link: business card found in Jackson Elias’ hotel room
(Carlyle Papers America #5).

The proprietor of Emerson Imports,
Emerson is a native New Yorker who
has worked hard to build up his
business. His desire for material
wealth means he often turns a blind
eye to numerous shady shipments
passing through his warehouse. He
spoke with Elias during his brief time
back in New York and is surprised (and
saddened) to hear of his death.

110

AMERICA
Rebecca Shosenburg, 27, reporter,
looking into a possible miscarriage of justice

• Description: tall and well muscled; now starting to soften
physically in his middle age. His brown hair is still thick
and neatly groomed.
• Traits: his gaze is direct and his manner bullish. He gives
the impression of a man who is used to getting his own way,
and one who does not scare easily.
• Roleplaying hooks: Emerson doesn’t ask too many
questions so he can maintain plausible deniability should
the police come knocking, but his dislike of Silas N’Kwane
and genuine shock at Jackson Elias’ death mean that he is
happy to point the investigators toward the Bloody Tongue’s
headquarters (Horror at Ju-Ju House, page 154). He also
provides a name in Kenya: Ahja Singh (Mombasa: Seeking
Ahja Singh, page 396).

• Link: article about Elias’ murder in the New York Times
with her byline (Carlyle Papers America #9).
• Link: present at Jackson Elias’ funeral (The Funeral,
page 127).

A junior crime reporter with the New York
Times, Shosenburg covered a string of
murders in Harlem last year that bear
marked similarities to the death of
Jackson Elias. While Shosenburg’s
editor has not authorized her to
continue reporting on the case, she still
keeps an active interest and hopes to
help exonerate Hilton Adams before his
execution. Shosenburg may prove a suitable
replacement investigator if one is required.

Dr. Mordecai Lemming, 62,
eccentric and wealthy folklorist

• Link: mentioned by both Lt. Poole and Rebecca Shosenburg
in connection with the death of Jackson Elias (The New
York Police and The New York Times, pages 125 and 145
respectively).

• Description: a small, dark-complexioned woman with wavy
black hair. As a first impression, she may appear humorless
and overly intense, but this is largely her professional
demeanor.
• Traits: persistent and does not leave questions unanswered.
She usually stops just short of rudeness, but becomes
noticeably exasperated when she believes people are not
being honest with her.
• Roleplaying hooks: besides being able to arrange access
to the New York Times archives, Shosenburg can put the
investigators in touch with Millie Adams, help arrange
visits to Hilton Adams in prison, and share her suspicions
about Captain Robson (The New York Times, page 145).
She knows nothing about the Bloody Tongue, but she has
heard Millie Adams mention that something strange may
be going on at Ju-Ju House.

The last scion of a wealthy family of New
York Jews, Dr. Lemming has been living
off his family’s steadily dwindling
fortune for most of his adult life. He
has no formal qualifications, despite his
self-styled title, and thinks of himself as
a gentleman scholar in the old style—a
well-read man of letters who specializes
in cataloguing the bizarre and fascinating
topic of folk beliefs from across the world
without having ever set foot outside New York.
• Description: small, balding, and pale, his clothes are typical
of an absent-minded academic, covered in ink and dust with
grubby cuffs and various odd-looking stains.
• Traits: garrulous and often fascinating to listen to, it is clear
that he loves his subject, even if he is somewhat squeamish
about its darker aspects and woefully naive about some of
his contacts in New York.
• Roleplaying hooks: Dr. Lemming was aware of Elias’ work
although he never met him and found his books somewhat
macabre and sensationalist. He can identify that the symbol
carved into Elias’ head belongs to that of an alleged African
death cult, but he poo-poos the notion that such a cult
could be operating in modern times. He can, however,
unwittingly point the investigators toward Ju-Ju House and
Silas N’Kwane (Horror at Ju-Ju House, page 154). He is
completely oblivious to any links between the shop and the
spate of murders, and is blissfully unaware of the Mythos.

Hilton Adams, 29, an innocent man

• Link: Lt. Poole mentions that Adams was arrested for a
number of murders that resembled that of Jackson Elias
(The New York Police, page 125).
• Link: newspaper articles linking the killing of Elias with
the Adams case (Carlyle Papers America #9).
• Link: meetings with Rebecca Shosenburg, Millie Adams,
and Adam’s former friends (The New York Times, page 145;
Meeting Millie Adams, page 146; and The Good Friends
of Hilton Adams?, page 149, respectively).

Hilton Adams is currently a death row inmate at Sing
Sing prison. He was convicted in October 1924 for a string
of murders that occurred around Harlem, and has been
sentenced to death by electric chair.

111

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

Millie Adams, 27,
desperate but determined wife

Everyone who knows Adams maintains
that he is innocent—and this is the
truth. When people in Harlem started
disappearing or dying violent deaths
at the hands of the Bloody Tongue,
Adams organized members of the local
community to protect against the attacks
and bring the culprits to justice. Adams
served as a Sergeant in the Great War with
the 369th Infantry Regiment, better known
as the Harlem Hellfighters, which helped him
marshal support locally.
Unfortunately for Adams, Mukunga M’Dari makes
regular payments to Captain Robson of the 14th Precinct
in Harlem to turn a blind eye to what goes on at Ju-Ju
House. When Adams became a danger to the operations
of the Bloody Tongue, Robson arrested him for the very
murders he was investigating.
Adams’ wife, Millie, is still trying to prove her husband’s
innocence. Most of his other associates have abandoned
him, however, following threats from Robson that they
could be arrested as accomplices and find themselves on
death row as well. Presuming the investigators prove his
innocence, Adams could be a suitable replacement should
any of the investigators die in the course of this chapter.

• Link: newspaper articles about her
husband’s arrest for murders resembling
that of Jackson Elias (The New York
Times, page 145).
• Link: introduction from Rebecca
Shosenburg (Meeting Millie Adams,
page 146).
• Link: Hilton Adams mentions that his wife
may have gathered more information since his
arrest (Meeting Hilton Adams, page 146).

As the wife of Hilton Adams, Millie has spent the past few
months trying to find evidence of her husband’s innocence.
Hilton has asked her not to do this, as he worries that
Captain Robson may frame her for a crime as well, but
Millie has refused to put her own safety ahead of that of
her husband.
Hilton’s network of associates have all but abandoned
Millie out of fear of police reprisal, but she has carried on
her investigations alone. She has gathered more information
about Ju-Ju House, which she is willing to share in exchange
for help in proving her husband’s innocence.
• Description: an elegant African-American woman with
fine features, whose expression of quiet determination may
be mistaken for standoffishness by those who don’t know
her. Despite the turmoil in her life, she takes great care with
her appearance, partly to maintain a sense of normality and
partly to make people take her more seriously. Her blouse
and woolen skirt are always neatly pressed and her hair
perfectly styled.
• Traits: has learned to be careful with people she doesn’t
know and is initially quiet when meeting someone while she
gets their measure. Once she has judged that an investigator
is trustworthy, her reserve drops and she becomes friendlier.
She is also tenacious, especially regarding her husband’s
situation and the people responsible for it.
• Roleplaying hooks: can provide background information
on her husband’s case, as well as up-to-date information
about when meetings take place at Ju-Ju House. In return,
she wants the investigators to provide her with any evidence
they find that may exonerate her husband.

• Description: an African-American man, with strong
features and a muscular build, although he appears to have
lost weight while in prison. He wears a black-and-white
striped denim prisoner’s uniform. His short, dark hair is
lightly peppered with gray, despite his youth, and his face
is creased with lines.
• Traits: has seen how the law operates in Harlem all his
life, and while he has not lost hope, he is realistic about
his chances. As a result, he is stoic in his dealings with
those who would help him, not dismissing their offers, but
remaining politely skeptical.
• Roleplaying hooks: Adams may share details of his
investigations into Ju-Ju House and his suspicion that they
are behind the brutal murders in Harlem for which he was
arrested (Meeting Hilton Adams, page 151). He is able to
name and describe M’Dari as his main suspect for the man
behind the killings.

112

AMERICA

THE FRIENDS
OF HILTON ADAMS

• Description: a handsome, clean-shaven African-American
man of average height and build, Johnson keeps his thick
hair slicked back in waves. He is rarely seen out of a wellcared-for pinstriped suit.
• Traits: world-weary and cynical, Johnson feels frustrated
that he cannot help his friend, which can manifest in
outbursts of extreme anger, especially if he’s been drinking.
• Roleplaying hooks: Johnson and his friends are reluctant
to talk to the investigators for fear of making the
situation worse than it already is (both for them and their
community); however, he can confirm their suspicions on
certain matters regarding what has been going on in Harlem
over the last few years.

• Link: all four men served in the 369th Infantry Regiment;
the “Harlem Hellfighters,” a nickname given to them by the
German troops they fought on the Western Front due to
their tenacity and toughness (The Good Friends of Hilton
Adams?, page 149).

All of Hilton Adams’ friends would make good replacement
investigators, if required. Indeed, under Hilton Adams’
guidance, they once formed their own investigator party,
although those days appear to have passed. Although largely
ignored by the U.S. Government, as former Hellfighters,
they all hold the Croix de Guerre, gratefully awarded to the
entire regiment by the French for services rendered to the
defense of their country during the Great War.
None of the men served directly together during their
time in the Hellfighters, although Hilton Adams did know
of Art Mills, as he’d occasionally worked with Millie prior
to their enlistment. The men’s friendship was formed only
after they returned home, based on their mutual experiences
on the battlefields of France.

Douglas Fells, age 31, sculptor

Everyone was most surprised when the artistic
and vivacious Mr. Fells volunteered to go to
war, especially as he was just starting to
make a name for himself in the AfricanAmerican art world. Since his return
from France, the style of his sculptures
has changed dramatically, as has he.
Becoming increasingly isolated from
the world around him, Fells’ forays to
Teddy’s saloon are among the few times he
interacts with others. His pieces are lauded
by his artistic peers and are sought after by the
more avant-garde, well-to-do Harlemites who aren’t
concerned by his run-ins with the police (in fact, for some,
the added frisson is part of the work’s charm).

Needham Johnson, 30,
reporter at the New York Age

A junior reporter when the Great War broke
out, like so many others, Corporal Johnson
went to war hoping that it would gain
him recognition and equality once he
returned from the front. His poetry and
descriptions of the war were rejected
by the New York Age as too dark and
visceral for their readers, but Johnson still
returned to work for them once the war
was over. Several of his poems were later
published by The Crisis (the official magazine
of the National Association for the Advancement
of Colored People (NAACP), founded in 1910).
While he knows Adams is innocent of the crimes
with which he is charged, Johnson has been pressured by
his employers to distance himself from his friends and their
investigations; talk of cults and ritual murders is doing
nothing to promote the image of a civilized Harlem the
New York Age is trying to uphold. (Similar pressure has been
brought to bear on the men by their church elders.) Johnson,
like his friends, has also been threatened by Captain Robson
and his men, Robson carefully using the implied danger to
Johnson’s young family as very effective leverage (backed
up by a series of unfortunate “accidents” and near misses in
their vicinity). As such, Johnson feels he is at an impasse
and there’s nothing he can do—for the moment, at least.

• Description: a physically robust African-American man,
with large, dextrous hands and an unwavering gaze. He
shambles about in threadbare old suits, usually smeared
with clay and slip, his hair unkempt and a day or so’s stubble
darkening his face.
• Traits: once the life and soul of the party, he is now quiet
and introspective. Pvt. Fells also has a keen eye for detail,
one of the things that made him an excellent marksman
(something he has still to reconcile himself with). He is
undoubtedly suffering from shell shock as a result of his
wartime experiences.
• Roleplaying hooks: as with Needham Johnson and
the others, he has been threatened by the police over
his involvement with Hilton Adams. Although he can’t
confirm it, he knows a recent break-in that almost destroyed
his studio is down to Robson’s men. Since his friend’s
conviction, he has completely lost heart and, while he can
confirm the details of certain events, he is reluctant to get
involved again because he can’t see a way out of the current
situation, for Adams or anyone else.

113

CHAPTER 2
Art Mills, age 29, jazz musician

• Description: when not performing, he is usually without
a jacket and dressed in a collar and tie, with his sleeves
rolled up. He keeps his receding hair cropped very short
and his moustache incredibly well trimmed.
• Traits: a ball of frenetic energy, Mills rarely sits still. He speaks
quickly, punctuating his words with expansive hand gestures.
He gets really fidgety if he doesn’t have his trumpet to hand.
• Roleplaying hooks: like Johnson, Mills is frustrated by
their inability to help their friend without endangering
themselves, their families (in this case, Mills’ beloved
mother and sister), and their community. He vents that
fury through his music. If someone could show him a way
to solve the stalemate, he’d probably give them whatever
support they might need.

Young Art had always been a bit of a scrapper,
and his mother despaired that he would end
up making her old before her time. But
then he discovered music, specifically the
trumpet, and spent all his time working
“odd jobs” around the neighborhood
(including running numbers) to raise
enough money to buy one for himself.
A talented musician, after he enlisted,
he found himself in the Hellfighters’ jazz
band, led by Jim Reese Europe, who became
his mentor during their service together on the
battlefields of France and helped him rise to the
rank of musician first-class. (The Hellfighters are
widely held to have introduced jazz to Europe.) Back in
New York after the war, Mills has worked in a variety of
clubs and speakeasies as a musician, and was enjoying a
small degree of fame before Hilton Adams’ arrest. Now,
he’s struggling to get the better jobs he knows he deserves,
and a recent hefty fine for being caught “in possession” of
a bottle of bootleg whisky (yet another of Robson’s ploys)
has left him struggling to make ends meet.

Jackie Wallace, 30, hospital orderly

Little Jackie always dreamed of being a doctor, but his family
never had the money needed to send him to medical school.
So he took the nearest work he could get as an orderly at the
Harlem Hospital. Despite his menial duties, he watched and
learned what he could, all of which stood him in good stead
during the war, where his quick thinking and first aid skills
helped save numerous lives.

Members of the legendary 369th Infantry, the Harlem Hellfighters

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

114

AMERICA

ADVERSARIES

Back home, Pvt. Wallace returned to
work at the hospital and was among
the first to put his name down for
the nurse’s training program when
it opened there in 1923. Although
he’s been passed over before due
to his age and sex, it has been
strongly hinted that, if he stays
out of trouble with the police, he’ll
be joining the next intake.

Captain Walter Robson, 52,
corrupt cop in the pay of the Bloody Tongue

• Link: named by Lt. Poole as the potentially corrupt
detective who investigated a string of murders similar to
that of Jackson Elias (The New York Police, page 125).
• Link: widely named as the man who framed Hilton Adams
for the cult murders in Harlem (An Innocent Man, page 145).
• Link: brings the investigators in for a “friendly chat” if their
investigations in Harlem begin to create waves (Bully Boys
in Blue, page 153).

• Description: stronger than he looks.
He prefers to wear a pullover and bow tie rather than a full
three-piece suit, and keeps his hair quite short and well oiled.
He has a reassuring smile.
• Traits: calm, caring, and observant, Wallace has good
instincts when it comes to judging people and knowing
how to take care of them.
• Roleplaying hooks: aware that his one chance to become
a medical professional is slipping away, Wallace is wary of
getting involved in anything that could put an end to it
forever. He will help the investigators as much as he can
with background information, and potentially medical
assistance, but that’s as far as it goes.

Robson is not actually a member of the Bloody
Tongue and has no idea what goes on in the
depths of Ju-Ju House. He believes that
M’Dari and his associates are simply
smugglers, and he is as happy to take
their money as that of any of the other
criminals with whom he does business.
If faced with concrete proof of the full
extent of the cult’s depravity, he may be
convinced to turn against them.
• Description: a tall, solidly built white man with
gray hair, heavy jowls, and a nose that appears to
have been broken more than once. He wears expensive
tailored suits, and usually sports a diamond tie pin. One of
his incisors is missing, which is readily apparent whenever
he flashes one of his frequent toothy grins.
• Traits: superficially glib and charming. He has a warm,
practiced smile and quick wit, which he uses to defuse
awkward situations. When pressed, however, his good cheer
quickly disappears and he becomes blunt and threatening.
• Roleplaying hooks: Captain Robson is still being paid by
the Bloody Tongue to protect Ju-Ju House. He and his men
could interfere with the investigators’ operation, threatening
them with arrest on trumped-up charges if they refuse to
leave well enough alone. Alternatively, if the investigators
force him into an untenable position, he may be convinced
to provide information about Ju-Ju House.

MILITARY MEN
If players wish to create replacement (or even starting
characters) who served in the Great War, then the
Keeper may wish to let them take advantage of the
optional Experienced Investigators rules on page 61
of the Investigator Handbook, particularly the War
Experience package.

115

CHAPTER 2
The Cult of the Bloody Tongue perform dark rites beneath Ju-Ju House

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

Mukunga M’Dari, 38,
high priest of the Bloody Tongue

M’Dari knows vaguely of the Chinese cult to Nyarlathotep
but has no way to alert it if the investigators decide to go
first to Shanghai. He knows nothing of Huston’s activities
in Australia and elsewhere.

• Link: Hilton Adams knows that M’Dari is associated with
Ju-Ju House and believes he is responsible for the murders
in Harlem (Meeting Hilton Adams, page 151).
• Link: M’Dari takes an interest in the investigators if they
start looking into Ju-Ju House or the Bloody Tongue
(Harlem, page 143).

• Description: a tall, muscular African man with a shaved
head. M’Dari wears a perpetual scowl, as if the world around
him is a constant source of disappointment. He smiles
only when inflicting pain or fear. His clothes are plain and
inexpensive, although well maintained.
• Traits: enjoys hurting people. He is happy to toy with
investigators like a cat playing with a mouse, relishing their
fear and suffering.
• Roleplaying hooks: if M’Dari becomes aware that the
investigators are asking questions or following cult members,
he contacts Captain Robson to warn them off. If this fails,
or if Robson has been neutralized, he is happy to deal with
the investigators himself.

This tough customer relishes smiting the foes of his god.
M’Dari knows the location of the Mountain of the Black
Wind, knows what lies within its temple cavern, and knows
something of Nyarlathotep’s grand design. But
M’Dari will never reveal this information
unless forced to by magic. If close to death,
his last act will be to contact Nyarlathotep
and pray for vengeance from the god (the
god has a 1% chance of agreeing to do
this). M’Dari contacts Edward Gavigan
if he learns that the snoopy investigators
are headed toward London, but only after
M’Dari no longer has a chance to personally
mete out justice to these blasphemers.

116

AMERICA

MINOR NPCS

Silas N’Kwane, 73, manager of Ju-Ju House

• Link: name written on the back of a business card for
Emerson Imports (Carlyle Papers America #5).
• Link: Arthur Emerson recognizes N’Kwane’s name,
identifying him as the manager of Ju-Ju House (Emerson
Imports, page 138).
• Link: directed to as an expert on African ephemera by
Mordecai Lemming (Meeting Dr. Lemming, page 136).
• Link: both Hilton and Millie Adams know that N’Kwane
works at Ju-Ju House (What Millie Adams Knows
and Meeting Hilton Adams, pages 147 and 151
respectively).

Willa Sligh, 20, legal secretary

• Link: Carlton Ramsey’s secretary (The Reading of the Will,
page 127).

Ramsey’s niece and protégé, Willa is keen to learn all she
can from her eccentric uncle and one day dreams of opening
her own legal firm. Willa is very upset by the death of her
“Uncle Jackson,” who always used to bring her presents back
from his travels, but is sufficiently professional to put a brave
face on it.
• Description: tall and athletic, Willa is developing into a
smart, confident young professional, even if she does hanker
after more fashionable clothing than the tailored skirt and
jacket her uncle insists she wear to the office.
• Traits: neat, tidy, and resourceful, she has a sensible head on
her shoulders for one her age, although (like her uncle) she
can talk the hind legs off a donkey if given half the chance.
• Roleplaying hooks: most likely the first point of contact
with Ramsey once the investigators accept Elias’ challenge.

N’Kwane is spry for his age, as well as
clever and perceptive—though long
insane from associating with the
Bloody Tongue, who convinced him to
join with them after their arrival from
Kenya as M’Weru’s escort. He will
never reveal cult secrets, and actually
knows little beyond the existence of the
chakota. He will fight if he must, preferring
to attack from the rear.

George Brunton, 46, subwarden at Sing Sing

• Description: a skeletally thin, wizened old AfricanAmerican man, with skin the texture of a walnut. He has
only a fringe of thin, white hair and is missing many teeth.
When serving in the shop, he wears a bright red shuka (a
traditional Maasai blanket, worn wrapped around the body)
and sandals to meet the expectations of customers, but puts
on a suit, tie, and hat when heading out on business.
• Traits: has a cackling laugh when something amuses him;
this may be an innocent joke or the sight of an enemy being
consumed by the chakota. He is cowardly by nature and
will snivel and beg for his life if threatened with physical
violence, all the while looking for the first opportunity to
flee and get help or stab his enemy in the back.
• Roleplaying hooks: if the investigators cause trouble at
Ju-Ju House, N’Kwane is happy to play the part of the
helpless old man, staggering out into the street and yelling
for help, shouting that there are robbers and murderers in
his shop.

• Link: officiates any visits the investigators make to see
Hilton Adams (A Visit to Old Sparky’s House, page 150).

Brunton, like Sing Sing’s current warden Lewis E. Lawes,
has worked in the prison service for a long time and worked
his way up from a lowly prison guard to subwarden in charge
of the Death House on a day-to-day basis. Although not a
big man, his mixture of respectful treatment of the prisoners
and proven ability to break heads keeps his area of the prison
running relatively smoothly, all things considered.
• Description: short and stocky, he is still surprisingly fast
on his feet. His salt-and-pepper hair is clipped very short
at the sides, and his three-piece suit is modest.
• Traits: friendly and jovial in spite of his work, he is a shrewd
judge of character and a stickler for protocol, unless his gut
says otherwise.
• Roleplaying hooks: the subwarden is a potential ally to the
investigators. He isn’t convinced of Hilton Adams’ guilt and
will give the investigators more leeway than he probably
should during any interviews with the prisoner (for example,
leaving them on their own once he’s convinced they aren’t
about to attempt a jailbreak). However, if the investigators
fail to exonerate Adams, Brunton has no qualms about
carrying out his appointed role in the execution; that is
his job, after all, and he must abide by the ruling even if he
doesn’t agree with it.

117

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E THE BIG APPLE
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p THE HOTEL CHELSEA
o
n
e
s

that helps to draw the strands of the campaign together.
While the players have seen this glimpse of the future, their
investigators have not.

An innocent phone call leads to the revelation that evil forces
are at work in New York City.

Two of the killers (Iregi Kipkemboi and Jomo “Jimmy”
Jepleting) are Kenyans, but Colm Doyle is a white New
Yorker and cocaine fiend of negligible skills; only he speaks
English well. Each wears a shabby suit and the repulsive
ceremonial headpiece of the cult, with merely a strip of
red flannel for the tongue for these low-ranking members.
For the profiles for the three cultists, see Elias’ Murderers,
page 169.

Jackson Elias calls his investigator friend(s) on January
15, requesting that they meet him, along with any others
who have been “recruited,” at the Hotel Chelsea, Room
410, at 8 p.m. While on the telephone, Elias is cryptic
and anxious, perhaps even frightened—uncharacteristic
of him. Elias gives out no further information over the
phone and hangs up immediately if pressed. If someone
calls his Hotel Chelsea room, there is no answer, for Elias
is back on the streets, rummaging for more information
about the Cult of the Bloody Tongue. The Keeper should
emphasize that the author’s behavior is at odds with what
the investigator knows of him, aiming to have all the
players eager to learn why the distinguished author needs
such a crew of splendid investigators.

Pausing and Listening
If the investigators pause before they knock at Elias’ door,
a successful Listen roll allows them to hear Jackson Elias’
final near-breathless scream as he dies, followed by sounds
of the murderers moving about, searching for manuscripts
and clues; however, if they knock first and then listen, they
hear movement only if they succeed at Hard difficulty—the
cultists have frozen and are waiting to see what happens
next (Elias’ final breath is unheard). If the investigators try
the door, they find that it is locked. The lock can be picked
with a successful Locksmith roll or broken down with a
successful STR roll.

Located in the Manhattan neighbourhood of Chelsea,
the Hotel Chelsea can be found on West 23rd Street,
between Seventh and Eighth Avenues. The twelvestory redbrick edifice with its magnificent staircase was
built as an apartment building in 1884, but reopened as
a hotel in 1905. A significant number of the guests are
still long-term residents, and the hotel is popular with
artists, writers, and musicians, lending it something of a
bohemian reputation. Although many hotels of the time
did not permit African-American guests or visitors, the
Hotel Chelsea has a far more enlightened attitude and
welcomes all within its doors.

Going Straight In
If the investigators are able to enter Room 410 quickly,
the killers are present and attack the investigators just
long enough to give themselves time to escape out of the
window and down the narrow fire escape. A captured cultist
fights on until unconscious or incapacitated, successfully
restrained, or killed. Those making it to the bottom of the
fire escape run to an idling black 1915 Hudson touring
roadster, New York license NYL7, and flee. This may lead
to a chase scene (see Chasing the Cultists box, nearby). If
the investigators take a moderate amount of time to enter
the room, the cultists are moving down the fire escape in
order to flee in their getaway car.
If a fight or chase ensues under either of these conditions,
assume that each killer has managed to grab a number of
pieces of information (Carlyle Papers America #1–7). Iregi
Kipkemboi has any or all of items #1–3, Colm Doyle has
any or all of items #4–6, and Jimmy Jepleting has item #7.

Room 410

Until the appointed time, the investigators are free to carry
out whatever research they feel necessary. Once at the
Chelsea, they make their way up to Room 410. Jackson Elias
lies dead inside, his intestines ripped out by three members of
the Bloody Tongue. The killing occurs just moments before
the investigators arrive; one cultist (Keeper’s choice) waits at
the door to ambush anyone entering, while the others search
the room. All are armed with pangas (the preferred weapon
for their cult’s ritual murders).

Delaying Entering
If, on the other hand, the investigators enter Room 410
after a significant delay (possibly due to a failed pushed
roll), they see the killers exiting the alleyway below, running
toward their getaway car. At this range and in this light,
pistol fire at the killers has no chance to hit, and there is

Keeper note: if the optional opening scene was used at
the start of the Peru prologue, some players may wish
to benefit from this insight into the future, which should
not be allowed. Remember, the optional opening scene is
purely a contrivance of the campaign: a sudden time jump

118

AMERICA

CHASING THE CULTISTS
If the investigators enter the room and give chase before the
cultists gain too much of a head start, the Keeper should
initiate a chase scene. Major locations and hazards are listed
below—although the Keeper should feel free to extend and
adapt these depending on what actions the investigators take.

Additional hazards on the road follow.
• Patches of black ice, causing the vehicle to go into a skid
unless the driver passes a Drive Auto roll.
• A sudden snow flurry that limits visibility. A Spot Hidden roll
is required to avoid any hazards or other vehicles on the road.
• A bus has skidded and is partially blocking the road,
forcing other vehicles to either stop or mount the sidewalk.
A successful Intimidate roll convinces pedestrians to get
out of the way of any vehicles doing so.
• Strong winds have blown piled-up snow back onto the
road, blocking an intersection. A successful Navigate roll
indicates a suitable side street or alley that can provide an
alternative route.

The Fire Escape
The fire escape is narrow, rickety, and covered with ice. It
has been loosened from its fixtures by the weight of the
cultists and shakes badly under the additional weight of any
investigators. Clambering down the sliding ladder under
these conditions requires a successful Climb roll.
The fire escape can carry no more than SIZ 150 at any
one time. If the limit is exceeded, the escape collapses
and tumbles to the ground, and those on it sustain 2D6
damage each (a successful Jump roll halves this damage).

Chase Sequence Quick Reference

The Alleyway
The fire escape reaches down to an alleyway that serves the
hotel’s kitchen. The main road is some 20 feet (6 m) from the
base of the stepladder. Recent heavy snowfalls have made it
difficult to remove garbage, making the alleyway to the side
of the hotel tricky to navigate. Investigators may attempt to
force their way through the snow-covered piles of boxes using
a STR roll or attempt to leap over them using a Jump roll.

Iregi Kipkemboi
75		
CON
DEX
50		
STR
80		
SIZ
70
MOV
8		
Skills: Climb 75%, Intimidate 25%, Jump 90%, Listen 65%,
Stealth 60%, Track 10%.

The Sidewalk
Following the recent snowstorm, the streets surrounding
the hotel still have snow piled high along the edges of their
sidewalks. The roads themselves are largely clear, although
there remains a layer of slippery slush with occasional
patches of ice. The sight of armed men running into the
street, especially if the investigators are shooting at them,
may panic the pedestrians on the sidewalk. While these
pedestrians will try to get out of the way, confusion, slippery
conditions, and poor visibility make this difficult—it requires
either a successful Intimidate roll to scare the pedestrians
out of the way or a successful SIZ roll to barge them aside.

Colm Doyle
CON
60		
DEX
65		
STR
60		
SIZ
60
MOV
8		
Skills: Climb 60%, Drive Auto 35%, Intimidate 20%, Jump
65%, Listen 75%, Stealth 60%, Track 15%.

The Main Road
If the cultists get to their car, the chase may still continue.
If the investigators do not have their own vehicle nearby,
they may still commandeer or steal one to pursue the cultists.

Jimmy Jepleting
CON
65		
DEX
80		
STR
75		
SIZ
60
MOV
9		
Skills: Climb 55%, Intimidate 25%, Jump 55%, Listen 75%,
Stealth 55%, Track 65%.

119

CHAPTER 2

Opposite: A fight on the fire escape of Room 401

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

little hope of catching up with the perpetrators. In this case,
the investigators find Jackson Elias’ corpse, clothing, and
luggage in the room, but little else. The Keeper may choose
to leave any two of the six clues (Carlyle Papers America
#1–7) for them to find, at their discretion—note, both Jonah
Kensington and Carlton Ramsey may be able to provide
copies of those the cultists have stolen (Prospero House and
The Reading of the Will, pages 128 and 127, respectively).
In addition, if the cultists depart with all of the clues, these
can also be later found at Ju-Ju House (Horror at Ju-Ju
House, page 154).

Letter: addressed to Roger Carlyle from Warren Besart
(Carlyle Papers America #1). The text is in a neat, precise hand.
Keeper note: Warren Besart (The Fallen Agent, page 317,
Egypt) is a Frenchman who still resides in the Egyptian
capital. An interview with Erica Carlyle confirms this
information (Erica’s Interview, page 133). Faraz Najjar also
still lives in Cairo, although his shop is no longer in the Street
of Jackals (The Many Shops of Faraz Najjar, page 313, Egypt).
Business card: for Edward Gavigan, elegantly engraved
(Carlyle Papers America #2).

Not Entering
Should the investigators leave the hotel after getting no
response to their knocks (having failed to realize what
is going on inside the room), then they read about Elias’
murder in the newspapers the next day. Most of the stories
link this killing with several similar murders perpetrated
during the last few years. A few, including a piece in the
New York Times (Carlyle Papers America #9), mention
that a man named Hilton Adams was arrested for these
crimes and is currently on death row in Sing Sing prison.
There is also notice of a non-denominational funeral to be
held at Cypress Hills Cemetery in Brooklyn the day after
(The Funeral, page 127).

Keeper note: the card points the investigators to London, the
Penhew Foundation (page 196, England), and to Edward
Gavigan (Dramatis Personae: England, page 184).
Matchbook: from the Stumbling Tiger Bar—empty (Carlyle
Papers America #3).
Keeper note: although, at first glance, a random piece of
detritus, this Shanghai bar (page 537, China) is where Elias
first met Jack Brady.
Photograph: blurry and grainy (Carlyle Papers America
#4). It shows a large steam- or diesel-powered yacht beyond
some Chinese boats (“junks”). Part of the name of the
yacht is visible: the first three letters are “DAR.” In the dim
background is a building with a large tower.

Capturing the Killers

If the investigators manage to capture one or more of the
cultists alive, then there is little that can be gained from
them. All are insane from their participation in cult rituals,
as well as being loyal to M’Dari. They are far more afraid of
what the high priest could do to them than anything the
investigators or the police are capable of.
Should the investigators hand the cultists over to the
authorities once they’ve spoken to them, they are treated
far from gently by the police and are beaten soundly with
the least bit of provocation, quite openly. Once the police
take them away, the investigators will not see them again—
especially as, shortly after they arrive in Lt. Poole’s cells, they
are transferred to Captain Robson and the 14th Precinct
at his insistence (The New York Police, page 125).

Keeper note: the yacht is the British-registered Dark Mistress
(page 565, China), owned by one “Alfred Penhurst.” The photo
was taken along the Whangpoo River in Shanghai; a trade
envoy, banker, or agent familiar with China could identify the
photo, as might a well-traveled sailor or a diplomat currently
stationed at one of New York City’s consulates. Alternatively,
the investigators might employ their Library Use skills on
back issues of the National Geographic (if nothing else!) to
independently locate the subject of the photograph.
Business card: for Emerson Imports, printed on ordinary
stock (Carlyle Papers America #5). Elias has written the name
“Silas N’Kwane” on the back of the card.

Information in Room 410

The following clues are essential, as they lead the investigators
to the key locations that make up the rest of the campaign.
If the investigators do not recover them all from Elias’ hotel
room or the cultists, Elias’ publisher, Jonah Kensington,
and his attorney, Carlton Ramsey, have copies of any
missing documents that, between them, can be given to the
investigators. Alternatively, missing clues can be found in the
basement of Ju-Ju House.

Keeper note: the card leads to an import house (Emerson
Imports, page 138) which supplies African artifacts to
Ju-Ju House (Horror at Ju-Ju House, page 154), New York
headquarters for the Bloody Tongue. The importer also knows of
Ahja Singh (Mombasa: Seeking Ahja Singh, page 396, Kenya).

120

AMERICA

121

CHAPTER 2

Carlyle Papers America #3

Carlyle Papers America #2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

Carlyle Papers America #1

122

AMERICA

Carlyle Papers America #4

Carlyle Papers America #5

Carlyle Papers America #6

123

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

Carlyle Papers America #7

CHAPTER 2
Typewritten letter: without envelope, from Miriam Atwright,
a Harvard University librarian, addressed to Elias in care of
his publishers (Carlyle Papers America #6).
Keeper note: Miss Atwright, of Cambridge, Massachusetts,
has helped Elias with past research. She can easily be found
for an interview, called on the telephone, or written to in
care of the university (Meeting Miriam Atwright, page 136).
Small sheet of paper: (Carlyle Papers America #7). Inserted
in the second volume of Andrew Dickson White’s A History
of the Warfare of Science with Theology in Christendom, it marks
the beginning of Chapter XIV, “From Fetish to Hygiene.” It
is an ordinary handbill, to be posted publicly or passed out
on the street, advertising Prof. Cowles’ guest lecture at New
York University.
Keeper note: although the investigators have missed Dr. Cowles’
lecture, they can call, write to, or visit him in Massachusetts
to obtain the details of the actual presentation, should they
so desire (Meeting Professor Anthony Cowles, page 136). If
they do, they find his talk includes a few over-exposed slides of
strange stone monoliths photographed in the Australian desert
(Carlyle Papers America #15). The photos were taken within
a dozen miles of Dr. Huston’s headquarters in the City of the
Great Race (The Great Sandy Desert, page 477, Australia).
Cowles accepted a semester’s fellowship at Miskatonic partly in
the hope of being able to raise funds for a full-scale expedition
to the site; so far those hopes have been frustrated.
Jackson Elias’ forehead: symbol cut into the skin (Carlyle
Papers America #8).

Carlyle Papers America #8

Keeper note: this last bit of evidence is in the hotel room;
available to the investigators only if they examine Elias’ body.
Symmetrical marks (the symbol of the Cult of the Bloody
Tongue) have been carefully carved into their friend’s forehead.
An investigator spending a full day of research in the New
York Public Library, the Library of Congress, Washington,
D.C., or certain Boston-area libraries can identify the mark
as the rune of a cult thought to have descended from a sect
driven out of dynastic Egypt. A successful Library Use roll
establishes that the cult, known as “the Bloody Tongue,” is
believed to have originated in Kenya, although its ongoing
existence is unclear. Alternatively, Miss Atwright can assist
with the identification (Meeting Miriam Atwright, page
136). Although there is no mention of Nyarlathotep during
their researches, that god is connected to this cult in the
Équinoxe Divisé, a Mythos tome possessed by the Penhew
Foundation (page 196, England and Appendix C: Tomes,
page 642), among others.

124

AMERICA

PRELIMINARY
INVESTIGATIONS

Carlyle Papers America #9

Wherein the investigators learn new facts about the illfated Carlyle Expedition and realize that there may be
more to the massacre than was first apparent.
By their decision at the door of Room 410, the
investigators have begun to direct the campaign, having
either experienced their first face-off with Nyarlathotep’s
minions or by reading about their friend’s violent death
in the New York Times.
It now falls to you, dear Keeper, to keep the
investigators on the trail. One way to do so is to
emphasize the loss of friendship felt by the investigators
who knew Elias, the bizarre nature of the murder,
and the importance with which Elias regarded his
research. And, perhaps of greater interest to those
of a more mercenary nature, a remarkable new story
about the famous (infamous?) Carlyle Expedition
might be worth thousands of dollars.
Depending on what the investigators managed
to retrieve from Room 410, they now have several
avenues to explore. While Carlyle Papers America
#1–4 exclusively point overseas, Carlyle Papers
America #5–9 suggest locations either in New
York or reasonably close by:
• The article in the New York Times (Carlyle Papers America
#9) or conversations with the police (following) could lead
the investigators to Mordecai Lemming (The Doctor Is In,
page 135), Hilton Adams (An Innocent Man, page 145)
and Ju-Ju House (Horror at Ju-Ju House, page 154). It
also advises them of the date and location of Jackson Elias’
funeral (The Funeral, page 127).
• The business card from Emerson Imports (Carlyle Papers
America #5) leads to Arthur Emerson’s shipping company
(page 138) and Ju-Ju House (Horror at Ju-Ju House, page
154), as well as Ahja Singh (Mombasa: Seeking Ahja
Singh, page 396, Kenya).
• The letter from Miriam Atwright (Carlyle Papers America
#6) leads the investigators to Prospero House (page 128)
and Harvard University’s Widener Library (Meeting
Miriam Atwright, page 136).

also have their research regarding the Carlyle Expedition
(Carlyle Papers: The Expedition #4–11), which should lead
to Roger Carlyle’s sister, Erica (Meeting Erica Carlyle, page
132). Investigating the individual members of the Carlyle
Expedition is also a rewarding but necessarily incomplete
task, at least for the moment, due to the nature of their
roles in Nyarlathotep’s Great Plan (The Carlyle Expedition
Principals, page 139).

THE NEW YORK POLICE

• Link: the murder of Jackson Elias (Room 410, page 118).
• Link: the connection between Elias’ death and other recent
murders, as well as the possible wrongful conviction of
Hilton Adams (Carlyle Papers America #9).

Even if the cultists got away, the investigators should have
enough leads to get started. Not only do they have Jonah
Kensington to talk to (per reference in Carlyle Papers: The
Expedition #2 or #3; see Prospero House, page 128) and
Elias’ funeral to attend (The Funeral, page 127), but they

Unless the investigators flee the hotel before New York’s
Finest arrive, the police will want to interview them about
Elias’ murder. Initially, two uniformed policemen attend
the scene before Lt. Martin Poole arrives some 45 minutes

125

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

Poole informs the investigators that this is the ninth
murder victim of this kind in the last two years. The victims
had no apparent connections; they were poor, wealthy, and
middle class, both black and white, and from all over the
city. All the victims had the same marks on their foreheads.
Dr. Mordecai Lemming, an eccentric Manhattanite and
folklorist, linked the sign to an African death cult but has
otherwise offered no useful information (The Doctor Is
In, page 135).
The investigation came to a close when Captain Robson
of the 14th Precinct in Harlem arrested a local man, Hilton
Adams, who had been found at the scene of one of the
murders (An Innocent Man, page 145). Now that another
murder has taken place, Poole is concerned that Robson
got the wrong man. He has heard rumors that Robson is
corrupt, although it requires a Hard Charm, Fast Talk,
or Persuade roll to convince him to share this knowledge
with civilians. If the investigators managed to apprehend
any of the cultists, Lt. Poole is also seething that Robson
has pulled rank and whisked them out from under his nose,
claiming that he needs them for questioning in association
with the Adams case, and that Poole can have them back
when he’s done with them (which isn’t going to happen).

later. Poole takes statements from any investigators present.
Depending on what the investigators did when they found
Elias’ body, Poole may consider them suspects, although
he will not arrest an investigator unless provoked. If they
killed any of the cultists, or if the investigators were caught
fleeing from the hotel, Poole asks them to accompany him to
Precinct 7a at West 20th Street, just around the corner from
the Hotel Chelsea, to answer detailed questions. Even if the
investigators leave the scene before the police arrive, it won’t
take long for Poole to track them down, unless they’ve taken
great care to cover their tracks.
Lt. Poole is a hard-nosed veteran of the force. If one or
more members of the group are acquainted with NYPD
officers, especially with homicide detectives, then the
investigators gain all of the following information. If they
are not acquainted, then a successful Persuade or Hard
Fast Talk roll is required to uncover the pertinent details.
If the investigators are present at the murder scene, speak
to the police without incident, and succeed at a Credit
Rating roll, then they also get all of the information.

WALKING THE BEAT

Investigating the murder of Jackson Elias

Although preceded by a variety of law enforcement
agencies, the New York City Police Department didn’t
technically come into existence until the amalgamation
of the five boroughs in 1898. Based around the same
model as London’s Metropolitan Police Force, the
NYPD inherited the brutality, corruption, and political
infighting of its predominantly Irish-American
predecessors, although Theodore Roosevelt instituted a
series of reforms in the late 19th century in his role as
President of the Police Commission. These were followed
by more restructuring and modernization during the
early decades of the 20th century.
In terms of historic landmarks, the new NYPD hired
its first African-American police officer in 1911; Samuel J.
Battle, based in Harlem during the 1920s (he also became
the NYPD’s first African-American sergeant in 1926).
The first female detective was in place by 1912 (Isabella
Goodwin), and its first African-American policewoman
(Lawon R. Bruce) was patrolling the streets by 1920.
By the end of the 1920s, the force also had its own
Motorcycle Squad, Automobile Squad, and Aviation Unit.

126

AMERICA
it is over, they ask the mourners questions about who may
have killed Elias and whether his murder was connected
to research for a new book. One of the reporters present
is Rebecca Shosenburg, who is keen to speak to friends of
Jackson Elias to see if they know of any connection between
his death and the murders for which Hilton Adams was
convicted (An Innocent Man, page 145). If the investigators
show any interest in talking about Adams’ case, Shosenburg
invites them to meet with her at the newspaper’s offices
on West 43rd Street (The New York Times, page 145).
If the investigators have not yet met Jonah Kensington
or Carlton Ramsey, the two men introduce themselves
and offer condolences. Kensington extends an invitation
to visit him at Prospero House, where he can answer
any questions the investigators may have, and Ramsey
asks the investigators to attend the reading of Elias’
will at his office next Monday (The Reading of the
Will, following).
If the investigators fail to attend Elias’ funeral, then
Ramsey contacts them via telegram at their current place
of residence with details of the will reading. Alternatively,
they may be invited to the will reading during their visit
to Jonah Kensington (Prospero House, page 128).

Given the new evidence arising from Elias’ death, Poole
suspects that the murders may be the ritual slayings of
people who somehow learned too much; about what, he has
no clue. He is reticent to make such a claim as he thinks
of himself as a rational man, but if the investigators have
already proven themselves to be levelheaded or convinced
him to talk about Captain Robson’s corruption, then he
will confide in them.
To confirm what the lieutenant tells them, the
investigators may find details of all the previous crimes
in New York’s various newspaper morgues (or be shown
them by Rebecca Shosenburg; The New York Times, page
145). They might even interview friends and families of
the victims. If they do, they learn little more than that the
departed had become involved with “strange” people after
venturing into Harlem to partake of its thriving nightlife.
Keeper note: if it seems useful to make one or more of the
previous murder victims significant, perhaps even a wealthy
former friend of Roger Carlyle’s, then these interviews can
be used to fill any gaps that the Keeper comes to perceive
in the chain of useful evidence, particularly with respect to
the other members of the ill-fated expedition (The Carlyle
Expedition Principals, page 139).

THE READING OF THE WILL

If the investigators didn’t see the getaway vehicle or its
registration then, at the Keeper’s discretion, Poole may
mention that an old black Hudson, license NYL7, was seen
leaving the murder scene at a little after 8 p.m., and that
such a car, owned by a Thomas Witherspoon, was stolen that
evening while it was parked on Lenox Avenue in Harlem.
Talking to Mr. Witherspoon uncovers nothing further—he
was chatting to friends in his usual saloon, and the car was
gone when he came out.

• Link: invitation from Carlton Ramsey issued at Elias’
funeral (The Funeral, page 127).
• Link: invitation from Jonah Kensington (Prospero House,
page 128).
• Link: telegram from Carlton Ramsey.

Carlton Ramsey has scheduled the reading of Jackson
Elias’ will for the afternoon of Monday, January 19. As the
investigators are the only people mentioned in the will, he is
happy to reschedule if this time proves inconvenient, and he
will track them down if necessary.
The reading takes place at Ramsey’s office in Harlem,
on 124th Street and Lenox Avenue. The office is small,
simply decorated, and neatly kept, housing only Ramsey
and his secretary, Willa Sligh. Before the reading itself,
Ramsey fetches a bottle of good bootleg bourbon out of
a cupboard and offers everyone a drink. If this is the first
time the investigators have met Ramsey (for example, if
they did not attend the funeral), he offers his condolences
and spends some time sharing memories of Elias and his
exploits, often shaking his head in mock disbelief and
chuckling. For all the sadness of the occasion, Ramsey is
happy to have other friends of Elias around.
During this chat, Ramsey mentions that Elias visited him
the day before his death and updated his will. Although

THE FUNERAL

• Link: announced in the New York Times (Room 410, page 118).
• Link: invitation to attend from Jonah Kensington (Prospero
House, page 128).

Jackson Elias’ funeral takes place at Cypress Hills Cemetery
in Brooklyn, at 2 p.m. on January 17. The ceremony is
brief and non-denominational, taking place during a light
snowshower. Turnout is small, with the only mourners apart
from the investigators being Jonah Kensington, Carlton
Ramsey, and his niece Willa Sligh. The priest encourages the
investigators to share any special memories they may have of
Elias and his exploits.
There are a few reporters in attendance, all of whom
keep a respectful distance during the ceremony itself. Once

127

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

PROSPERO HOUSE

Elias didn’t say anything explicitly, Ramsey believed that he
was in fear of his life and wanted to make sure his affairs
were in order should the worst happen. Ramsey then reads
the will, breaking off frequently to explain various details
further. The important points are:

• Link: Jonah Kensington, the owner of Prospero House, is
known to at least one of the investigators (Carlyle Papers:
The Expedition #2 or #3).
• Link: Jonah Kensington was a close friend of Jackson Elias
and the publisher of all of his books (Carlyle Papers: The
Expedition #2 or #3).
• Link: an item of correspondence sent to Jackson Elias via
his publisher, Prospero House (Carlyle Papers America #6).
• Link: invitation from Jonah Kensington (The Funeral,
page 127).

• Elias has given full power of attorney to Ramsey, who has
complete authority to liquidate his assets.
• Ramsey is instructed to use these assets to create and manage
a fund.
• Elias requests that any friends of his who attend the reading
make use of this fund to continue his investigation of the
Carlyle Expedition.
• Ramsey will make disbursements from the fund to pay for
travel, accommodation, living costs, equipment purchases,
legal bills, and medical expenses. Participating investigators
should make sure they acquire the necessary receipts and
send them on to Ramsey in a timely fashion.
• Ramsey is also to act as a central point of contact for those
involved. If the investigators split into multiple groups, he
will coordinate communications between them. He will
also assist with recruitment if the investigators need to hire
people with special skills or to bolster their numbers should
any of them be unable to continue.
• When he visited Ramsey the previous week, Elias also left a
note to be read to the investigators in the event of his death
(Carlyle Papers America #10).

The offices of Prospero House are located on Lexington
Avenue near 35th Street. This modest concern does not
aim for best sellers but rather for books that deserve to
be published because they will interest select readers for
generations to come.
Investigators may make an appointment or just drop
in—Prospero House is friendly and informal. Prospero’s
proprietor, Jonah Kensington, was a friend to Elias, as
well as the editor of all of Elias’ books, and will want to
talk to anyone investigating Elias’ death.
Kensington believes that the police theory of cult murder
is correct; after all, Elias was always infatuated with blood
cults. He also thinks that either some old enemies at last
caught up with the courageous author, or else that Elias’
new project was even more important (and dangerous) than
Elias himself had believed. Elias, he says, had been persuaded
that a blood cult had massacred the Carlyle Expedition but
that not all of the principals of the expedition had been
killed. If asked for more information, Kensington requests
the Elias correspondence file from his secretary, and reads
from it the following letter (Carlyle Papers America #11).
The letter states clearly that members of the Carlyle
Expedition may be alive and that Elias managed to dig up
evidence contradicting the testimony admitted during the
inquest and trial in Kenya. A short while later, Kensington
received the notes, as promised (Carlyle Papers America
#12). Elias then sent him a wire from Hong Kong to say
his inquiries were proceeding nicely.
After that, Elias was not heard from until the middle of last
month (December 16, 1924), when he wired from London.
Elias’ telegram was very excited and a bit crazy sounding.
He said he’d been in London for a few days, where he’d dug
up a lot of stuff. Elias said he’d seen unbelievable things and
mentioned a plan or conspiracy of monstrous, worldwide
proportions. He said that there was a timetable and that he
needed to find the missing pieces—he mentioned needing to
go to Australia—but wouldn’t or couldn’t explain more. The
wire ended, saying that he would soon be in New York. Elias
took passage on a freighter, the Phalarope, the next morning.

Unless the investigators somehow stopped Elias from
gathering a share of the gold found at the pyramid in Peru
(Aftermath, page 83, Peru), this forms the bulk of Elias’ fund;
if they did, or if the episode never took place, the money
merely came from Elias’ other adventures the investigators
may or may not be aware of. The total value of his assets
comes to a little over $50,000.
Provided the investigators decide to accept the terms set
out in Elias’ will, they now have access to a considerable
sum of money with which to fund their research. However,
Ramsey is not a fool and will not just hand over large
sums of cash without the necessary receipts; he is also
prepared to argue the point if he believes the investigators
are frittering Elias’ money away on unnecessary expenses
in their pursuit of the Carlyle Expedition.
If any of the investigators do not wish to pursue the quest
that led Elias to his death, then now is the time for them
to back out gracefully. If they do, then Ramsey consults
Elias’ “Little Black Book” to secure suitable replacements
(Replacement Investigators, page 27, Introduction.) But,
hopefully, the challenge of finding their friend’s killers,
and completing his research are strong enough to drive
the investigators forward.

128

AMERICA

129

Carlyle Papers America #1

0

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

After arriving in New York a few days ago, Elias left more
notes with Kensington (Carlyle Papers America #13). They
were so bewildering and fragmentary that the editor concluded
that either Elias had gone over the edge and needed six months
in a sanitarium, or else that the author so little trusted anyone
that he’d hidden all the data in his head so that it would be
undetectable. Kensington is not eager to show these later notes
to the investigators, because he believes that their strangeness
reflects poorly on Elias’ sanity and upon his integrity as a
writer, and potentially upon Prospero House. Kensington may
let someone who is not a writer or an editor see the material—
since his embarrassment for Elias will be correspondingly less
if the reader is not a peer—or if the investigators succeed at
a Hard Charm, Fast Talk, or Persuade roll. Alternatively,
the investigators might decide to break in and steal the notes
(which are in the same Elias correspondence file); a simple
matter in this unguarded building, where editors and authors
come and go constantly, as well as working at odd hours.

Regardless of how they acquire these last notes, the
investigators find that the pages are folded and stitched together
to form a small quarto volume of 40 pages. Frequently a page—or
a dozen or more—are blank; sometimes a single word is repeated
for several pages. Most entries are written with agitation and can
barely be read. All the words, however, are clearly in Elias’ hand.
Keeper’s note: in case the players have difficulty deciphering
Elias’ shaky hand, the contents of the final notes (Carlyle
Papers America #13) are as follows:
Many names, many forms, but all the same and toward one end...
Need Help... Too big, too ghastly. These dreams... dreams like Carlyle’s?
Check that psychoanalyst’s files... All of them survived! They’ll open the
gate. Why?... so the power and the danger is real. They... many threads
beginning... The books are in Carlyle’s safe... Coming for me. Will the
ocean protect? Ho Ho, no quitters now. Must tell, and make readers
Believe. Should I scream for them? Let’s scream together

Carlyle Papers America #1

1

Carlyle Papers America #1

3

130

AMERICA

Carlyle Papers America #1

2

131

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E MEETING ERICA CARLYLE
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

estate might work, though she may not leave the grounds
for a week at a time—her representatives and her private
phone lines taking care of her legwork.

• Link: Jackson Elias’ radiogram mentioning the Carlyle
Expedition (Carlyle Papers: The Expedition #1).
• Link: Roger Carlyle’s sister (Carlyle Papers: The
Expedition #9–11).

Keeper note: pushing the investigators to figure out ways
in which to communicate with this wealthy, beautiful, and
somewhat willful woman may be very entertaining. The
Keeper could have the investigators thrown out of swanky
clubs by enormous men wearing tight tuxedos, have Carlyle’s
private detectives obtrusively tail the investigators, and so
on. At Miss Carlyle’s request, the local police will always
hold the investigators on charges of mopery (a handy, vague
charge with which beat policemen could arrest nuisances
whenever they wanted). If the investigators attempt to write
a critical story about the Carlyle Expedition, they might gain
her attention or that of Bradley Grey, provoking some effort
to stop its publication.

Miss Carlyle is presently at Carlyle House, her Westchester
estate. The investigators can easily find her by reading the society
column of any local newspaper or by phoning and speaking
with representatives at any of the numerous Carlyle companies
or offices. All inquiries are forwarded to Bradley Grey, a partner
in the law firm of Dunstan, Whittleby, and Grey. Grey acts as
confidant and lawyer for Miss Carlyle, and the investigators
must impress him to arrange an interview with her.
A face-to-face meeting can be arranged with Grey, who
wishes to know why the investigators want to see Miss
Carlyle. Grey’s interest may be attracted by implying that
Roger Carlyle is alive (though the investigators have no
reason to think so, unless they’ve read Jackson Elias’ notes;
Carlyle Papers America #11 and #12). Alternatively, he
may set up a meeting for the investigators if they impress
him with their credentials, state they intend to write a
“favorable” account of the Carlyle Expedition, or some
such account that will not tarnish the Carlyle name. A
successful Credit Rating or Persuade roll also does the job.
Should the investigators manage to bypass Bradley
Grey, they find Miss Carlyle to be “busy” and uninterested
in discussing the Carlyle Expedition. She refuses to be
questioned in public places or on the run without an
introduction. If the investigators succeed in a Hard Fast
Talk roll, then she may listen. Investigators might also
attempt to crash a party or benefit that she is attending,
or one or more might pose as businessmen working on a
deal that requires a meeting with her.
Erica Carlyle does not want to discuss her dead brother,
but she will if her position is threatened, if her business
empire is compromised, or if her personal interest is piqued.
Though she would never say so, she detested her brother’s
excesses and believes him better dead—even his death, she
has said privately, was too bizarre to be decent. While he was
alive, Roger nearly ruined the Carlyle interests (transport,
munitions, import/export) by draining them of operating
capital. He also mistreated Erica and gave her no say in
financial matters; she was nearly impoverished for a while.
Since gaining control, Erica has managed the estate well,
and the Carlyle holdings are flourishing. Management and
stockholders are also heartily glad that Roger Carlyle is gone.
Alternatively, an investigator might try to gain
employment in her household or try to make friends with
those who are employed there. Staking out the Carlyle

Keeper note: depending on how organized the investigators
are, their meeting with Miss Carlyle may take place as part
of their initial investigations in response to the radiogram
from Jackson Elias and before Elias is murdered. If so, adjust
the information they can uncover accordingly, and bear in
mind that the significance of some of the clues may be lost
on them—for now.

THE CARLYLE ESTATE

The Westchester County estate is half an hour north of New
York City, on the Hudson River. Motoring investigators
catch an ominous glimpse of Sing Sing Prison not too far
away. The Carlyle estate consists of an elegant three-story
mansion and five acres of superb grounds, all guarded by a 12
foot (3.5 m) high iron fence topped with sharpened finials.
There are always two armed gatekeepers. More armed men
with guard dogs routinely patrol the grounds. One or more
bodyguards, including Joe Corey, accompany Miss Carlyle
when she ventures off the estate. Numerous faithful and
capable servants staff the house.
Such protection is not unneeded. Shortly after Roger
Carlyle’s supposed murderers were hung in Nairobi, cultists
tried to break into the library of the Westchester estate,
seeking items of great interest to them.
Erica Carlyle would naturally press charges against any
person who broke into her home (given the degree of
security, this requires a successful combined Locksmith
and Hard Stealth roll), but a successful Fast Talk roll
might stay her hand; she likes feisty, well-spoken people.

132

AMERICA
Erica’s Interview

introducing them but is convinced it was all Bunay’s fault that
Roger ultimately lost his grip on reality. Her brother began
to disappear for days, only to turn up wild-eyed and crazed,
saying only that he had been to Harlem.
Roger said that Bunay was queenly, a priestess, and
that she held secrets which he must have. For a while
Erica encouraged the African expedition, supposing that
eventually Roger would come to his senses and see that
Bunay and her tales were mumbo-jumbo.

Once an interview is obtained, the investigators are called
to the Carlyle Estate. Here, they find Erica and Bradley
Grey waiting for them. The information Erica may impart is
summarized as follows.
From the beginning, Erica knew that Roger’s African
expedition was much more than just another of his foolish
whims—she believes that some secret fascinated and worried
him. “That Negro Woman Bunay” (her way of referring to
M’Weru, based on her pseudonym, Nichonka Bunay) caused
Roger’s obsession. A successful Psychology roll makes
Erica’s racist attitude toward her brother’s relationship with
M’Weru quite clear; in her mind, Roger’s entanglement with
an uneducated African woman only helped underline how
depraved his tastes had become. Erica has no idea how Roger
came to meet her, but even before Bunay came to rule Roger’s
life, he’d begun to have strange dreams in which something
seemed to beckon him and call to him that something be
done. Roger would wake up screaming but absolutely refused
to discuss his dreams beyond that—with her, at least.
In an attempt to help her brother, Erica recommended that
Roger visit Dr. Robert Huston, just then the lion of Erica’s social
set. She believes that Huston talked Roger into the expedition
(undoubtedly with Bunay’s collusion), and feels guilty about

Keeper note: Erica Carlyle knows neither M’Weru’s true
name nor that of her cult.
The investigators may also wish to ask about the other
members of the Carlyle Expedition.
• Sir Aubrey Penhew: Erica knows nothing of him and does
not know why he accompanied the expedition. “Perhaps
Sir Aubrey needed money—everyone else around Roger
certainly did.”
• Dr. Robert Huston: a suave and handsome man whom
Erica had found extremely sensitive and perceptive.
Huston supposedly went with Roger in order to continue
his treatment.

Meeting Erica Carlyle

133

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

• Hypatia Masters: Erica had met her occasionally and was
unimpressed. Roger dated her a few times, inconclusively.
She was a good photographer; perhaps that was the reason
she went along.
• Jack “Brass” Brady: he was fanatically loyal to Roger and
someone whom Roger could always trust. In California,
Carlyle’s lawyers had saved Brady from certain conviction
for murder; this occurred while Roger spent a semester at
USC (having before then been thrown out of Harvard, Yale,
Princeton, Miskatonic, and Cornell in quick succession).

ROBBERY!
If the investigators try to secure Roger Carlyle’s
books through illegal means without knowing of the
combination’s whereabouts, they must deal with the
estate’s security, gain access to the library, locate the wall
safe’s hiding place, and be able to get into it (requiring
either a successful Locksmith roll or a crowbar combined
with an Extreme STR roll; dropping to Hard if the
investigators possess the correct safecracking tools).
If they are smart, the investigators recruit a professional
safecracker to do the job. The Keeper should have such
people ready to hire, but let the investigators come up
with the idea. Suitable profiles for such people can be
found in the Hirelings section of this chapter (page
174); if the investigators decide to follow this path,
the Keeper may consider having the players take on
the roles of these petty criminals and play through the
burglary. One or more of these hirelings may also make
suitable long-term investigators, if the players need a
replacement in a hurry.
If the investigators decide to rob the library themselves,
one option is to inform them that there is to be a large
party at the mansion, hosted by Erica. Should they
wish, they could roleplay through the party (invited
or not), find a way to clear guests from the library,
lock its doors, and proceed. Such exploits could be
wonderful fun. To search the library books, have the
players make a group Luck roll every 20 game minutes.
If one is successful, an investigator happens upon the
correct volume of Poe and the combination it holds
(R15, L14, R13, L12).

Keepers may wish to include select pieces of information
regarding the members of the expedition, as described in
The Carlyle Expedition Principals section, beginning on
page 139. Asked if she knows of anyone else the expedition
had dealings with, either in America or abroad, Miss Carlyle
vaguely remembers that Roger hired a Frenchman called
Besart to do some work for him in Egypt. What that work
entailed, she has no idea.

The Carlyle Mansion Library

As an afterthought, Erica mentions that toward the end
of his time at home, Roger constantly read several old
books. She glanced through one (The Pnakotic Manuscripts):
what she read frightened her, for it seemed to substantiate
Roger’s crazy actions. Roger kept those books in a hidden
safe in the mansion library. Unknown to Roger, Erica knew
of the safe and figured out its combination, which she
jotted down on the flyleaf of Poe’s collected poems. She has
not thought to open the safe since Roger left for London,
having had a new and nearly invincible vault installed in
the mansion’s offices.
The investigators may also learn of Roger Carlyle’s books
through the notes left by Jackson Elias in the possession
of Jonah Kensington (Carlyle Papers America #13). If
they bring up the matter directly, Erica may deny it at
first, for it occurs to her that the old volumes may well be
of considerable value to collectors, and she will want to
have them appraised (as well as having the investigators
investigated to see just who she’s dealing with). If the
investigators have impressed her, she may decide to let
them see the books, at the Keeper’s discretion.
In the library are easy chairs, tables and reading lamps,
ashtrays and spittoons, an elaborate High Victorian iron
fireplace, a magnificent teak and slate billiards table, and
several thousand volumes protected within unlocked glass
cases along the walls. There are leather-bound complete
editions of Trollope, Dickens, Bulwer-Lytton, Mrs.
Radcliffe, Francis Parkman, Ralph Waldo Emerson, the
earlier works of George Washington Cable, and other
fosterers of culture during the previous hundred years.

Another section contains books on the occult, but all are
unremarkable surveys of traditional magic. On the north
wall of the library is a large case filled with old reference
works in English and French. A successful Spot Hidden
roll notes an oddity: a fat edition of Poe’s collected poems—
the one in which Erica wrote the safe’s combination—is
tucked among these volumes. Behind the Poe is a small
panel that can be pulled open. Behind the panel is a button:
pushing the button slides the entire case aside several feet
to reveal the safe behind. Within the safe are four books:
The Pnakotic Manuscripts, Sélections de Livre D’Ivon, Amongst

134

AMERICA
Carlyle Papers America #1

4

the Stones, and Life as a God. See Appendix C:
Tomes for further details on each of these.
Keeper note: in particular, Life as a God (in
actual fact, Montgomery Crompton’s insane
diary) mentions the Black Pharaoh’s throne
room (Carlyle Papers America #14). The quote
refers to the secret sanctum of Nyarlathotep
within the capstone of the Bent Pyramid in
Egypt. If the investigators read this passage
and find the hidden room (Nyarlathotep’s
Sanctum, page 365, Egypt), remind them of
this description. Crompton always refers to
Nyarlathotep as the Black Pharaoh, or the
Pharaoh of Darkness. Also in the diary are
graphic descriptions of murders, sacrifices,
and so on, all of which mention the short,
single-spiked clubs which the cult uses
for ritual murders (Cult in Residence:
Brotherhood of the Black Pharaoh (UK),
page 182, England).
The Keeper may wish to withhold some or
all of the information within Life as a God
until the investigators reach London or
Egypt, and then present it as something
remembered from the diary, which before
seemed to have no significance (for instance,
the first time investigators are confronted
with a short, single-spiked club).

OTHER INQUIRIES

hotel’s opening in 1884. A polite clerk at the reception desk
greets the investigators and asks if he may be of assistance.
Anyone unknown to the clerk who attempts to climb the
impressive gray marble staircase to Dr. Lemming’s apartment
on the sixth floor is immediately challenged. If they fail to
acknowledge him, they are chased after by the two smartly
liveried doormen who stand guard at the lobby entrance; for
their statistics, see the Murray Hill Hotel Doorman profile
on page 167. The hotel has no compunction about calling the
police should the investigators cause a ruckus.
Providing they comply or speak directly with the clerk
upon arrival, the clerk asks the investigators to wait while
he calls up to Dr. Lemming to see if he is at home to
guests today. If the investigators look at all disreputable,
then they need to succeed at a Credit Rating roll to have
the clerk ring through. If they look presentable or have a
letter of introduction (or a sufficiently impressive business

The order in which the investigators meet with the characters
described in this section may vary (before or after the funeral,
etc.). They are grouped here for convenience.

THE DOCTOR IS IN

• Link: identified as a possible source during the investigators’
interview with Lt. Poole (The New York Police, page 125).
• Link: identified as a possible source during the investigators’
meetings with Rebecca Shosenburg (The New York Times,
page 145).

Dr. Lemming’s address at the Murray Hill Hotel (East 40th
Street and Park Avenue) is easily obtainable from either
Lt. Poole or Miss Shosenburg. The double stairway at the
hotel’s Park Avenue entrance leads up into the marble-lined
reception hall, where the decor has changed little since the

135

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

MEETING MIRIAM
ATWRIGHT

or calling card), then the clerk does not hesitate in his
duty. Once the clerk has secured Dr. Lemming’s consent,
he permits the investigators to climb the stairs.

• Link: letter to Jackson Elias, care of Prospero House
(Carlyle Papers America #6).

Meeting Dr. Lemming

The doctor is waiting for the investigators outside his
apartment door. He looks delighted to see them and ushers
them into his opulent but overcrowded rooms. Rococo
detailing on the walls and ceilings fights for the investigators’
attention among a plethora of books and seemingly random
objects from every continent, all with the shared theme of
myth and folklore.
Questioning the doctor about Elias’ death and the other
murder victims causes the elderly academic to giggle
nervously before taking a medicinal nip of his “nervetonic” from a silver hip flask. All he can tell them is what
he told the police: that he believes the mark to be that of
an African death cult or, more likely, someone mimicking
the symbol of an African death cult to stir up ill feeling. He
is sorry to hear of Elias’ death and is thoroughly perplexed
by it. Either the police have the wrong man in prison,
or Adams must have been working with an accomplice.
Should they wish to know more about such things as
African folklore and cult histories, then Mr. Silas N’Kwane,
the proprietor of Ju-Ju House in Harlem, may be able
to help them. He regularly sends Dr. Lemming trinkets
and fetishes he knows will be of interest to his studies,
and charges a very reasonable price for them, to boot (see
Horror at Ju-Ju House, page 154).

The investigators may wish to travel up to Massachusetts to
visit Miss Atwright in person at the Harvard University’s
Widener Library or speak to her over the phone. An
interview with her establishes that Elias sought a book called
Africa’s Dark Sects, which mysteriously disappeared from the
Widener Library several months before Elias requested it.
By “mysteriously,” she means that one day it simply vanished.
“There was an unspeakable odor in the collection the day we
noticed the Sects book was missing.”
Miss Atwright admired Jackson Elias and will help the
investigators if they ask. Her library can identify the rune
carved into Elias’ forehead, if the investigators are struggling
to do so themselves. She can make the identification over
the next week in spare minutes while she works, or an
investigator can do it in a single 12-hour day with her help.
The information they learn is the same as that described
in Information in Room 410 section on page 120.

Keeper note: there is no malice intended in Dr. Lemming’s
referring the investigators to N’Kwane, so successful
Psychology rolls discern no hidden agenda, even if they’ve
spoken to Arthur Emerson and heard his misgivings about
Ju-Ju House’s proprietor (Emerson Imports, page 138). As
far as Lemming is concerned, N’Kwane is exactly what he
pretends to be, an aged, humble purveyor of African tribal
curiosities.

Originally from Sydney, Australia, Prof. Cowles currently
works as a Professor of Anthropology at Miskatonic
University. Because of the attention garnered by his beautiful
daughter, Ewa, most young men in Arkham can offer precise
directions to Prof. Cowles’ bungalow on Pickman (between
West and Garrison), to Cowles’ office in the Liberal Arts
Building, or to the Cowles’ favorite lunch spot (Grafton
Diner, near the Boston and Maine train station). The normal
academic routes of phone, letter, telegram, or even interoffice mail reach Cowles less quickly, but the investigators
are always able to communicate with the scholar within 24
hours if they decide not to take the train to Arkham.
The professor is friendly and open. Unfortunately,
he knows little. He never met Jackson Elias, he never
consciously saw the man, and has no knowledge of Elias’
life. He has read several of Elias’ books in connection with
Polynesia and New Zealand, and recalls a few details of
the works if an investigator recites titles.

MEETING PROFESSOR
ANTHONY COWLES

• Link: handbill to a lecture by Prof. Cowles, given at New
York University, found hidden in amongst Jackson Elias’
effects (Carlyle Papers America #7).

If the investigators fail a group Luck roll, then Dr. Lemming
is in a garrulous mood and glad of the captive audience. He
rings down to the hotel kitchen to order refreshments and
proceeds to bend the investigators’ ears on every conceivable
folklore topic under the sun until they can make good their
escape, requiring a successful social skill roll; the Keeper
may wish to award a penalty die to the roll to reflect the
investigators’ lack of luck. Attempts to use Intimidate
immediately result in the old man calling for hotel security.

136

AMERICA
Carlyle Papers America #1

5

One: a bat cult on ce ex
isted amon g the Ab origi
nal peoples of Australia
It was known across
.
the continent, and th
e
go d of the cult was
known as the Father
of All Bats . Adherents
believed that by makin
human sa crifi ces to th
g
eir go d, they themselve
s would be co me worth
enou gh that the Fathe
y
r of All Bats would appe
ar to them . On ce he was
enti ced to appear, the
go d would conquer all me
n. Sa crifi ces were run
through a gauntlet of
worshippers who stru
ck
th
e vi ctims with clubs
em bedded with the sh
arp teeth of bats . The
teeth were coated wi
a fast-actin g poison, so
th
mehow derived fro m fe
rmented bat droppin gs
The vi ctims apparently
.
went mad be fore they
died. Leaders of the
cult reputedly could ta
ke the forms of batwinged snakes, enablin
them to steal sa crifi ce
g
s fro m across the land
. Cowles believes that
this cult be came dorman
t or extin ct hundreds of
years ago. Its former
existen ce is the reas on
that he be came interes
ted in Ja ckson Elias’
bo oks ab out present-da
y cults .
Two: an Ab original song
cy cle mentions a pla ce
where enor mous bein gs
gathered, so mewhere
in the west of Austra
lia . The songs say that
these go ds, who were
not at all like men, built
great sleepin g walls an
du g great caves. But liv
d
in g winds blew down th
e go ds and overthrew
them, destroying their
camp. When this happen
ed, the way was open
for the Father of All Ba
ts, who came into the
land, and grew strong.
Three: a set of four
overexposed glass slide
s. Ea ch sh ow s a few
sweatin g men standin
g beside enor mous blo
cks of stone, pitted an
eroded but clearly dres
d
sed and formed for ar ch
ite ctural purposes . Dim
carvin gs seem to de co
rate so me. Billow s of
sand are everywhere
Th ou gh he did not bri
.
ng the bo ok with him
, Cowles says that th
dis coverer, one Arthur
e
Ma cW hirr of Port Hedla
nd, Australia, kept a dia
in whi ch he re corded
ry
several atta cks on th
e party by Ab originals.
Ma cW hirr reportedly re
cords deaths to vi ctim
s fro m hundreds of small
punctures, reminis cent
of the earlier bat cult.
Four: Cowles tells a ta
le he colle cted fro m ne
ar the Arafura Sea, in
northern Australia . In it
Sand Bat, or Father of
All Bats, has a battle of
wits with Rainbow Snak
e, the Ab original deif ic
ation of water and th
patron of life. Rainbow
e
Snake su cceeds in tric
kin g and trappin g Sand
Bat and his clan in the
depths of a watery pla
ce fro m whi ch Sand Ba
can only co mplain, and
t
is unable to return to
trouble the people.

137

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

family are reliable and would be good U.S. contacts if
the investigators need help while abroad. They plan on
returning to Sydney in seven months, within the frame of
this campaign, and so might participate in the Australia
chapter, depending on when the investigators arrive there.
As mentioned by Prof. Cowles, his colleague Prof. David
Dodge (Meeting David Dodge, page 461, Australia) is
tending their house, and he would be of even more use than
Cowles during an expedition into the Australian desert.

If suitably flattered or the subject of a successful Charm
roll (Hard if Fast Talk or Persuade are employed), Cowles
gladly summarizes his recent anthropology lecture at NYU
(Carlyle Papers America #15). Depending on where (and
how) an interview takes place, if the investigators outstay
their welcome, Ewa joins the conversation and drops
increasingly heavy hints about what a busy man her father is.
Once the investigators have heard what Cowles has
to say, and after showing them the photographic plates
(mentioned in the handout), Prof. Cowles relates that the
plates were made by Arthur MacWhirr and came to him
via Robert Mackenzie, a mining engineer and the executor
of the MacWhirr estate. Cowles says he also received
MacWhirr’s diary (Carlyle Papers Australia #1). Should
the investigators ask to see it, he sighs and relates how
he doesn’t have it, as it is back home in Sydney (Meeting
David Dodge, page 461, Australia). Of course, should the
investigators intend to travel to Australia, the professor is
happy to furnish them with letters of introduction to his
friend David Dodge, who is currently looking after Cowles’
house there, and to Robert Mackenzie in Port Hedland
(Meeting Robert Mackenzie, page 466, Australia).

EMERSON IMPORTS

• Link: a business card found after Jackson Elias’ murder
(Carlyle Papers America #5).

The company can be found in a long, narrow building on
the edge of the Hudson River, just beyond Hell’s Kitchen.
There are loading docks at both ends. The building itself is a
warehouse piled high with freight, with a small set of offices
upstairs at the front. Arthur Emerson, a man in his fifties,
recalls the visit of Jackson Elias and expresses condolences if
told that Elias is dead.
Elias had been checking importers to find connections
with Mombasa. Emerson is the U.S. agent for the Mombasan
exporter Ahja Singh (Mombasa: Seeking Ahja Singh, page
396, Kenya), whose only known U.S. account happens to be
Ju-Ju House, 1 Ransom Court, New York City (Horror at
Ju-Ju House, page 154). Emerson says that he is sure Elias
intended to visit Ju-Ju House to talk with the manager,
Silas N’Kwane.
If the investigators ask his opinion, he responds that
something about N’Kwane makes his skin crawl and adds
that he told Elias the same thing. This is in marked contrast
to Mordecai Lemming’s assessment of N’Kwane’s character
(Meeting Dr. Lemming, page 136), but a successful
Psychology roll shows no duplicity on Emerson’s part.
After the investigators leave, Emerson may decide to
inform the police about Elias, his destination, and the
investigators, if the Keeper so wishes.

Keeper note: Prof. Cowles’ lecture establishes that an
Australian death cult of the Sand Bat once existed and links
this cult to evidence of the Cthulhu Mythos. In addition,
the fact that Arthur MacWhirr’s diary (and possibly further
clues) can be found in Sydney, Australia, provides impetus
for the investigators to visit that distant land.
The professor has heard of Cthulhu and R’lyeh, and he finds
certain disturbing parallels between the tales of the Sand
Bat and Cthulhu. Some Polynesian legends discuss them
also, though the tales are different. Cowles has read the
Ponape Scriptures, “a most disturbing and disgusting tome.”
Unfortunately, the University of Sydney’s copy of the Ponape
Scriptures was lent to a John Scott of Boston, Mass., and was
never returned. ( John Scott is a villainous character appearing
in the first Call of Cthulhu campaign, Shadows of Yog-Sothoth,
later part of an omnibus volume, Cthulhu Classics.)
While he is a man of great curiosity and some personal
courage, Cowles has a career to pursue and a contracted
fellowship to complete. Neither he nor his daughter can
spend many hours helping the investigators, and Prof.
Cowles will not volunteer to join them. The Cowles

138

AMERICA

THE CARLYLE
EXPEDITION PRINCIPALS

•

The investigators may look deeper into the histories of the
Carlyle Expedition members, and perhaps uncover a few
surprises.
There were five important members in the Carlyle Expedition:
dashing Roger Carlyle, charismatic Dr. Robert Huston,
scholarly Sir Aubrey Penhew, beautiful Hypatia Masters,
and resourceful Jack Brady. The following entries summarize
the pertinent data about them, which the investigators can
easily obtain from various sources (predominantly newspaper
articles and personal contacts) or may already know. While
the Keeper is free to print or photocopy these summaries and
hand them out, they are more conceived as information to be
included in interviews, perhaps those with Erica Carlyle, the
police, or other characters.
Deeper research reveals more incidents, but not more
meaning. On a purely biographical level, all researches
about the principals finish as dead ends in which their
public personas and private personalities match believably.
Unfortunately (for the investigators), while M’Weru was
part of the expedition’s entourage, easily available details
concerning her history are not to be found. The best the
investigators can do is to hear Erica Carlyle’s racist remarks.
As the investigators venture to other countries, more
information concerning M’Weru may come to the surface.

•

•
•
•

•

Keeper note: it is important to remember that there is
a general lack of written information concerning people
in America during this era; historic objections to the
documentation of citizens in the United States were first
muffled by World War Two and then by the Cold War that
followed. To emphasize, most of the following information
would be passed on in conversation rather than by the liberal
application of the Library Use skill.

•

ROGER VANE
WORTHINGTON CARLYLE

• No police record; no military service.
• Wealthy, yet neglected and ignored by his father, young
Carlyle craved attention.
• His lawyers evaded a paternity suit against him when he
was 17.
• Carlyle underwent short treatments for alcoholism when
he was 18 and again when he was 20.
• Miraculously, Carlyle graduated from Groton but was
allowed “gentleman’s resignations” from a succession

of excellent universities (Harvard, Yale,
Princeton, Miskatonic, Cornell, and USC)
over the next three years.
When his parents died in an automobile
crash, Carlyle seemed to take stock of
himself and, for the next year, gained
the general approval of his peers,
retainers, and relatives. But he slipped
back into his old ways when his sprightly
sister, Erica (who had not neglected her
studies), showed a better grasp of family affairs.
His lack of character was somewhat confirmed
when Carlyle fell under the influence of a mysterious
East African woman, a self-styled poetess with the nom
de plume of Nichonka Bunay. Rumors of debaucheries
and worse circulated among police, journalists, and others
whose business it is to know the backgrounds of public
personalities.
During this period, Carlyle began to drain great sums
of money from family interests, which prompted vicious
arguments between him, Erica, and their executives.
In person, Carlyle remained forthright and friendly, and
he was a popular figure at glittering New York nightspots.
In the months before he left for Egypt, Carlyle seemed
to withdraw and become more serious. But though
Carlyle might have been maturing, the goals of the
expedition remained nebulous, even to those who should
have known.
The first Carlyle, Abner Vane Carel, was transported to
Virginia in 1714, having been convicted of “unwholesome
and desperative activitie” not otherwise characterized by
the authorities in Derbyshire, England. Abner was the
illegitimate and discredited son of an undistinguished
Midlands nobleman.
Abner’s son Ephraim moved to New England, adopted
“Carlyle” as a more gallant surname, and made sound
investments in lumber and textiles, the basis of the family
fortune to come. The Carlyle interests amassed huge
profits during the American Civil War, and far-sighted
management further expanded the financial empire in the
half-century thereafter.

DR. ROBERT
ELLINGTON HUSTON

• No police record; no military service.
• The youngest of three sons, his father was a Chicago M.D.
who, as a young man, was reputed to have belonged to
several deviant sects.
• Robert Huston graduated with honors from Johns
Hopkins. After three years he threw over his circulatory

139

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

THE CARLYLE RECORDS
Dr. Huston’s files were carefully boxed, marked, and
stored at the Medical Affairs Board in New York, in a
room adjoining the secretary’s office. Adjudication finally
determined that these records were in fact medical in
nature, though old-school doctors resisted the notion for
several months. These are, therefore, confidential records.
Only Huston’s heirs, the patients, or a doctor showing
good cause can easily gain access. A Mr. Adrian Ferris,
secretary to the board, controls all such files. Ferris is a
tough cookie, and any Fast Talk rolls performed against
him require a Hard success; an investigator who is a
practicing physician in the State of New York can get by
him without need for a skill roll (note that no statistics
are provided for Ferris).
The offices of the Medical Affairs Board are on Park
Avenue at 61st Street, Suite 1002. There is always a
guard on duty in the lobby. A watchman passes the
offices once every hour between 6 p.m. and 6 a.m.
Investigators conducting an illicit search should make
a group Luck roll to determine if the guard checks the
offices while they are present. If needing statistics for
the watchman, use one of Erica Carlyle’s guards at
her estate (Carlyle Estate Guards, page 165, minus
the shotgun). The files, held in a simple manila file
folder headed “Carlyle, Roger V.W.,” contain only a few
relevant excerpts (Carlyle Papers America #16). Any
investigator reading the files should perceive that the
more Huston grew to know Carlyle, the less Huston
was willing to put on paper about him. As desired,
the Keeper may add other information, including the
apparent coincidence of Imelda Bosch’s suicide.

•

•

•

•

•

ailments practice (and his wife) and went
to Vienna to study first under Freud and
then under Jung. Huston was among
the first Americans to undertake this
esoteric and controversial study of
the mind, which dealt so much with
sexual behavior that no respectable
person could talk about it.
Huston’s seemingly salacious and
dangerous past, along with his elegant
manners and sardonic wit, made him much in
demand when he returned to New York City. There
he established a practice in psychoanalysis, catering
to the very wealthy.
Huston enjoyed fame and notoriety. His fees were whispered
to be $50–$60 dollars per visit, at a time when a college
professor might make $4,000 a year. Women found him
suave, handsome, sensitive, perceptive, and sexy.
Among his patients was Roger Carlyle. Though Huston
supposedly went on the expedition with Carlyle in order
to continue treatment, Huston had just broken off an affair
with a Miss Imelda Bosch, who had then committed suicide.
Carlyle helped hush up the scandal, perhaps in return for
Huston’s company on the expedition.
There were also rumors that Carlyle did not want Huston
at large while he was far away in Egypt. Carlyle may have
believed that Huston’s ethics were not strong enough to
resist revealing explosive material about his young patient.
After Huston was declared dead, his records were turned
over to the Medical Affairs Board of the State of New
York for destruction—controversy regarding this decision
reached the newspapers. If the investigators ask, they learn
that the records were not destroyed, as nobody got around
to authorizing the destruction. In those records are Huston’s
notes concerning Roger Carlyle (The Carlyle Records,
box nearby).

SIR AUBREY PENHEW,
BARONET OF PEVENSEY

Huston’s File for Erica Carlyle
Though there is a handout for Roger Carlyle’s file,
not enough exists to warrant anything for Erica. Her
file notes a few innocuous consultations for which he
charged her an outrageous $90 each, and establishes that
her relationship with her brother troubled her. Huston
believed Erica to be of remarkably fine character and
noted that he rarely saw such capable adjustment to the
problems of living. He suggested to her that he would
be glad to talk to Roger.

• Young Sir Aubrey was caught pinching a
policeman’s helmet in 1898 while at Oxford.
• Limited service as a Lieutenant with
the Yorkshire Guards, 1901–1902,
breveted as a Colonel in British Army
Intelligence, 1915–1916, and then
retired due to injury.
• Penhew’s public life is easily followed
in Who’s Who, Burke’s Peerage, etc.
Sir Aubrey graduated with honors in
Classics from Oxford, but spent the next

140

AMERICA
Carlyle Papers America #1

6

141

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

•

•

•

•

•

several years in Egypt surveying and performing exploratory
excavations amid the then-little-known wonders up-river,
to the First Cataract and beyond.
As his official biography notes, Sir Aubrey is credited with
founding several important branches of Egyptology and
for making several important archaeological discoveries,
particularly at Dahshur.
Nearly as important, the Penhew Foundation in England,
set up by Sir Aubrey, has underwritten many influential
researches at home and abroad, and it is responsible for the
education of many brilliant but penniless scholars.
With the inevitable nimbus of black sheep and blackguards
down through the centuries, the Penhews trace their nobility
from the time of William the Conqueror, when Sir Boris
Penhew acquired great holdings in the west of England.
With the exception of one Sir Blaize, who was beheaded
for treason and black magic (his crimes nearly cost the line
its titles and properties), the Penhew prosperity and prestige
has been undiminished for eight centuries.
Sir Aubrey has title to several famous stately homes, as
well as mansions in London, the Cotswolds, Monaco, and
Alexandria (Egypt), and townhouses in Paris, Rome, and
Athens. He is incontestably wealthy and reputedly made
new fortunes from his American holding companies during
the Great War.
Though a public figure, Sir Aubrey’s private life is little
known. He is a bachelor, without an heir, other than the
Penhew Foundation. His Egyptologist peers hold him in
high regard.

Luis María Piñera, at City College of New York. (With a
successful Luck roll, a close friend, Olivia de Bernardesta,
confides that Hypatia was pregnant by Raoul, had the baby
aborted, and fled the country with Carlyle rather than face
her lover.)
• Miss Masters dated Roger Carlyle several times, but there
was never anything serious in the relationship, and the two
remained friends. Her presence on the expedition might
have been Carlyle’s gallant whim. No one actually knows
why she was invited or why she accepted.

JACK ORIEL “BRASS” BRADY

• Brady’s police record lists assaults and barroom brawls, petty
theft, loitering, gambling, mopery, public drunkenness, and
an acquitted murder charge.
• As a Marine sergeant, Brady served in China, with extended
periods in Shanghai, and later on the Western Front in
France, earning a Bronze Star and other commendations.
• He is rumored to have been a mercenary in Turkey just
after the war and to know Turkish and Arabic, as well as
several Chinese dialects.
• During a fight in Oilfield, California, he apparently throttled
his opponent to death before onlookers could pull him off,
suggesting great strength or perhaps excellent technique (as
well as a violent streak).
• The Oilfield murder piqued the curiosity of Roger Carlyle,
who just then was being expelled from USC. After an hourlong interview, the two forged an intimate alliance, amazing
everyone who knew Carlyle, for the youth had never made
any strong friendships. Carlyle summoned the best legal
minds in the country for the defense, who proceeded to
blow to pieces the seemingly open-and-shut case offered
by the county prosecutor and eclipsing the testimony of
seven eye-witnesses. Brady was acquitted on a variety of
technical grounds.
• From that time, Jack Brady and Roger Carlyle were rarely
separated—at times Brady worked as Carlyle’s bodyguard,
and at other times was his spokesman. For the expedition,
Brady acted as general foreman and manager, and by all
accounts performed well.
• Brady’s nickname comes from a brass plate
about 4 inches (10 cm) square, which
he carries over his heart. The plate is
described as being covered with strange
signs and inscriptions. Bullets have
dented it twice. Brady has said that his
mother, a recluse in Upper Michigan,
had The Eye, and that she made this
plate to guard her impetuous son.

MISS HYPATIA
CELESTINE MASTERS

• No police record or record of public service.
• Masters is heiress to the Masters armaments fortune, the
dark antecedents of which have been chronicled in the
muckraking Masters of Corruption by Nikolai Steinburg.
• Miss Masters’ grandfather, Aldington Masters, held onto
and increased the holdings by leaving most decisions to a
series of chief executives who uniformly made intelligent,
far-ranging, and profitable moves. George, her
father, also adopted this relaxing way of life,
spending his free time doting on his daughter.
• Hypatia attended Swiss and French
academies, showing facility for languages.
Her great interest, however, proved to be
photography. Several of her shows earned
good reviews and enthusiastic attendance.
• A daring streak in her led to an incautious
affair with a Catholic Marxist, one Raoul

142

AMERICA

HARLEM
to protect their neighbors and neighborhoods from the police
and white (usually Irish) rabble-rousers, although much of
the tension in Harlem itself involved police harassment of
the various ethnic communities. While the New York Age
urged respectability and good citizenship in the face of this
violence, the Amsterdam News encouraged Harlem’s AfricanAmerican residents to speak up and demand justice, though
the paper stopped short of advocating violence in return.
In 1920, the boundaries of Harlem were roughly defined
as 131st Street to 144th Street between Lenox and Seventh
Avenue. By 1928, this had expanded out to cover the area
between St. Nicholas Avenue and the Harlem River (west
to east) between 110th Street and Central Park and 159th
Street and the Polo Grounds (south to north).
Perhaps the thing Harlem is most famous for during the
1920s and '30s is the Harlem Renaissance, an outpouring
of African-American art, literature, culture, and social
activism that reached its peak between 1924 and 1929.
People from all over the city (and country) flocked to
Harlem for, among other things, events and talks at the
135th Street branch of the New York Public Library and
the flamboyant nightlife in the neighborhood’s many clubs,
speakeasies, and saloons. Homosexuality was also more
accepted in Harlem than elsewhere in New York, but due
to the ongoing pressures to conform from certain quarters,
such residents still had to watch their step.

Wherein the investigators uncover a trail of cult brutality and
police corruption before confronting Nyarlathotep’s minions in
New York, the Cult of the Bloody Tongue.

HARLEM IN THE 1920S

Once an affluent neighborhood, Harlem was gradually
abandoned by its original white Manhattanite inhabitants
as European immigrants, predominantly Italian and Jewish
refugees flocked into the area toward the end of the 19th
century. They, in turn, steadily gave way over the opening
decades of the 20th century to residents from New York’s
other black communities, as well as newcomers who moved
to the city as part of the Great Migration, immigrants from
the British Caribbean colonies, and a growing number of
Latin American arrivals after World War One in the area that
became known as “Spanish Harlem.” During the 1920s, the
area was populated by African-Americans (predominantly
Central and West Harlem) alongside Irish, Italian, Jewish,
and Latino communities (largely based in East Harlem).
The neighborhood was plagued by police brutality, as well
as racial tension as newcomers came and went, further fueled
by the return of African-American soldiers seeking housing,
work, and recognition of their civil rights following the Great
War. African-American gangs formed across the city in order

ORGANIZED CRIME
Police officers patrol the streets of Harlem

Harlem was home to several organized crime factions,
including the notorious Italian Black Hand gang of
extortionists (whose activities largely died out in the
1920s due to changes in American immigration law). It
was also the playground of both the Jewish and Italian
mobs (including the 116th Street Crew) who controlled
the area’s speakeasies and nightclubs, including the famous
Cotton Club (owned by gangster and former Sing-Sing
inmate Owney Madden). African-American gangs,
particularly those under the control of Stephanie St. Clair
and Casper Holstein (the so-called “Bolito King”) ran
numbers in Harlem so as not to encroach on the white
gangs’ territories (extortion, prostitution, and bootlegging).

143

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

144

AMERICA

AN INNOCENT MAN

• Link: a report in the New York Times regarding the similarity
of Jackson Elias’ death to a string of previous murders
(Carlyle Papers America #9).
• Link: meeting with Rebecca Shosenburg at Elias’ funeral
(The Funeral, page 127).
• Link: interview with Lt. Martin Poole (The New York
Police, page 125).
• Link: interview with Dr. Mordecai Lemming (The Doctor
Is In, page 135).

OLD VERSUS NEW
The weekly New York Age, published in Harlem, represented
the middle-class values of what became known as the “Old
Negroes” (the wealthier conservative establishment who had
lived in New York since its earliest days, who largely believed
that acceptance could only be achieved by conforming to white
expectations). Its opposite number, the weekly Amsterdam
News, represented the “New Negroes,” concentrating more
on the issues and events affecting Harlem and promoting
political self-expression and genuine equality.

During the course of their investigations so far, the
investigators should have come across Rebecca Shosenburg’s
article in the New York Times (Carlyle Papers America #9)
describing the previous eight murders, as well as Hilton
Adams’ arrest and subsequent incarceration for those crimes,
or have been informed of them at Elias’ funeral by the junior
reporter herself (The Funeral, page 127). Alternatively, they
may have learned details of Hilton Adams’ imprisonment
from Lt. Poole during their interview with him after
Elias’ murder (The New York Police, page 125), as well
as potentially discussing his guilt and innocence with Dr.
Mordecai Lemming (Meeting Dr. Lemming, page 136).
Keeper note: although An Innocent Man is not technically
a sidetrack scenario, investigators may circumvent it if they
ignore the links between Jackson Elias’ death and Hilton
Adams’ wrongful arrest. Likewise, they may miss it by going
straight to Ju-Ju House after talking to Arthur Emerson
(Emerson Imports, page 138) or Dr. Lemming (Meeting
Dr. Lemming, page 136). If they do, then the Keeper may
wish to have them spot either Miss Shosenburg or Millie
Adams watching the comings and goings at Ju-Ju House,
or following them after their visit there (a successful Spot
Hidden roll to notice Mrs. Adams; Hard difficulty for Miss
Shosenburg). Depending on what their visit to Ju-Ju House
entails, they may also be followed by cultists as well (see
What the Investigators See and Entering Ju-Ju House,
pages 155 and 156, respectively).

THE NEW YORK TIMES

• Link: source of the report linking Elias’ murder to those
previously committed (Carlyle Papers America #9).
• Link: Rebecca Shosenburg’s place of employment, as well
as the home of extensive news archives.

Now located in the recently expanded 229 West 43rd Street
building, rather than the offices after which Times Square was
named, the headquarters of the New York Times is a hive of

145

Opposite: Map of Harlem

journalistic activity. If the investigators come here before attending
Elias’ funeral, in search of the reporter behind the article linking
his death to those of eight others (Carlyle Papers America #9),
then they are directed to the news department’s crime section
and to Miss Shosenburg’s neat and orderly desk. While she is
surprised to see them, Miss Shosenburg is secretly delighted to
be able to talk about the case with Elias’ friends, even more so
if they reveal that they were at the murder scene. If, however,
the investigators come to West 43rd Street after the funeral, at
Shosenburg’s invitation, she is openly pleased and more than a
little relieved that they took the time to come see her.
Shosenburg has already retrieved the relevant clippings
about the Adams’ murders from her scrapbook, so they
are ready to show the investigators. While the reports
concerning the first two bodies make no definite link
between them (despite the strange symbol carved into their
foreheads), by the third murder, connections were being
drawn, although the police seemed baffled by the deaths,
especially as no ties could be found between the victims
other than their visits to Harlem—hardly noteworthy,
considering how popular the area is after dark.
If asked, Shosenburg suspects that, initially at least, the fact
that the first bodies were found in different police precincts
meant that there was little coordination or sharing of information
between the various investigations. Even after everything was
transferred to Captain Robson of the 14th Precinct in Harlem,
there wasn’t much progress on the case until Hilton Adams was
arrested at the scene of the eighth murder. As far as she can tell,
Captain Robson ended up heading the investigation due to the
fact that most of the later corpses turned up either in Harlem
or on its fringes, bolstered by Dr. Lemming’s pronouncements
that an African death cult was involved.

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

MEETING MILLIE ADAMS

• Link: the offer of an introduction from Rebecca Shosenburg
(The New York Times, page 145).
• Link: mentioned to still be working on the case by Hilton
Adams (A Visit to Old Sparky’s House, page 150).

ON THE STREETS
For those wishing to use modern maps of New York to
navigate around Harlem, there have been a couple of
name changes since the 1920s: Lenox Avenue is now
also referred to as Malcolm X Boulevard, 7th Avenue is
known as Adam Clayton Powell Jr. Boulevard, and 8th
Avenue is Frederick Douglass Boulevard, while 125th
Street is Dr. Martin Luther King Jr. Boulevard.

Miss Shosenburg contacts the investigators via their place
of residence with a time and location to meet Millie Adams.
While the meeting is to take place in Harlem, it is not at the
Adams’ home, but at the Lafayette Theater, also known as
“The Beautiful House,” at 132nd Street and Seventh Avenue.
Millie Adams and Shosenburg are waiting for the
investigators under the theater’s marquee. Once everyone
has arrived, Millie Adams ushers the investigators into the
smart lobby, past the ticket booths and cloakrooms, and
through into the stalls. Various cleaners and other members
of staff smile and greet Mrs. Adams as she passes. They
also seem to know Miss Shosenburg.
The house lights are fully up in the main auditorium
as Millie shows the investigators to seats in the center of
the stalls. Cagey investigators may wish to check to make
sure that they are alone in the auditorium. As far as they
can tell, they are—unless, of course, the investigators have
already alerted N’Kwane and M’Dari to their investigations.
In that case, if the investigators fail a group Luck roll,
then a cult spy is lurking within earshot. If spotted with
a successful Hard Spot Hidden roll, a chase through the
theater and out onto the streets of Harlem might ensue
(as any spy does not hang around to engage in fisticuffs).

Keeper note: if the investigators have earned Lt. Poole’s
trust, then questioning him about this investigation
reveals that Captain Robson lobbied early on for the role
so he could crack down further on what he referred to as
“disruptive elements” in his precinct.
Although she has not been able to find any concrete evidence,
Shosenburg believes that Robson is at best incompetent and at
worst corrupt. She suspects he may be responsible for framing
Hilton Adams. Her theories support what Lt. Poole may have
told the investigators, both about the deaths and his suspicions
regarding his colleague (The New York Police, page 125).
Provided the investigators take her concerns about Hilton
Adams’ situation seriously and are willing to look into the
matter further, then Shosenburg offers to introduce them
to Millie Adams, Hilton’s wife (Meeting Millie Adams,
following). She also offers to convince Hilton Adams to
receive the investigators as visitors at Sing Sing, if they
would like to speak to him directly (A Visit to Old Sparky’s
House, page 150). With Adams’ execution looming ever
nearer, the investigators’ motives for looking into the case
are not important to Shosenburg. If there’s a chance they
can scare up something that could either prove Robson’s
corruption—thereby casting doubt on the safety of Adams’
conviction—or else discover the real culprit, she’ll take it.
Besides which, the story could make her career. If they
agree to either meeting, Shosenburg asks the investigators
to leave it with her; she’ll get back to them with times
and locations as soon as she can.
Keeper note: the meetings arranged by Shosenburg can take
place whenever the Keeper desires, allowing them to occur at
opportune moments in the unfolding investigation.

146

AMERICA
Devious Keepers may wish to frame the investigators for
her death; M’Dari sees a way to rid himself of both her
and them in one fell swoop (a particularly pulpy option).
Alternatively, he may decide to reincarnate her as one of
his ciimba guardians (Guards of the Sacrificial Chamber,
page 157).

PULP: CAUGHT IN THE CROSSFIRE
If a chase does occur, it could cause all sorts of
complications for the investigators, particularly if they are
predominantly white. The cultist is not stupid (use Cultist
#6 from the Average Bloody Tongue Cultist (NYC),
page 170) and knows that, under such circumstances,
screaming for help is the best way for him to make his
escape. A young African-American man being chased
by a white “gang” is going to draw attention and cause
a crowd of local defenders to gather. The investigators
may well find themselves relying on their powers of
persuasion rather than their fists to extricate themselves
from the situation.
If the police are attracted to the scene, at the Keeper’s
discretion, then the investigators could find themselves
at the center of a small-scale riot as the police leap to
their defence, no questions asked. The ramifications
with respect to their attempts to get justice for Hilton
Adams and Jackson Elias could be severe—a penalty
die to all social interaction rolls when dealing with
the Harlem community (in addition to any penalty
the Keeper might already be applying to illustrate the
distrust of “outsiders”)—as word quickly gets round
about what’s happened. On the other hand, if the
police are already aware of the investigators, having
been tipped off by M’Dari, then they may decide to
exercise restraint in the hope that the residents will
take care of the matter for them or, for once, assist the
locals in dealing with these obvious troublemakers. The
Keeper may also wish to inflict a Sanity roll (0/1D4
loss) on all those involved if the riot results in the death
of one or more innocent bystanders.

Millie Adams is understandably guarded when it comes to
speaking with the investigators. If any of them are police
officers, it requires a successful Hard Charm or Persuade
roll to coax her story from her. If they are not, talking to her
about Elias and their investigations so far convinces her that
they may be able to prove her husband’s innocence. If asked
why the meeting is taking place at the theater, she replies
that she’s worked there as a musician and singer since it
opened. Until she took the measure of the investigators, she
wasn’t going to invite them into her home.

What Millie Adams Knows

Although her husband didn’t confide to her everything he
knew about the deaths and disappearances in Harlem over
the last few years, he did tell her one or two of his suspicions.
She has since attempted to confirm those for herself.
Provided they gain her trust, as the conversation
progresses, Millie asks the investigators to make a deal:
if they agree to try and exonerate her husband, she will
provide them with information that may lead to the true
killers. Now that Hilton’s friends have apparently given
up the fight through fear and intimidation, she has no
one else to turn to, and she knows the authorities don’t
take her suspicions seriously.
• Hilton grew concerned when Harlem locals began to
disappear several years ago. As the number of disappearances
increased, Hilton turned to a group of friends from the
saloon where they all hung out at (Teddy’s, two blocks over
from the Lafayette Theater), all of whom had served in the
Harlem Hellfighters. They began organising patrols to try
and protect members of the community, alongside trying
to find out who was responsible, after the police at the 14th
Precinct refused to take the matter seriously.

Keeper note: whether or not the investigators spot an
eavesdropper, Millie Adams is now in danger. If the
investigators spot and chase a cultist before Millie has a
chance to talk to them, she flees home and writes what she
knows, posting it to Shosenburg at the New York Times,
ensuring her knowledge is preserved should anything
happen to her. Thus, this act enables the investigators to
garner most of the information in the What Millie Adams
Knows section, but without the opportunity to ask her
questions. If they don’t spot the eavesdropper, then Millie’s
fate is sealed, and she will be dead before the week is out.

Keeper note: Millie can direct investigators wanting to
Hilton’s Friends (The Good Friends of Hilton Adams?,
page 149).”
• Even after the mutilated bodies started appearing
a couple of years back, the police still refused to do
anything, claiming gang violence and street robberies
gone wrong as the cause, despite the pronouncements
regarding an African death cult by “some old crackpot

147

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

•

•

•

•

•

About Ju-Ju House
If questioned further about Ju-Ju House, Millie confirms
that the shop is an African art emporium in Ransom Court
run by one Silas N’Kwane (Horror at Ju-Ju House, page
154). Since she started watching the premises after her
husband’s arrest, she has noted that, once a month, usually
between 20–30 people file into the shop in the early hours of
the morning. The timings coincide with when her husband
and his friends used to go out on patrol. The attendees are
a mixed bunch; some she swears are tramps and lowlifes,
while others look like the sort of people her husband worked
with in construction (i.e., blue collar workers). She didn’t
personally recognize any of them, though.
Once, Mrs. Adams saw crates going into Ransom Court
on a night when there was a gathering, about an hour or
so before the “guests” arrived. She concedes that there
might just be a very exclusive speakeasy in the basement
beneath Ju-Ju House (after all, there are a lot of similar
establishments in basements all across the city) and that
the crates might merely contain supplies of alcohol, but
she has a horrible feeling that, given the disappearances
also seem to tie to gathering nights, there’s a more sinister
explanation for the crates’ contents. She has also seen
police detectives going into Ransom Court during daylight
hours—not necessarily unusual in itself, but it could be to
pick up payoffs from Silas N’Kwane, if the 14th Precinct
is as corrupt as her husband suspected.
If any of the investigators point out the danger in what
she’s doing, Millie looks distinctly exasperated. She replies
that she has more sense than to approach the shop directly
and has never physically entered Ransom Court, let alone
Ju-Ju House. Once, she managed to get into the tenement
building overlooking the court, but she admits that was
the one time she was almost spotted by one of the people
hanging around in the alleyway, so she hasn’t tried that since.
During the conversation, a successful Hard Psychology
roll detects there’s something she isn’t saying. Further
coaxing (and a successful Hard Charm or Persuade roll)
encourages her to reveal that she fears that, if the matter
isn’t resolved soon, not only will her husband end up dead,
but that she too may become a victim, either fitted up by
the police or murdered by the real killers. But, while there’s
still a chance, she has to keep trying. She knows Hilton
would do the same for her if the situation was reversed.

with too much time on his hands” (Robson’s description
of Mordecai Lemming).
Hilton and his friends focused on the death cult link and
managed to turn up a reference in the New York Public
Library about some long-dead cult from East Africa. Hilton
didn’t tell her what it was called, and the police confiscated
the journal in which he kept all his notes regarding the case.
Millie remembers her husband using a strip of red cloth
as a bookmark in the journal. She suspects it had some
significance, but the police also confiscated it.
The group’s continued investigations didn’t go down well
with the police, who warned Hilton about the dangers of
stirring up trouble. Pressure was also applied to a couple
of Hilton’s friends by their employers; members of the
conservative old guard who were concerned that the
group’s activities would only bring Harlem into disrepute,
especially all the cult nonsense, which (as far as they were
concerned) just played into white perceptions of black people
as uneducated savages. This was further backed up by their
respective church elders in a series of pointed sermons.
Despite Hilton's reticence to include her in his inquiries,
he did mention that he thought there was a cult operating
in Harlem, and that they were probably paying the police
to turn a blind eye to their activities, just like all the other
criminal gangs did.
One night, shortly before his arrest, Millie overheard her
husband mention the name “Ju-Ju House” to his friend
Needham Johnson, who works as a reporter at the New
York Age.
Her husband was arrested in September 1924 after he was
found standing over the body of a middle-aged white man
in a dingy alley not far from the Harlem branch of the
New York Public Library. The police, allegedly alerted by
the dying man’s screams, claimed to have seen Hilton throw
away a bloody knife when confronted. The knife—Hilton’s
army-issue bolo knife—was reportedly recovered from the
scene and formed the crux of the prosecution’s case against
him, although Millie never remembers her husband taking
the knife out with him when he went on patrol.

If any of the investigators are members of the legal profession,
or versed in the law, asking Millie about any ongoing appeals
in her husband’s case brings about a heavy sigh. Their
neighborhood and the patrons at Teddy’s raised money to
help pay for Hilton Adams’ defense, as the New York Legal
Aid Society judged that his case wasn’t worthy enough to
qualify for one of their attorneys. They had only enough to
pay for the trial and one appeal. The money’s all gone now,
so it’s only a matter of time before her husband is escorted to
the electric chair. Unless, of course, the investigators can find
something to clear his name.

Next Steps

Providing the investigators make a good impression on
Millie Adams and she judges them to be sincere in their
desire to help, she also offers to convince Hilton to speak
with them, on top of Rebecca Shosenburg’s efforts in that
regard. If, on the other hand, the investigators fail to win

148

AMERICA
work, in Art Mills’ case). Rebecca Shosenburg also knows
the group, although she has met them only once or twice and
feels unable to make any introductions. Millie is unwilling
to go with the investigators as she is still angry at the group
for abandoning her husband, even though part of her fully
understands why. For this step, the investigators are alone.
Teddy’s Saloon is a well-attended workingmen’s club, not
far from the Lafayette Theater. Strangers, or those known
to be troublemakers, have to convince the large doorman
that they should be allowed in (use the Murray Hill
Hotel Doorman’s profile, page 167, as required). Teetotal
during the day, Teddy’s does have a basement speakeasy
for the regulars after hours. The interior is plainly though
comfortably furnished, with tables and booths around the
walls. The central tables can be removed for parties and
dances, and there is a small stage at the far end of the
single room. A bar lines one wall, serving sodas and hot
drinks, as well as a limited food menu. The lighting is
adequate, although the thick pall of cigarette and cigar
smoke clouds the atmosphere, aided and abetted by the
grubby front window.
As long as the investigators go to Teddy’s at the end
of the work day, asking at the bar for any of the men
named by Millie Adams results in one of two responses:

Millie’s confidence, they leave the Lafayette Theater without
some valuable clues in their quest for those behind Elias’
murder, as well as lacking her recommendation to her
husband. On top of that, if they have fumbled or failed a
pushed roll during any of their interactions with Millie,
any subsequent social skill checks that take place during an
audience with her husband are subject to a penalty die, as she
forewarns him of their behavior. Hilton Adams still agrees to
see them, but mostly to assure himself that the investigators
aren’t part of a police plot to entrap his wife.

THE GOOD FRIENDS
OF HILTON ADAMS?

• Link: mentioned by Millie Adams (What Millie Adams
Knows, page 147)

Millie Adams can supply the investigators with the names
and descriptions of those who formed the core of her
husband’s investigative team: Needham Johnson, Douglas
Fells, Art Mills, and Jackie Wallace (see Dramatis Personae:
America, page 113). She also adds that the best place to
find them will be at Teddy’s Saloon, where they like to chew
the fat after work before heading home for dinner (or off to

Meeting the good friends of Hilton Adams

149

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

feigned indifference (if the investigators are strangers or
don’t buy anything), or a slight nod in the direction of
a booth over from the bar (if the investigators are wise
enough to say they’re trying to help Hilton Adams). While
the Bloody Tongue has eyes and ears in many places,
it has never managed to infiltrate Teddy’s, so such an
admission is unlikely to alert the wrong people (although
the investigators aren’t to know that).
The four men are huddled in their booth, drinking coffee.
If the investigators take the time to observe them before
approaching, they can hear them occasionally chatting
about the horrendous weather and how difficult it’s making
life at the moment. Mostly though, the four men sit in
the comfortable silence of old friends. If the investigators
arrive earlier in the day (say, lunchtime), then the men are
there, eating. At any other time during the day, only Art
Mills is ensconced in the booth.
The meeting is unlikely to be a smooth one: each
of the men feels a deep sense of guilt at abandoning
their friend to his fate, and each has his reasons for
wanting to stay out of any further investigation, be it job
security, family safety, or loss of hope. A successful Hard
Psychology roll reveals the group’s unhappiness, which
may be the lever the investigators need to get them to
talk. Fumbling or failing a pushed roll here, however, is
likely to get the investigators tossed out of the saloon, as
the investigators manage to say exactly the wrong thing,
causing Johnson to explode.
Provided that the investigators don’t offend the men,
they have little more to offer than what Millie Adams has
already told them, besides the following.

that of a white police captain. Besides, as they’ve already
mentioned, they have no physical evidence to back up their
side of the story.
Although the men are not openly hostile to the investigators,
as long as they are not provoked, the atmosphere throughout
the conversation is likely to be tense. They have no objection
to the investigators looking further into the case. As they
go to leave, Jackie Wallace quietly points out that the
investigators need to realize that it’s a cruel, cruel thing to
raise a woman’s hopes if they have no intention of seeing it
through to the bitter end, whatever that may be; justice isn’t
only for the dead.
Keeper note: some of Adams’ friends and associates may,
understandably, resent having outsiders barging in and
attempting to sort out their problems, but they realize that
they can use the investigators as a tool to solve the current
stalemate with limited risk to themselves. In their eyes,
unless one of the investigators is from Harlem or has close
personal ties to the neighborhood, they are expendable
when it comes to taking on Captain Robson, driving out the
Bloody Tongue, and freeing Hilton Adams. When dealing
with locals, the investigators are on their own unless they can
come up with a solution that permits the locals to take part
without endangering themselves or their families, at which
point they will give the investigators what support they can.

A VISIT TO
OLD SPARKY’S HOUSE

• Link: where Hilton Adams is incarcerated (Carlyle Papers
America #9).
• Link: Lt. Poole mentions that Adams was arrested for a
number of murders that resembled that of Jackson Elias
(The New York Police, page 125).
• Link: meetings with Rebecca Shosenburg, Millie Adams,
and Adam’s former friends (The New York Times, page 145;
Meeting Millie Adams, page 146; and The Good Friends
of Hilton Adams?, page 149 respectively).

• After a while, they figured out there was a pattern forming
regarding the disappearances: usually two people, sometimes
more, at the same time every month.
• Once, Hilton managed to stumble across someone being
attacked when out on patrol and drove the attacker off. In
the fight, he tore a strip of red cloth from some sort of weird
mask the attacker was wearing. It wasn’t long after that that
the police starting making their threats.
• There is no physical evidence besides that piece of cloth, which
the police took. Everything else was purely observation and
conjecture, all recorded in Hilton’s journal; also taken by the
police. They probably don’t even exist anymore.
• Hilton was convinced he’d tracked down a new lead,
something to do with Ju-Ju House, but he was arrested
before he could confirm his suspicions.
• There’s no point going to the newspapers with tales of police
harassment and brutality, as well as some sort of cover-up.
Everyone is already well aware that the police are paid to
turn a blind eye, and no one is going to take their word over

Built over the course of three years (1825–1828) by prisoners
at gunpoint from New York’s second prison, Auburn, Sing
Sing became the city’s third penitentiary, as well as being the
origin of the term “going up the river” for being incarcerated.
Built next to the village of Sint Sinck (or Sinck Sinck), from
which it gets its name, on the east bank of the Hudson River,
the prison lies approximately 30 miles (50 km) north of New
York City. So bad was the prison’s reputation that, in 1902,
Sint Sinck changed its name to Ossining to distance itself
from the facility on its doorstep.

150

AMERICA
face into the Death House’s interior courtyards. Adams
is waiting for them, seated on the edge of his bed, as near
to the bars of his cell as he can get.
“I would shake your hand,” he says, with a wry smile,
“but I don’t think that would go down too well, eh, Mr.
Brunton?” Brunton merely grunts a not-unfriendly reply
before taking a few steps back to give them a little “privacy.”
Though polite, Adams’ attitude is skeptical. He’s sorry
to hear that there’s been another murder, and he knows
there will be more if the perpetrators aren’t stopped. He’ll
answer the investigators’ questions—after all, they’ve come
a long way to see him. Depending on what the investigators
talk to Adams about, he can impart some or all of the
following in the time allowed.

Originally run under the brutal Auburn system,
conditions in Sing Sing began to change during the early
20th century, particularly under the wardenship of Lewis
E. Lawes, who took control in January 1920. As well as
instituting a sweeping building program to replace the
original overcrowded and crumbling brick cell house, Lawes
also brought in educational and recreational programs
meant to reform and retrain his inmates, rather than just
punish them. Despite his reforming agenda, Lawes still
presided over the execution of 303 prisoners during his
21-year tenure there.
The jail electrocuted its first prisoner in 1891 in the
specially built “Death House,” where death row inmates
were kept in a stone prison-within-a-prison. The electric
chair, nicknamed “Old Sparky,” electrocuted three other
men that day. By 1916, all of New York State’s executions
took place at Sing Sing, prompting the construction of
a new Death House to begin in 1920; two years later, it
went into operation.
The prison can be reached from New York by train (nearest
station: Ossining; the railway line cuts straight through the
prison), road, or boat. Assuming the investigators agree to
meet with Hilton Adams, Rebecca Shosenburg organizes
a visit at the first available opportunity, probably a couple
of days after they’ve spoken to Millie Adams. If the Keeper
wishes it, or the investigators do, then Shosenburg can
accompany them to the prison.
The Death House at Sing Sing sits in the lower corner
of the prison, next to the river. Once the investigators
have been searched for weaponry at the main entrance
(anything that could be classed as such is confiscated for
the duration of their visit), they are then escorted down
the hill and over the railroad tracks to the Death House by
a taciturn prison guard. They are greeted at the two-story
brick entrance building by George Brunton, the subwarden
in charge of the facility (see Minor NPCs, page 117; note
that no statistics are provided for Brunton).

• He suspects the disappearances have been going on for years,
although how long, he couldn’t say. He only started noticing
them a little after he got back from the war in 1919, but
they could have been going on for a lot longer than that.
• Once they’d spotted something was going on, it became clear
that the disappearances took place on a monthly basis. They
all took place during the dark of the moon—which makes
perfect sense if you’re going to abduct someone.
• The murders, on the other hand, didn’t appear to have
any fixed schedule; they seemed to happen in response to
something specific. He’s certain the last one (well, the eighth,
he apologises) was carried out just to frame him.
• It wasn’t his knife that was used to murder the victim; he
had more sense than to take his bolo with him on patrol,
knowing that the previous victims had all been killed with
a large knife. Instead, he carried his army-issue revolver for
protection. He insists that the knife was taken when the
police searched his tenement rooms, and later covered with
the victim’s blood to secure his conviction.
Keeper’s note: the bolo, issued to American infantry units,
is very similar in size and shape to the cult’s favored weapon,
the panga, which only made it even easier for Robson to
frame Adams for the murder.

Meeting Hilton Adams

As he escorts them through the entrance building to Hilton
Adams’ cell block, Brunton explains to the investigators that
they have 30 minutes to speak with Adams through the
bars of his cell. They may not exchange any items with the
prisoner; any attempts to do so will result in the interview’s
termination and their removal from the premises.
Adams’ cell is cramped, with just enough room for a
lavatory, a metal-framed bed, and a small desk and chair.
There is no external window; the only natural light entering
the cell comes from the windows across the corridor that

• He did discover another pattern, shortly before he was
arrested: none of the abductions or murders took place within
a two block radius of West 137th Street, between Lenox
Avenue and the Harlem River, apart from the one that saw
him arrested. Beyond that clear area, the abductions fanned
out in a rough circle for about a mile west of the Harlem River.
• The locations where the bodies were found were more spread
out and sometimes crossed over into the neighboring police
precincts.

151

CHAPTER 2
HIlton Adams, an innocent man

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

Keeper note: Elias’ scene of death breaks the pattern by
being well beyond Harlem. If mentioned to Adams, he
suggests the cult were desperate enough to act outside their
usual range.

Needham Johnson knew about his suspicions regarding Ju-Ju
House, he never got chance to tell the others about M’Dari.
If the investigators have yet to meet with Millie Adams,
then Hilton mentions that she may have gathered additional
evidence, despite his pleas to her to leave well alone. If
the investigators saw the cultists who murdered Elias and
describe their headgear to Adams, he confirms that their
masks sound very similar to the one worn by the attacker he
managed to chase off. Whoever killed Elias is undoubtedly
behind the disappearances and deaths in Harlem.
Even if they have more to discuss, Brunton ends the interview
after exactly 30 minutes, although he is most apologetic. As he
points out, they can always come back another time, provided
Adams hasn’t had his date with Old Sparky.
If the Keeper wishes, and if the investigators haven’t yet
alerted M’Dari to their presence, then one of the guards at
Sing Sing feeds back to Robson that a bunch of strangers
have been to see Adams. This could prompt a visit from
Robson’s boys (Bully Boys in Blue, following). Even if they
have already tipped off M’Dari and Robson to their existence,
the visit to Sing Sing could herald an escalation in the
cult’s attempts to warn the investigators away from the case.

• Following on from Mordecai Lemming’s pronouncements
in the press about an African death cult, Hilton's friends
found mention of something called the “Cult of the Bloody
Tongue” in the New York Public Library that allegedly had
links back to Kenya. The only place in the area that had ties
with Africa was an emporium called Ju-Ju House, run by a
man called Silas N’Kwane, which received regular shipments
of goods from there. Even though the shop had been there for
years, something about the place that gave Hilton the creeps.
• He didn’t manage much surveillance of Ju-Ju House before
the police came for him, but he did follow a muscular,
shaven-headed African man, probably in his late 30s and
early 40s, from there up to a coffee shop on 139th Street
and Sixth Avenue, above Fat Maybelle’s speakeasy. No one
seemed keen to talk to him about the man, and several
warned him to walk away, but he did get a name: Mukunga
M’Dari. He’s certain that that was when whoever was behind
the murders decided he was becoming a threat. Although

152

AMERICA

BULLY BOYS IN BLUE

Meeting Captain Robson

Depending on how subtle the investigators are in their
inquiries around Harlem, they may have largely avoided
attracting police attention. However, if they visit Ju-Ju
House prior to speaking to Rebecca Shosenburg, Millie
Adams, or any of Hilton Adams’ friends, or if they manage
to cause a small-scale riot in front of the Lafayette Theater
(Caught in the Crossfire, page 147), then it’s only a matter
of time before Captain Robson sends some of his men to
have a quiet word.
The first approach is from a small group of uniformed
officers (one per investigator; use the Beat Cop profile,
page 163). If the investigators are largely white, then the
patrolmen show a degree of restraint, but the message is
clear: people trying to stir up unrest in this neighborhood
will be dealt with. If the investigators are from different
ethnicities or not American, then things are likely to get
physical. While the police aren’t trying to kill them, they
are trying to make a point: back off. The presence of women
investigators makes little difference to their tactics. There
is a genuine danger of arrest here for the investigators if
they fight back, although that might have its benefits,
seeing as it would bring them directly into contact with
Captain Robson.
If their “little chat” isn’t seen to have done the trick, then
Robson sends a few of his detectives to have another word
(use the Junior Detective profile, page 163). Their tactics
are pretty much the same, although the threats go from
being vague to quite specific (as Robson has had time to
dig up some information on who the investigators are in
the meantime). Depending on what happened when they
found Elias’ body, threats could include suggesting that it
wouldn’t be too hard to convince Lt. Poole that they were
behind their friend’s death, for example. Or, in tried-andtested fashion, if any of the investigators are from New
York, then their families make a good soft target as well.

Should the investigators obtain an audience with Captain
Robson, either through walking into the 14th Precinct and
asking to speak with him or by getting themselves arrested
during the course of their investigations in Harlem, then
Robson is, initially at least, all smiles and charm. He quickly
presses to find out what they know as subtly as possible but
begins to show his true nature if he feels they are messing
with him or refusing to answer his questions truthfully.
A successful Credit Rating roll identifies that the captain
is far too well dressed for a man on his official salary, which
lends support to Poole and Shosenburg’s suspicions that
Robson is on the take.
Asking Robson to see the cultists who murdered Elias (if
any of them were apprehended and they know Robson had
them transferred) is greeted with an emphatic negative. If
asked why, Robson quotes procedure, even if one or more
of the investigators is a policeman or attorney to whom
he could extend professional courtesy. If that doesn’t put
them off, he grins wickedly. “Let’s just say they had a
little accident on arrival and aren’t in the best of health
for receiving visitors,” he says.
If it’s early days and the investigators have yet to really
tackle the cult at Ju-Ju House or are going around asking
questions about Hilton Adams, Robson makes a point of
warning them off, saying he’s only trying to look out for
their safety, as “bad things” can happen in Harlem. The
point made, he lets the investigators go.
If the investigators do have concrete physical evidence of
what is happening in the basement at Ju-Ju House (Dealing
With the Cult, page 159), they may press Robson with
a successful Persuade or Intimidate roll to come clean
about the affair. He insists he knew nothing about what
was going on down there—he’d assumed it was a speakeasy
“like everyone else” and was happy to look the other way
in return for a few dollars. He may even be convinced to
set up a raid on Ju-Ju House to redeem himself. Only
under the most extreme circumstances will he admit to
fitting up Hilton Adams for the murders. He knows his
men won’t squeal, either; such is the loyalty he commands.

Keeper note: if the investigators have had chance to carry out
any surveillance of Ju-Ju House before this (without getting
caught), then at least one of the detectives who comes to put
the frighteners on them has been seen leaving Ju-Ju House
stuffing something into the breast pocket of his suit.
Finally, if the investigators are still poking their noses in where
they’re not wanted, they are arrested on trumped-up charges
(as mentioned in Meeting Erica Carlyle, page 132, mopery
is always a useful one) and are dragged into the 14th Precinct
for an interview with Captain Robson himself. Alternatively,
if they’ve been to see Hilton Adams, Robson is keen to have
them brought in to find out what they know.

153

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E HORROR AT JU-JU HOUSE
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

Keeper note: due to the level of police hostility experienced
in this part of Harlem, any investigators who are themselves
members of the police are subject to a penalty die on all their
social interaction rolls when dealing with the area’s residents.
If any of the investigators have already been involved in a riot
elsewhere in Harlem (Caught in the Crossfire, page 147)
then they, too, suffer a penalty die. Police characters suffer
from a maximum of one penalty die, regardless of whether
they were involved in the riot.

As evidence mounts, all leads concerning the murders and
disappearances seem to point to Ju-Ju House. What secrets
are held within, and how will the investigators fare when
they venture inside?
• Link: managed by Silas N’Kwane, whose name the
investigators found on the reverse of Arthur Emerson’s
business card (Carlyle Papers America #5).
• Link: recommended by Mordecai Lemming as a good
place to inquire about African death cults (Meeting Dr.
Lemming, page 136).
• Link: mentioned by both Hilton and Millie Adams
as a place of interest linked to the ongoing series of
disappearances and murders in Harlem (Meeting Hilton
Adams and What Millie Adams Knows, pages 151 and
147, respectively).

The Pawnshop
If talking to the tenement residents isn’t working, or if the
investigators prefer to observe for themselves, they have two
options: they can find a convenient window from which to
watch (the tenants say nothing as long as the investigators
aren’t disruptive or obviously doing something to attract
adverse attention), or they can attempt to use the abandoned
pawn shop as a base from which to spy on Ju-Ju House.
Those who choose to use the empty pawnshop first have
to figure out how to get into it. They could try through the
boarded-up front door (a successful Locksmith or STR
roll). Because the entrance is on the main street, any noisy
approach is likely to attract someone’s notice (a successful
group Luck roll avoids unwanted attention). Alternatively,
they can attempt to enter the building from Ransom Court
through the back door, which is padlocked from the courtside
(a successful Locksmith roll or Hard STR roll). Timing is
everything here, although after dark on most nights should
give the investigators the privacy they need.
The interior of the pawnshop is dusty and bitterly cold.
There are frequent scuttling noises and obvious signs of rodent
visitors, as well as rows of empty glass cabinets and shelves.
The light switches also don’t appear to be working. While
it is undercover and, therefore, better than being out on the
street, this isn’t a comfortable place to hide by any means.
From within the pawnshop, the back door may be opened
slightly to allow a narrow view of the entrance to Ju-Ju House.
There is a danger in using the pawnshop for watching
Ransom Court: every day or night the door is open risks the
investigators being discovered, particularly by any police or
cult visitors. If a cultist or police officer succeeds at a Spot
Hidden roll (the difficulty level adjusted by the Stealth
of the investigator observing through the cracked door),
then they are aware they are being spied on. N’Kwane is
informed immediately, and he passes the information on
to Mukunga M’Dari, potentially triggering a confrontation
with either the cultists or the police, as the Keeper wishes.
If an investigator is foolish enough to be discovered
watching Ju-Ju House on their own, then there is a very
real danger they may end up joining the ranks of M’Dari’s
ciimba or become the chakota’s next meal.

This African art emporium is in Harlem, at 1 Ransom Court,
a cluttered alley off West 137th Street, east of Lenox Avenue.
This short alley opens into a 20 foot (6 m) square court. The
only doors from the court are those of Ju-Ju House and the
back door of an abandoned pawnshop that fronts onto 138th
Street. On meeting nights, three cultists sprawl in the court
up until the ritual begins, posing as winos and acting as
guards (use Average Bloody Tongue Cultists (NYC), page
170). Lookouts at other times are at the Keeper’s discretion.
Keeper note: depending on when the investigators get
round to tackling Ju-Ju House, the dark of the moon falls on
January 24 and 25, 1925, meaning they may or may not get
to interrupt a rite in progress.

CASING THE JOINT

Providing the investigators decide to take a subtle approach,
rather than just barging in, there are several ways they can
gather information on Ju-Ju House and those who visit it.
Asking the Locals
Crowded tenements surround Ransom Court and many
windows overlook it; one of the buildings must be that
mentioned by Millie Adams (What Millie Adams Knows,
page 147). If the investigators interview the residents, they
learn that, once a month, strange people and foreigners go
into the shop very late at night; odd noises are also heard at
those times. Sometimes, there is more than one meeting a
month, but fewer people attend those and there doesn’t seem
to be a regular pattern to when they happen.

154

AMERICA
What the Investigators See

• The second is the docks on the Hudson River, not far from
Emerson Imports, where M’Dari is employed.
• The third location is a shabby East Side room on 129th
Street. Should the investigators decide to break in when
M’Dari is elsewhere, then the room contains a sleeping
mat, a few clothes, and a number of Kikuyu ceremonial
items, including masks, shields, and wooden carvings; a
successful Spot Hidden roll reveals three vials of a strange
liquid hidden in a wooden box on which is carved a threelegged monster with a massive tentacle in place of a face.
A successful Cthulhu Mythos roll identifies the carving as
a crude representation of the Bloody Tongue and the vials
as Space Mead (one of the ingredients needed later in the
campaign to take care of the Girdle of Nitocris; Destroying
the Girdle of Nitocris, page 363, Egypt).

Unless the investigators take their time in focusing their
attention on Ju-Ju House, it is unlikely that they will have
the chance to observe one of the monthly rituals. Depending
on how blatant the investigators have been in their inquiries,
there may be a special meeting convened to discuss what
should be done about them, giving the investigators a “lucky”
chance to see unusual numbers of people trooping into Ju-Ju
House in the early hours of the morning for themselves.
During the Day
Only a few people wander in and out of the emporium during
its official hours of operation. They are mostly AfricanAmerican and usually spend around 10–15 minutes in the
shop before leaving again, occasionally with a parcel of some
description. At the Keeper’s discretion, the investigators
may be lucky enough to see a delivery arrive from Emerson
Imports. If so, these crates contain no Mythos-related items,
just some interesting fetishes, masks, and instruments.
There are three people of note that the investigators
see during their daylight vigil. One is a smartly-dressed
white man in his mid-20s. A successful Spot Hidden
roll identifies that he is carrying a gun underneath his
suit jacket. He is inside for only a few minutes and can
be seen tucking something, which looks suspiciously like
a well-stuffed envelope, into his inside jacket pocket as
he leaves. The investigators will recognize the man the
next time they see him (if they haven’t met him already):
he is one of Captain Robson’s underlings, here to collect
the weekly payoff.
The second is a short, elderly African-American man
with very little hair, dressed in an old-fashioned suit. This
is the shop’s owner, Silas N’Kwane, who apparently only
ever leaves the building at lunchtime and for a little while
after closing to eat dinner at a nearby diner.
The third matches the description of a muscular, shavenheaded African man given to them by Hilton Adams:
Mukunga M’Dari. If the investigators decide to follow
M’Dari, provided he doesn’t spot them, the high priest
of the Bloody Tongue leads the investigators to one of
three locations.

If M’Dari spots the investigators following him, he does not
react in any way that might alert their suspicion. Instead,
he contacts Captain Robson as soon as he is able and asks
him to deal with the issue (Bully Boys in Blue, page 153).
If this has already proven ineffective, M’Dari organizes for
a little kidnapping to take place. He chooses the smallest or
apparently most vulnerable of the investigators as the target
and sends six cultists to abduct them at the first sensible
opportunity (either when the investigstor is alone or with
a maximum of one other investigator). The target requires
a Hard Spot Hidden roll to realize they are being stalked
and may then attempt to get away. If they are caught, they
are nailed into a waiting crate and taken straight to the
basement of Ju-Ju House (The Basement, page 157).
After Hours
If, one night, the investigators are fortunate enough to
witness cultists arriving for a meeting or ritual, then the
details of what they see are as described in Rites of the
Bloody Tongue at Ju-Ju House (page 159). A successful
Spot Hidden roll identifies one of the men as someone they
saw shifting crates at Emerson Imports. If the investigators
saw Jackson Elias’ killers but didn’t manage to apprehend
them, then they are also witnessed entering the building.
If they have been inside the tiny shop, then anyone
watching dozens of cultists enter Ju-Ju House realizes
that there must be a connection to another room or a
basement large enough to hold all the visitors. Should
the investigators decide not to stake out Ju-Ju House but
have established friendly relations with the tenements’
residents, then that might yield a telephone call the next
time the neighbors notice a lot of people entering the
shop late at night.

• The first is Fat Maybelle’s, a sleazy speakeasy located in
the basement of a coffee shop at 139th Street and Sixth
Avenue—the same location Adams tracked him to. While
the clientele is fairly ethnically mixed, the majority are
African immigrants, most of whom have learned enough
about M’Dari to fear and avoid him. Some say that he has
the power, the ju-ju. They’re right.

155

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

ENTERING JU-JU HOUSE

on, they are now, and M’Dari sets a tail on them to see where
else they go and whom they talk to. The tail can be spotted
with a Hard Spot Hidden roll.
Provided the investigators visit during the shop’s hours
of operation, there is a 25% chance that a small number
of innocent customers are present when the investigators
arrive. The Keeper should call for a group Luck roll—if
this is unsuccessful, three cultists are also within shouting
distance. If no customers or cultists are present and N’Kwane
fears for his life, then he acts as described in his entry in
Dramatis Personae: America, page 117, fleeing into the
street screaming to be rescued from thieves and murderers.

Should the investigators take a more direct approach or blunder
into Ju-Ju House immediately after speaking with either
Arthur Emerson (Emerson Imports, page 138) or Mordecai
Lemming (Meeting Dr. Lemming, page 136), they find that
the shop-front on the court consists of a display window and a
glass door. Both are curtained so that the interior of the shop
cannot be seen. In the display window are genuine pieces of
African art. According to the handwritten card propped up in
the bottom corner of the window, shop hours are 9 a.m. to 5
p.m., closed on Sundays, with lunch between 12 and 1 p.m.
The shop interior is a mere 15 by 20 feet (4.5 by 6 m), and only
Silas N’Kwane tends it. Another room of similar dimensions,
where N’Kwane lives, is hidden behind a thick blanket at the
rear of the premises. The shop itself is dirty, dusty, and piled with
African tribal artifacts and bric-a-brac—devil masks, leatherheaded drums, stuffed model giraffes, carved wildebeests, dull
hand weapons intended for display, ivory warthogs, and so
on. The shop has an oppressive, uneasy feel to it, especially
if the investigators break in at night (see Breaking Into JuJu House, following). A successful Occult roll indicates that
certain fetishes are traditional components of ritual magic from
various African cultures. None of these souvenirs are of use to
the investigators without knowledge of African traditions. No
pieces related to the Cthulhu Mythos can be seen.
Behind a cluttered waist-high glass cabinet, which acts
as a counter, stands a shriveled old African-American man,
wrapped in a red blanket (a successful Anthropology roll
identifies the blanket as a shuka, usually worn by Maasai
tribesmen, which N’Kwane is not). He greets the investigators
with a toothless smile before introducing himself and asking
if there is anything in particular they are looking for. With
the benefit of a successful Spot Hidden roll, an investigator
notices a key hanging on a leather thong around his neck.

Breaking in to Ju-Ju House

Should the investigators wish to break into the emporium,
then there are two clear windows of opportunity, which
will be known to them if they have been observing the
shop: lunchtimes and an hour or two in the early evening
when N’Kwane leaves the premises in search of food.
This information may also be obtained from the residents
overlooking Ransom Court.
It takes a successful Locksmith or Hard STR roll to
open the shop’s front door. As before, if the investigators
fail a group Luck roll, then three cultists are within striking
distance and, depending on what instructions they’ve been
given by M’Dari, they are just as willing to inform the
police that there’s a robbery in progress as they are to take
care of matters for themselves.
Searching the shop reveals a ledger behind the counter
containing records of the shop’s income and expenses, including
weekly payments to “W.R.14” (obviously Walter Robson, but
hardly conclusive evidence). A successful Spot Hidden roll
while searching N’Kwane’s lodgings at the rear of the shop
reveals N’Kwane’s hideous Bloody Tongue mask, complete
with mummified human tongue (Sanity loss 0/1), along with
his panga, wrapped in a leopard skin beneath his bed.

Keeper note: the key around N’Kwane’s neck is for the deadbolt
lock on the door to the basement of Ju-Ju House. One way to
acquire it is a successful Hard Sleight of Hand roll, although
creative investigators are bound to think of others.

INTO THE DEPTHS

Although it may appear that Ju-Ju House consists purely of one
level, there is an entrance to a lower one—a trapdoor beneath
the rug behind the shop counter (a successful Spot Hidden
roll to notice the slight dip in the rug where the handle sits).
Beneath the rug is the inset steel handle of the trap door. Lifting
the trap door and laying it back on its hinges reveals a set of
stairs barely wide enough for one person. The steep stairs lead
downward nearly 20 feet (6m) and end in a corridor 10 feet (3
m) long that, in turn, stops at a stout door. The walls, ceiling, and
floor of this corridor are stone. The ceiling is 8 feet (2.5 m) above
the floor. Cut into the stone slabs are arcane tribal symbols; a
successful Anthropology roll identifies them as Kikuyu tribal

N’Kwane may or may not be aware of who the investigators
are, depending on where their investigations have taken them
up until this point and whether or not they were seen by Elias’
killers. If he does not know of them, then asking him about
African death cults immediately raises his suspicions, and
he carefully commits details of each investigator to mind to
relay to M’Dari later. If he does know of them, then he affects
a polite air of interest in whatever the investigators have to
say but insists on playing the innocent (although a successful
Psychology roll rumbles what he is up to). Regardless, if the
investigators weren’t on the cult’s list of people to keep an eye

156

AMERICA

lifts the block, which is so heavy that a combined STR
of 125 is necessary to shove it aside. For details of what’s
in the pit, see The Chakota, page 159.

The Basement

Guards of the Sacrificial Chamber
Four ciimba, the Kikuyu equivalent of zombies (see Ciimba,
page 173), wait in M’Dari’s alcove and watch over the
chamber. M’Dari created these strong creatures to guard his
treasures. All are mutilated victims of cult murders. With
their intestines dangling and their foreheads incised with the
cult rune, seeing them provokes a Sanity roll (0/1D8 loss). If
the investigators led cultists to Millie Adams and they killed
her, then she is one of the four ciimba on guard here (at the
Keeper’s discretion, her presence increases the Sanity loss by
+1D2 points).
If M’Dari is absent, the ciimba attack whomever enters
the chamber but pursue no farther than the base of the
stairs. The Keeper should choose the most dramatically
appropriate moment for them to attack. During rites, the
ciimba flank M’Dari as bodyguards.

The locked door at the end of the corridor leading down from
the shop above is oak reinforced with iron strips. Cut into the
wood are more symbols, this time unidentifiable. Obtaining
the key from around Silas N’Kwane’s neck is the easiest way to
open the door. Otherwise, two investigators can combine their
STR or SIZ against the STR 160 door, reducing the door’s
STR to decrease the difficulty per Physical Human Limits,
page 88, Call of Cthulhu Rulebook. Alternatively, a successful
Locksmith roll (or shooting out the lock) suffices. The hinges
of the door are on the outside; clever investigators might take
the door off its hinges, provided they have the appropriate
tools (screwdriver, hammer, and so on). If a rite is in progress,
the door is unlocked.
Beyond the door is the sacrificial chamber, with a 15 foot
(4.5 m) high ceiling. All surfaces are of dressed stone. A
successful Cthulhu Mythos roll shows that the obscure cult
symbols here are related to the Great Old Ones. Torches
in wall niches light the ceremonial chamber. A curtain
shields a small alcove opposite the door where M’Dari
likes to meditate upon the joys of serving his god. Large
African drums, accompaniment for the rituals, line the walls.
At one end of the room is a pit, some 8 feet (2.5 m)
diameter, covered by a thick stone block. A large winch

Items Within M’Dari’s Alcove
The alcove is 6 feet (1.8 m) square and curtained from the
sacrificial chamber. Along each side wall of the alcove stand
two ciimba, making a total of four. Most of M’Dari’s treasures
described below are wrapped together in a leopard’s hide and
placed against the back wall, well out of the way. The priest’s
robe and the lion’s claws hang on a peg on the rear wall,

157

Above: Map of Ju-Ju House

signs symbolizing evil. A kerosene lantern hanging from the
center of the corridor is lit if this is a meeting night; otherwise,
the corridor is pitch black.

CHAPTER 2

Donning the Mask of Hayama

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

with a modern-looking chronometer situated above them. If
M’Dari is present, he carries the scepter.

Huston’s headquarters in the City of the Great Race (The
Top Floor, page 499, Australia).

Bloody Tongue mask: M’Dari’s mask, almost identical to
N’Kwane’s but obviously better used, is also decorated with
a mummified human tongue.

Carved scepter: African in origin, carved from baobab wood
and inset with strange markings, perhaps recognizable to
someone who knows Language (Egyptian hieroglyphics).

High priest’s robe: a long feathered shawl of shimmering
color. A successful Science (Zoology) or Hard Natural
World roll identifies flamingo and kingfisher feathers, likely
from East Africa.

Keeper note: the markings mean “Nyambe, Thy Power
Mine.” The scepter grants ten additional magic points to
anyone grasping the scepter and calling on Nyambe. These
points dissipate in one hour if not used. Once used, the scepter
cannot provide more magic points until the next sunrise.
Nyambe is a western and southern African name for the
supreme god.

Lion’s claws: taken from a lion and fixed to glove-like
garments so that they may be worn. The construction is
sturdy enough that these two ritual items can be used as
weapons (see M’Dari’s profile, page 171, for details).

Headband of gray metal: various cuneiform-like characters
are scratched into the surface of this heavy, curiously warm
metal band.

Africa’s Dark Sects: the book is stamped “Property of the
Trustees of Harvard University.” See Appendix C: Tomes,
page 641.

Keeper note: a successful Cthulhu Mythos roll determines
not only that the writing is Senzar, the lost language of
Atlantis, but that the headband is some sort of protection
device related to Nodens, which, when worn, protects
against nightgaunts. No nightgaunt can hurt the wearer of
this headband unless the wearer first hurts a nightgaunt.

Mask of Hayama: a carved wooden African mask with four
hideous faces perched atop a thick, corded neck with a basketlike reed, feather, and fabric collar that hides the wearer’s face.
A successful Science (Botany) or Hard Natural World roll
establishes that it is constructed of no wood known on
Earth, although the feathers and fabrics are similar to
those in the high priest’s robes, but much older (see
Appendix D: Artifacts, page 650, for details).

A very modern marine chronometer: mounted on
the wall above the peg for the priest’s robes.
Keeper note: although it will mean little to the
investigators at this point, the chronometer is
identical to that found at Omar al-Shakti’s
Home (page 345, Egypt) and in Sir Aubrey’s
Workshop on Gray Dragon Island (page 590,
China). Eagle-eyed investigators note that the
chronometer is not reading the correct time;
a successful Know roll deduces it is showing
Greenwich Mean Time (GMT), some 4
hours ahead of New York time.

Keeper note: a successful Cthulhu Mythos
roll identifies that the mask represents a
combination of four Outer Gods: Nodens,
Azathoth, Shub-Niggurath, and Yog-Sothoth.
It was hewn by a Congolese high sorcerer
who led a Cthulhu cult; a successful
Archaeology or Anthropology roll
establishes its Congo origin.
Burnished copper bowl: etched with
unrecognizable runes and signs.

Locked cash box: the box can easily be
pried open with a screwdriver or knife,
or picked with a successful Locksmith roll.
Inside are various pieces of jewelry and personal
items taken from the cult’s victims. Several of
these are sufficiently distinctive and/or inscribed
that they could be used as evidence of the
cult’s involvements in the disappearances and
murders. In addition, any handouts stolen by
the cultists from Jackson Elias’ hotel room
(Room 410, page 118) can be found here.

Keeper note: a successful Cthulhu Mythos
roll identifies this ancient bowl as used in
conjunction with the spell Send Dream. That
spell is detailed in an Arabic scroll possessed
by the Penhew Foundation in London (Secret
Room (Basement), page 202, England).
Though the bowl appears to be made of copper,
its substance is alien to earthly science; the
cultists know it as “the copper from above.”
It is virtually identical to the bowl found in

158

AMERICA
call for a group Luck roll—with a failure, a single cultist
who is running late stumbles in after them, potentially
raising the alarm if they are not dealt with quickly.
As cultists reach the basement corridor, they doff their
clothes, putting on only their grotesque Bloody Tongue
headpieces, before entering the underground temple. There,
they chant and dance for hours, until M’Dari determines
that a proper frenzy has been reached. He then carves the
foreheads of the sacrificial victims, and pronounces an
invocation that distinctly includes the name “Nyarlathotep.”
The stone cap is raised from the chakota pit, and the
screaming victims are hurled to their doom. To attest their
faith, occasionally a cultist jumps with the victims and is
consumed as a willing sacrifice.
During the rites, M’Dari wears the feathered robe and
lion’s claws, which he uses to mark victims with the cult’s
rune. He also attacks with these claws if investigators
interrupt the proceedings. If physical efforts fail to kill or
capture intruding investigators, M’Dari may attempt to
summon a hunting horror to deal with them (only M’Dari
can do this, and he can summon only one per night).
With all the noise and frenzy, investigators opening
the door of the sacrificial chamber just enough to peek
in will not be noticed. Even if they open it all the way,
they won’t be noticed unless they leave it fully open for
more than a few minutes.
As might be imagined, the cult frowns upon uninvited
guests, and all of the cultists will pursue intruders, hoping
to capture and sacrifice them to their bleak god. The cultists
have no weapons in the sacrificial chamber, and they have a
hard time sorting out their clothes quickly enough to find
personal weapons among their garments. If the chase leads
up into the shop, they grab whatever comes to hand from the
stock of spears, knives, and clubs available. The chase might
then continue until the investigators are killed or caught,
or until they escape. Keep in mind that a howling mob of
naked cultists chasing (potentially) dapper investigators
down the middle of Lenox Avenue probably attracts the
attention of local residents and the police.

Two long, stout poles jut from the wall beside the alcove.
Dangling from the poles are leather thongs used to hold
the wrists of sacrificial victims. At least two victims must
be dedicated to the god of the Bloody Tongue during each
monthly rite. Next to the poles is a pile of packing crates and
a crowbar. Examining the crates reveals dried blood.

The Chakota

At the bottom of the 15 foot (4.5 m) deep pit is what the cult
knows as the chakota, the Spirit of Many Faces, worshiped
as a spirit subservient to the God of the Bloody Tongue.
The chakota is composed of dozens of human faces
set into a thickly cylindrical, worm-like mass of purpleveined muscle. The faces weep, shout, and cry out with
great woeful feeling. The chakota is somewhat mobile but
cannot escape its pit. It is about 8 feet (2.4 m) high and
6 feet (1.8 m) in diameter. The faces of the chakota are
those of its victims. Each new victim’s face appears about
two hours after ingestion. There is no significant limit to
the number of victims the thing can claim, for its bulk
can constantly grow. This dismaying entity is described on
page 162 of Characters and Monsters: America.
While in place, the stone block silences the crying voices
of the chakota, but once it is lifted or moved aside, horrible
shrieks fill the room. Once the stone block cover is removed,
the chakota expects to be fed within ten minutes. If it is
not, its faces redouble their wails, provoking a Sanity roll
(1/1D8 loss) and attracting the attention of anyone in the
shop above if the trapdoor is still open.

RITES OF THE BLOODY
TONGUE AT JU-JU HOUSE

Sacrificial rites are held beneath the shop once per month
during the dark of the moon, with an average of 30 cultists in
attendance. These rites require at least two sacrificial victims,
usually kidnapped from other portions of Harlem on the
evening of the sacrifice, and brought to the shop not long
before the rite starts. If an investigator has been kidnapped
for that purpose, they arrive earlier in the evening, captive
within a packing crate; otherwise, any captured investigators
are taken to the basement shortly after they are abducted.
The rest of the cultists begin arriving a little after 1 a.m., and
the rite begins around 1:30 a.m.
Although there are guards present as the cultists arrive,
during the rites themselves the court goes unwatched. Most
cultists enter the shop between 1:00 to 1:30 a.m. As the
guards know all the cultists, getting past them before the
ritual begins is almost impossible, but there is a chance
after they’ve descended into the basement themselves. If
the investigators enter after 1:30 a.m., the Keeper should

DEALING WITH THE CULT

The investigators have several options.

Breaking In
If the investigators break into Ju-Ju House at any time other
than during a cult ritual or meeting, they have a chance to
gather evidence of the cult’s illegal activities. Neither M’Dari
nor N’Kwane keep written records of cult members. The
investigators may have discovered the ledger detailing the
payments to Captain Robson, which could (theoretically) be

159

CHAPTER 2

Investigators will be taken to the basement and fed to the Chakota

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

Head On
The chances of the investigators successfully taking on the
whole cult on their own are slim, unless they resort to drastic
action, such as setting fire to the shop while the cultists are
inside. (The Keeper should make the ramifications clear,
particularly in terms of the potential for innocent lives lost,
as well as the destruction of any evidence that could save
Hilton Adams from the electric chair.) However, they may
be able to bring M’Dari to justice on their own, if luck and
good planning are on their side. If they don’t, then Hilton
Adams will be executed for the murders, and other cults
around the world become aware that dealing with Jackson
Elias has not lifted the threat to the Great Plan.

used as evidence of his collusion, although the link is slim, as
his name is never explicitly mentioned.
There are several items that the investigators could take,
although the larger and more obvious they are, the more
likely they are to be missed. Among these is N’Kwane’s
mask, which, while it doesn’t entirely match those worn by
the killers (if the investigators saw them), is close enough
to establish the link. There are also the personal items of
missing people in the locked cash box in M’Dari’s alcove,
as well as the various cult artifacts.
However, unless the investigators have a way of neutralising
the ciimba that doesn’t involve destroying them, then their
presence in the sacrificial chamber is going to be immediately
obvious the next time M’Dari goes down there (which he
does on a daily basis). The ciimba’s corpses are also useful
evidence, although the investigators may wish to make use
of the packing crates to transport them to either Captain
Robson or Lt. Poole (and hope they don’t get caught in
the act or they’re going to have a lot of explaining to do!).

CONCLUSION

Taking on the Cult of the Bloody Tongue in New York is
the obvious conclusion to this chapter. They may or may not
have saved the life of an innocent man and brought their
friend’s murderers to justice, but their lives will never be the
same again. They may or may not have saved the life of an
innocent man and brought their friend’s murderers to justice
but, regardless, their lives will never be the same again.
Armed mostly with clues, motivation, and a small inkling
of the vast conspiracy that confronts them, the investigators
now may sail to England, Egypt, Kenya, Australia, or China
to learn more and perhaps to stymie the plans of the Dark
God, backed up by the fortune that their late friend, Jackson
Elias, accumulated during his own travels.

Capturing Evidence
Photographs of the ciimba, the sacrificial chamber, and
the chakota—requiring a successful Hard Art/Craft
(Photography) skill roll due to the poor lighting—are also
a possibility. These might be taken on a ritual or meeting
night, although any use of a flash immediately alerts the
cultists to the investigators’ presence. Photographs taken at
other times suffer from the same issues as taking items from
the sacrificial chamber: if they destroy the ciimba, M’Dari
knows they’ve been here and will set events in motion to
deal with them before they can expose the cult’s practices.
Photographs of the detective collecting bribes may be of
use against Robson in conjunction with other evidence, and
snapshots of Elias’ killers entering the shop will certainly get
Lt. Poole’s attention.
Depending on what evidence the investigators manage
to get their hands on, they may be able to convince either
Robson or Poole to conduct a raid on Ju-Ju House on a
ritual night, if the timing is right. Depending on what they
have on Robson, he may tip off M’Dari before the fact. If he
does, M’Dari clears out everything essential, then sets fire to
the shop to destroy any remaining evidence, including the
chakota (after all, he can create another one if needs must).
The resulting conflagration is potentially disastrous for the
residents of the surrounding tenements, if not caught quickly.
At this point, any chance of exonerating Hilton Adams is
lost; however if Lt. Poole is brought in, an assault may be
mounted which potentially nets the cult and its ringleaders
(dead or alive), as well as providing enough evidence to free
Hilton Adams and take down Captain Robson.

PULP: GETTING OUT OF DODGE
In a pulp game, where the action stakes are high, there is
every chance that the investigators end up on the wrong
side of the law and have to get out of New York as quickly
as possible. While Carlton Ramsey can certainly smooth
over minor legal infractions, under these circumstances his
greatest use is to expedite the purchase of tickets to faroff destinations, getting the investigators off American soil
before they can be arrested. He will then work on their
behalf to defuse any ongoing situation with the police that
might result in the issuing of arrest warrants over the wire
to places like London, Australia, and Shanghai.

160

AMERICA

161

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

REWARDS

CHARACTERS AND
MONSTERS: AMERICA

Grant the players an investigator development phase when
leaving America. Time spent upon a boat or otherwise in
transit can heal injuries both physical and mental.

Statistical profiles are gathered here to enable the Keeper to
copy or print out these pages separately from the campaign to
provide a handy reference when running this chapter. NPCs,
monsters, and others are gathered by type or distinct groupings.

• For a walkthrough of the investigator development phase,
see Rewards of Experience: The Investigator Development
Phase, page 94, Call of Cthulhu Rulebook.
• For healing wounds, see Regular Damage Recovery and
Major Wound Recovery, page 121, Call of Cthulhu Rulebook.
• For regaining Sanity points by spending time with a backstory
element, see Self Help, page 167, Call of Cthulhu Rulebook.

Note: certain NPCs have alternative combat profiles, as well
as talents for pulp games.

THE POLICE

In addition, apply the following rewards to surviving
investigators.

Lt. Martin Poole, 43, homicide detective

• For solving Jackson Elias’ murder: +1D6 Sanity points.
• For exonerating Hilton Adams: +1D4 Sanity points.
• For exposing Captain Robson as a corrupt cop: +1D2 Sanity
points.
• If Mukunga M’Dari has been neutralized, grant each
investigator: +1D6 Sanity points.
• If the cultists have been broken up or eliminated: +1D4
Sanity points.
• If Millie Adams dies: –1D4 Sanity points.
• If Hilton Adams dies: –1D4 Sanity points.
• Defeating a Mythos monster: hunting horror +1D10 Sanity
points; ciimba +1D8 Sanity points; chakota +1D10 Sanity points.

STR 60
CON 65
APP 45
POW 40
DB: +1D4 Build: 1

SIZ 65
EDU 55
Move: 6

DEX 45
SAN 55
MP: 8

INT 50
HP 13
Luck: —

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
		
Colt .38 revolver
Dodge		

60% (30/12), damage 1D3+1D4
or blackjack 1D8+1D4
55% (27/11), damage 1D10
22% (11/4)

Skills
Charm 45%, Climb 50%, Credit Rating 40%, Drive Auto 60%,
Fast Talk 75%, Intimidate 25%, Jump 40%, Law 50%, Library
Use 25%, Listen 55%, Persuade 30%, Psychology 50%, Spot
Hidden 40%, Track 15%, Throw 40%.

PULP: REWARDS

Languages
English 55%.

In addition to the standard awards, the Keeper may
award pulp heroes 10 Luck points for completing the
America chapter.

Captain Walter Robson, 52, corrupt cop

162

STR 70
CON 70
APP 40
POW 65
DB: +1D4 Build: 1

SIZ 75
EDU 65
Move: 5

DEX 40
SAN 65
MP: 13

INT 70
HP 14
Luck: 35

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
		
Colt .38 revolver
Dodge		

65% (32/13), damage 1D3+1D4
(brass knuckles +1)
65% (32/13), damage 1D10
40% (20/8)

AMERICA

ALLIES OR INDEPENDENTS

Skills
Appraise 45%, Art/Craft (Acting) 45%, Charm 45%, Climb
35%, Credit Rating 60%, Drive Auto 50%, Fast Talk 60%,
Intimidate 75%, Law 65%, Psychology 60%, Firearms (Rifle/
Shotgun) 45%, Sleight of Hand 50%, Spot Hidden 45%,
Throw 60%.

Jonah Kensington, 48, owner/editor Prospero Books
STR 50
APP 65
DB: 0

Languages
English 65%.

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
Dodge		

Junior Detective, 26, corrupt police officer

Use this profile for all junior detectives (corrupt or otherwise).
CON 65
STR 70
APP 75
POW 35
DB: +1D4 Build: 1

SIZ 60
EDU 65
Move: 9

DEX 65
SAN 35
MP: 7

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
Colt .38 revolver
12-g sawn-off shotgun
Dodge		

55% (27/11), damage 1D3+1D4
50% (25/10), damage 1D10
45% (22/9), damage 4D6/1D6
35% (17/7)

STR 50
APP 45
DB: 0

Use this profile for all beat cops.

65% (32/13), damage 1D3+1D4
45% (22/9), damage 1D10
40% (20/8)

CON 50
POW 60
Build: 0

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
.32 revolver		
Dodge		

Beat Cop, 24, NYC patrol

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
Colt .38 revolver
Dodge		

INT 80
HP 11
Luck: 25

35% (17/7), damage 1D3
20% (10/4)

Carlton Ramsey, 54,
lawyer and executor of Elias’ estate

Languages
English 65%.

DEX 60
SAN 55
MP: 11

DEX 30
SAN 50
MP: 10

Languages
English 90%, French 65%, Greek 54%, Latin 33%.

Skills
Climb 40%, Disguise 45%, Drive Auto 50%, Jump 40%, Law
45%, Listen 50%, Persuade 60%, Psychology 45%, Sleight
of Hand 35%, Spot Hidden 50%, Stealth 45%, Throw 35%.

SIZ 85
EDU 60
Move: 7

SIZ 50
EDU 70
Move: 7

Skills
Accounting 60%, Anthropology 25%, Art/Craft (Photography)
20%, Climb 35%, Credit Rating 55%, Drive Auto 25%,
Intimidate 50%, History 67%, Library Use 50%, Occult 50%,
Persuade 55%, Psychology 75%, Spot Hidden 80%, Throw 40%.

INT 70
HP 12
Luck: —

CON 70
STR 65
APP 60
POW 55
DB: +1D4 Build: 1

CON 60
POW 50
Build: 0

SIZ 45
EDU 80
Move: 7

DEX 60
SAN 60
MP: 12

INT 75
HP 9
Luck: —

25% (12/5), damage 1D3
45% (22/9), damage 1D8
30% (15/6)

Skills
Accounting 75%, Charm 65%, Credit Rating 64%, Drive Auto
55%, Fast Talk 75%, Law 80%, Library Use 60%, Listen 60%,
Persuade 65%, Psychology 70%, Spot Hidden 55%, Throw 60%.

INT 65
HP 15
Luck: —

Languages
English 80%.

Skills
Climb 50%, First Aid 50%, Intimidate 75%, Jump 50%, Law 45%,
Listen 50%, Psychology 50%, Spot Hidden 55%, Throw 60%.
Languages
English 60%.

163

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

Willa Sligh, 20, legal secretary
STR 60
CON 65
APP 55
POW 65
DB: +1D4 Build: 1
Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
.32 revolver		
Dodge		

SIZ 75
EDU 60
Move: 7

DEX 50
SAN 65
MP: 13

Joe Corey, 37, Erica Carlyle’s bodyguard

INT 80
HP 14
Luck: —

25% (12/5), damage 1D3+1D4
45% (22/9), damage 1D8
40% (20/8)

Skills
Accounting 45%, Art/Craft (Shorthand) 55%, Art/Craft (Typing)
55%, Climb 55%, Fast Talk 65%, Law 35%, Library Use 50%,
Listen 60%, Persuade 60%, Psychology 60%, Stealth 70%.

STR 85
CON 75
APP 45
POW 40
DB: +1D6 Build: 2

SIZ 80
EDU 40
Move: 8

DEX 70
SAN 40
MP: 8

INT 60
HP 15
Luck: 40

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
		
Baseball bat
.45 revolver		
Dodge		

85% (42/17), damage 1D3+1D6
(brass knuckles +1)
65% (32/13), damage 1D8+1D6
75% (37/15), damage 1D10+2
60% (30/12)

Pulp Talents
Heavy Hitter: may spend 10 Luck points to add an additional
damage die when dealing out melee combat.
Tough Guy: may spend 10 Luck points to shrug off up to 5
hit points of damage taken in one combat round.

Languages
English 60%.

Erica Carlyle, 26, millionaire businesswoman

Skills
Climb 45%, Drive Auto 90%, Fast Talk 65%, Intimidate 75%,
Jump 65%, Listen 50%, Locksmith 30%, Mechanical Repair 50%,
Psychology 60%, Stealth 50%, Spot Hidden 55%, Throw 70%.

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
25% (12/5), damage 1D3–1
Fencing foil		
70% (35/14), damage 1D6–1
		(sharp tip)
.25 Derringer
40% (20/8), damage 1D6
Dodge		
50% (25/10)

Languages
English 40%.

STR 40
APP 80
DB: –1

CON 60
POW 65
Build: –1

SIZ 40
EDU 80
Move: 8

DEX 55
SAN 65
MP: 13

INT 85
HP 10
Luck: 35

Bradley Grey, 41, Erica Carlyle’s counselor

STR 45
APP 70
DB: 0

Pulp Talents
Strong Willed: gains a bonus die when making POW rolls.

CON 50
POW 55
Build: 0

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
Dodge		

Skills
Accounting 70%, Charm 75%, Credit Rating 95%, Drive Auto
35%, Intimidate 65%, Law 35%, Persuade 60%, Psychology
35%, Ride 60%, Swim 30%.

SIZ 45
EDU 90
Move: 7

DEX 50
SAN 55
MP: 11

INT 85
HP 9
Luck: —

25% (12/5), damage 1D3
25% (12/5)

Skills
Accounting 70%, Charm 50%, Credit Rating 85%, Drive Auto
30%, Fast Talk 50%, Law 90%, Library Use 70%, Persuade
80%, Pilot (Boat) 10%, Psychology 40%, Ride 10%.

Languages
English 85%, French 45%, German 50%, Italian 60%.

Languages
English 90%, French 60%, Latin 25%.

164

AMERICA

CARLYLE ESTATE GUARDS
1

2

3

4

5

6

STR

65

75

70

65

80

70

CON

75

65

70

60

70

65

SIZ

60

60

65

70

75

60

DEX

65

60

55

50

60

50

INT

55

50

60

55

60

65

APP

45

55

65

45

55

60

POW

55

50

65

40

45

40

EDU

55

60

50

65

55

60

SAN

55

50

65

40

45

40

HP

13

12

13

13

14

12

DB

+1D4

+1D4

+1D4

+1D4

+1D4

+1D4

Build

1

1

1

1

1

1

Move

9

8

8

7

8

8

MP

11

10

13

8

9

8

*Guards 5 and 6 are accompanied by guard dogs (see following).
Luck: —
Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
.45 automatic pistol
12-g shotgun
Dodge		

Skills
Climb 50%, Intimidate 60%, Jump 40%, Listen 65%, Spot
Hidden 50%, Stealth 65%, Track 50%, Throw 60%.

55% (27/11), damage 1D3+1D4
50% (25/10), damage 1D10+2
45% (27/9), damage 4D6/2D6/1D6
35% (17/7)

Languages
English 60%.

165

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

Carlyle Estate Guard Dogs, German Shepherds
Rex

Zoltan

STR

40

55

CON

40

55

SIZ

40

40

DEX

70

85

POW

50

45

HP

8

9

DB

–1

0

Build

–1

0

Move

12

12

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Fighting		
Dodge		

Professor Anthony Cowles, 46,
professor of anthropology
STR 50
APP 60
DB: 0

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
Dodge		

CON 60
POW 65
Build: 0

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
Dodge		

SIZ 50
EDU 70
Move: 7

DEX 50
SAN 61
MP: 13

DEX 55
SAN 53
MP: 14

INT 65
HP 12
Luck: —

35% (17/7), damage 1D3
35% (17/7)

Languages
English 90%, Greek 35%, Latin 20%.

Ewa Cowles, 20,
student and dutiful daughter

Skills
Jump 70%, Listen 75%, Scent Something Interesting 90%,
Spot Hidden 75%.

STR 55
APP 60
DB: 0

SIZ 65
EDU 90
Move: 7

Skills
Anthropology 60%, Archaeology 45%, Charm 25%, Credit
Rating 50%, Cthulhu Mythos 15%, Drive Auto 50%, Fast Talk
55%, History (Polynesian Cultures) 70%, Law 15%, Library
Use 80%, Listen 50%, Lore (Aboriginal) 65%, Natural World
30%, Occult 15%, Persuade 55%, Psychology 45%, Ride 25%,
Spot Hidden 30%, Swim 30%, Throw 30%.

60% (30/12), damage 1D6+DB
45% (22/9)

Miriam Atwright, 47,
Harvard University librarian

CON 60
POW 70
Build: 0

STR 65
APP 90
DB: 0

INT 70
HP 11
Luck: —

CON 70
POW 70
Build: 0

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
.32 revolver		
Dodge		

25% (12/5), damage 1D3
25% (12/5)

SIZ 50
EDU 65
Move: 9

DEX 75
SAN 70
MP: 14

INT 80
HP 12
Luck: —

45% (22/9), damage 1D3
40%, (20/8), damage 1D8
45% (22/9)

Skills
Anthropology 40%, Archaeology 20%, Charm 25%, Climb 50%,
Credit Rating 40%, Drive Auto 30%, Fast Talk 35%, First Aid
55%, Jump 40%, History (Polynesian Cultures) 55%, Library
Use 30%, Listen 45%, Medicine 20%, Photography 25%, Ride
70%, Science (Astronomy) 20%, Spot Hidden 70%, Throw 35%.

Skills
Accounting 45%, Anthropology 60%, Charm 60%, Credit
Rating 35%, Cthulhu Mythos 02%, History 65%, Library
Use 90%, Occult 45%, Persuade 55%, Psychology 60%, Spot
Hidden 65%.

Languages
Arabic 15%, English 90%.

Languages
English 80%, Latin 60%, Spanish 50%.

166

AMERICA
Arthur Emerson, 53,
unwitting cult associate and importer

STR 65
CON 65
APP 45
POW 55
DB: +1D4 Build: 1
Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
.38 revolver		
Dodge		

SIZ 70
EDU 60
Move: 5

DEX 40
SAN 55
MP: 11

Skills
Anthropology 65%, Appraise 65%, Credit Rating 70%, History
75%, Library Use 65%, Natural World 45%, Occult 45%,
Persuade 40%, Science (Astronomy) 40%, Science (Botany)
40%, Spot Hidden 45%.

INT 75
HP 13
Luck: —

Languages
English 70%, Latin 60%, Greek (Classical) 45%.

65% (32/13), damage 1D3+1D4
40%, (20/8), damage 1D10
25% (12/5)

Rebecca Shosenburg, 27,
reporter at New York Times
STR 70
APP 55
DB: 0

Skills
Accounting 65%, Credit Rating 40%, Drive Auto 50%, Fast
Talk 45%, Intimidate 65%, Law 55%, Listen 40%, Mechanical
Repair 40%, Operate Heavy Machinery 50%, Persuade 60%,
Psychology 50%.

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
Dodge		

Languages
English 60%.

Murray Hill Hotel Doorman,
ex-soldier and gatekeeper

STR 70
CON 70
APP 70
POW 65
DB: +1D4 Build: 1

SIZ 70
EDU 55
Move: 8

DEX 55
SAN 65
MP: 13

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
Dodge		

70% (35/14), damage 1D3+1D4
50% (25/10)

INT 60
HP 14
Luck: —

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
Dodge		

DEX 55
SAN 50
MP: 10

INT 90
HP 9
Luck: 25

35% (17/7), damage 1D3
50% (25/10)

Millie Adams, 27,
desperate but determined wife
STR 50
APP 75
DB: 0

CON 60
POW 75
Build: 0

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
.32 revolver		
Dodge		

Dr. Mordecai Lemming, 62, eccentric folklorist
SIZ 45
EDU 70
Move: 6

DEX 65
SAN 55
MP: 11

Languages
English 85%, Hebrew 20%.

Languages
English 55%.
CON 35
POW 50
Build: 0

SIZ 45
EDU 65
Move: 9

Skills
Art/Craft (Acting) 45%, Climb 45%, Credit Rating 30%,
Fast Talk 55%, History 45%, Jump 40%, Law 25%, Library
Use 60%, Listen 60%, Persuade 60%, Psychology 60%, Spot
Hidden 65%, Stealth 60%, Throw 35%.

Skills
Climb 40%, First Aid 50%, Firearms (Handgun) 55%,
Intimidate 60%, Jump 50%, Listen 50%, Persuade 50%,
Psychology 60%, Spot Hidden 55%, Stealth 50%, Throw 45%.

STR 50
APP 60
DB: 0

CON 45
POW 55
Build: 0

INT 60
HP 8
Luck: —

SIZ 60
EDU 60
Move: 8

DEX 60
SAN 75
MP: 15

INT 75
HP 12
Luck: 35

35% (17/7), damage 1D3
30% (15/6), damage 1D8
30% (15/6)

Skills
Art/Craft (Piano) 65%, Art/Craft (Sing) 65%, Charm 60%,
First Aid 60%, Listen 60%, Persuade 65%, Psychology 60%,
Spot Hidden 65%, Throw 60%.
Languages
English 60%.

25% (12/5), damage 1D3
27% (13/5)

167

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

Hilton Adams, 29, an innocent man
STR 75
CON 65
APP 65
POW 50
DB: +1D4 Build: 1
Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
Dodge		

SIZ 85
EDU 60
Move: 7

DEX 65
SAN 50
MP: 10

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
Dodge		

INT 65
HP 15
Luck: —

Skills
Art/Craft (Fine Art) 55%, Art/Craft (Sculpture) 75%, Credit
Rating 35%, Drive Auto 50%, Firearms (Rifle/Shotgun) 75%,
Natural World 40%, Persuade 50%, Psychology 40%, Spot
Hidden 80%, Throw 50%.

65% (32/13), damage 1D3+1D4
55% (27/11)

Skills
Art/Craft (Blacksmith) 65%, Charm 70%, Climb 50%, Drive
Auto 40%, Firearms (Rifle/Shotgun) 55%, First Aid 60%,
Handgun 65%, Jump 45%, Mechanical Repair 55%, Operate
Heavy Machinery 35%, Persuade 60%, Spot Hidden 65%,
Stealth 50%, Throw 50%.

Languages
English 65%, French 60%.

Art Mills, 29, jazz musician

Languages
English 60%, French 35%.

THE FRIENDS
OF HILTON ADAMS
Needham Johnson, 30,
reporter at the New York Age
STR 65
CON 50
APP 80
POW 65
DB: +1D4 Build: 1
Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
Dodge		

SIZ 65
EDU 70
Move: 8

DEX 40
SAN 55
MP: 13

INT 75
HP 11
Luck: —

DEX 70
SAN 25
MP: 7

DEX 75
SAN 70
MP: 16

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
Dodge		

65% (32/13), damage 1D3+1D4
50% (25/10)

Jackie Wallace, 30, hospital orderly

Languages
English 80%, French 40%.
SIZ 65
EDU 65
Move: 8

SIZ 70
EDU 55
Move: 8

INT 65
HP 14
Luck: —

Languages
English 55%, French 40%.

Skills
Art/Craft (Photography) 45%, Art/Craft (Writing) 75%,
Credit Rating 25%, Firearms (Rifle/Shotgun) 45%, History
55%, Intimidate 50%, Library Use 60%, Persuade 60%,
Psychology 60%, Spot Hidden 65%, Stealth 60%, Throw 30%.

STR 60
CON 80
APP 40
POW 35
DB: +1D4 Build: 1

STR 55
CON 70
APP 65
POW 80
DB: +1D4 Build: 1

Skills
Appraise 45%, Art/Craft (Trumpet) 75%, Credit Rating 15%,
Fast Talk 65%, Firearms (Rifle/Shotgun) 45%, Listen 70%,
Psychology 50%, Sleight of Hand 60%, Spot Hidden 60%,
Stealth 60%, Throw 45%.

55% (27/11), damage 1D3+1D4
40% (20/8)

Douglas Fells, 31, sculptor

45% (22/9), damage 1D3+1D4
40% (20/8)

STR 75
CON 85
APP 55
POW 70
DB: +1D4 Build: 1

SIZ 55
EDU 60
Move: 9

DEX 75
SAN 61
MP: 14

INT 70
HP 14
Luck: —

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
Dodge		

65% (32/13), damage 1D3+1D4
50% (25/10)

Skills
Charm 65%, Credit Rating 10%, Electrical Repair 30%,
Firearms (Rifle/Shotgun) 65%, First Aid 70%, Listen 60%,
Mechanical Repair 30%, Psychology 70%, Spot Hidden 65%,
Stealth 60%, Throw 65%.

INT 80
HP 14
Luck: —

Languages
English 60%, French 30%.

168

AMERICA

ADVERSARIES

Colm Doyle (Cultist #2), 24,
member of the Bloody Tongue

The three cultists sent to murder Jackson Elias (Elias’
Murderers) each have their own profile (following). A
range of Average Bloody Tongue Cultists (NYC) who the
investigators may “meet” while in New York are also provided.

STR 60
APP 35
DB: 0

Elias’ Murderers
Iregi Kipkemboi (Cultist #1), 23,
member of the Bloody Tongue

STR 80
CON 75
APP 30
POW 60
DB: +1D4 Build: 1

SIZ 70
EDU 40
Move: 8

DEX 50
SAN 00
MP: 10

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
		
Dodge		

50% (25/10), damage 1D3+1D4
or panga 1D8+1D4
40% (20/8)

CON 60
POW 40
Build: 0

SIZ 60
EDU 55
Move: 8

DEX 65
SAN 00
MP: 8

INT 35
HP 12
Luck: 20

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
60% (30/12), damage 1D3 or
		panga 1D8+1D4
Dodge		
65% (32/13)

INT 40
HP 14
Luck: 30

Pulp Combat
Brawl		
80% (40/16), damage 1D3 or
		panga 1D8+1D4
African throwing knife 30% (15/6), damage 1D4+2,
		plus 1D4†
Dodge		
85% (42/17)
† Tearing damage when removing the weapon; negated by a
successful Medicine or Hard First Aid roll.

Pulp Combat
Brawl		
70% (35/14), damage 		
		
1D3+1D4 or panga 1D8+1D4
African throwing knife 30% (15/6), damage 1D4+2,
		plus 1D4†
Dodge		
50% (25/10)

Pulp Talents
Keen Hearing: gains a bonus die to Listen rolls.
Skills
Climb 60%, Cthulhu Mythos 04%, Drive Auto 35%,
Intimidate 20%, Jump 65%, Listen 75%, Locksmith 25%,
Sleight of Hand 55%, Stealth 60%, Swim 30%, Track 15%,
Throw 30%.

† Tearing damage when removing the weapon; negated by a
successful Medicine or Hard First Aid roll.
Pulp Talents
Heavy Hitter: may spend 10 Luck points to add an additional
damage die when dealing out melee combat.

Languages
English 55%, Swahili 15%.

Skills
Climb 75%, Cthulhu Mythos 03%, Intimidate 25%, Jump
90%, Listen 65%, Sleight of Hand 50%, Stealth 60%, Swim
60%, Track 10%, Throw 25%.
Languages
English 30%, Kikuyu 50%, Nandi 35%, Swahili 35%.

169

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

AVERAGE BLOODY TONGUE CULTISTS (NYC) ASSORTED THUGS
STR
CON
SIZ

1

2

3

4

5

6

7

8

60

50

70

70

75

55

45

55

75

60

65

70

60

50

50

75

50

55

45

65

60

30

70

50

APP

70

50

55

40

SAN

50

30

00

50

60

00

55

55

00

90

65

40

EDU

70

70

75

POW

60

60

85
65

55

45

DEX
INT

65

85

40

55

75

40

00

50

60

60

00

50

55

50

00

45

65

25

00

40

45

45

00

HP

13

13

11

12

10

12

14

15

Build

0

0

0

0

0

0

0

0

DB

Move

0

8

0

8

0

9

0

9

Luck: —

0

9

0

7

0

7

0

7

*Only cultists 3 and 4 are armed with handguns
**Only cultists 1, 5, and 8 are armed with throwing knives.
†Tearing damage when removing the weapon; negated by a
successful Medicine or Hard First Aid roll.

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
45% (22/9), damage 1D3
		
or small knife/straight razor 1D4
Panga 		
45%, damage 1D8
.22 revolver*
30% (15/6), damage 1D6
Dodge			40% (20/8)

Skills
Climb 60%, Cthulhu Mythos 05%, Jump 55%, Listen 50%,
Occult 10%, Stealth 60%, Spot Hidden 35%, Track 35%,
Throw 35%.

Pulp Combat
Brawl		
65% (32/13), damage 1D3
		
or small knife/straight razor 1D4
Panga		
65% (32/13), damage 1D8
.22 revolver*
50% (25/10), damage 1D6
African throwing knife** 35% (17/7), damage 1D4+2,
		plus 1D4†
Dodge		
60% (30/12)

Languages
English 35%, Kikuyu 60%, Nandi 35%, Swahili 50%.

170

AMERICA
Jomo “Jimmy” Jepleting (Cultist #3), 26,
member of the Bloody Tongue

STR 75
CON 65
APP 20
POW 50
DB: +1D4 Build: 1

SIZ 60
EDU 55
Move: 9

DEX 80
SAN 00
MP: 8

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
		
Dodge		

50% (25/10), damage 1D3+1D4
or panga 1D8+1D4
65% (32/13)

Mukunga M’Dari, 36, high priest
STR 80
CON 100 SIZ 75
APP 85
POW 85 EDU 40
DB: +1D4 Build: 1
Move: 8

INT 50
HP 12
Luck: 25

Pulp Combat
Brawl		
95% (47/19), damage 1D3+1D4
		
or large club 1D8+1D4,
		
lion’s claws 1D4+1D4,
		switchblade 1D4+1D4
Panga		
85% (42/17), damage 1D8+1D4
African throwing knife 50% (25/10), damage 1D4+2,
		plus 1D4†
Dodge		
95% (47/19)

† Tearing damage when removing the weapon; negated by a
successful Medicine or Hard First Aid roll.
Pulp Talents
Rapid Attack: may spend 10 Luck points to gain one further
melee attack in a single combat round.

† Tearing damage when removing the weapon; negated by a
successful Medicine or Hard First Aid roll.

Skills
Climb 55%, Cthulhu Mythos 05%, Intimidate 25%, Jump
55%, Listen 75%, Sleight of Hand 60%, Stealth 55%, Swim
25%, Track 65%, Throw 35%.

Pulp Talents
Tough Guy: may spend 10 Luck points to shrug off up to 5
hit points of damage taken in one combat round.
Heavy Hitter: may spend 10 Luck points to add an additional
damage die when dealing out melee combat.

Languages
English 35%, Kikuyu 60%, Nandi 25%, Swahili 40%.

Skills
Art/Craft (Sing) 55%, Climb 70%, Credit Rating 07%,
Cthulhu Mythos 26%, Intimidate 60%, Jump 75%, Listen
65%, Natural World 40%, Occult 45%, Sleight of Hand 55%,
Spot Hidden 55%, Stealth 75%, Track 20%, Throw 50%.

Silas N’kwane, 73, manager of Ju-Ju House
CON 85
POW 65
Build: –1

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
		
Dodge		

SIZ 40
EDU 30
Move: 5

DEX 50
SAN 00
MP: 13

INT 65
HP 17
Luck: 85

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
85% (42/17), damage 1D3+1D4
		
or large club 1D8+1D4, 		
		
lion’s claws 1D4+1D4, 		
		switchblade 1D4+1D4
Panga		
75% (37/15), damage 1D8+1D4
Dodge		
85% (42/17)

Pulp Combat
Brawl		
70% (35/14), damage 1D3+1D4
		
or panga 1D8+1D4
African throwing knife 35% (17/7), damage 1D4+2,
		plus 1D4†
Dodge		
75% (37/15)

STR 30
APP 45
DB: –1

DEX 65
SAN 00
MP: 17

INT 75
HP 12
Luck: 35

Languages
English 35%, Kikuyu 30%, Nandi 90%, Swahili 55%.

25% (12/5), damage 1D3–1
or panga 1D8–1
35% (17/7)

Spells: Bind Byakhee, Clutch of Nyogtha, Contact
Nyarlathotep, Create Ciimba*, Dread Curse of Azathoth,
Mindblast, Power Drain*, Shrivelling, Summon/Bind Hunting
Horror.

Skills
Anthropology 15%, Archaeology 10%, Charm 60%, Credit Rating
23%, Cthulhu Mythos 11%, Fast Talk 45%, Listen 35%, Occult
50%, Psychology 45%, Stealth 65%, Spot Hidden 65%, Throw 30%.

*See Appendix B: Spells.

Languages
English 45%, Kikuyu 70%, Nandi 20%, Swahili 20%.

171

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

MONSTERS
Chakota, spirit of many faces

The chakota is created by a magical ritual involving a willing
person, who is consumed in the process, and whose face
becomes the first face of the creature. At first, the cultists must
help the newly-made thing feed, but soon it takes care of itself.
A chakota’s characteristics are a function of the number
of its faces. Each face yields 5 STR and 5 SIZ points. The
creature’s CON equals its STR. The DEX is always 15,
and its MOV is always 4. The chakota in the pit has 36
faces. If it ate two investigators, then it would have 38
faces, and its STR and SIZ would increase accordingly
(as would all of its associated derived statistics).
STR 180
APP —
DB: n/a

CON 180 SIZ 180
POW 180 EDU —
Build: +4 Move: 4

DEX 15
SAN —
MP: 36

Fighting (Bite): kills by biting and devouring with its myriad
faces. May only attack one target at a time (this increases
to three targets in pulp games), seeking to devour the first
target before turning to the second. Each target is attacked
by 1D8 faces per round; roll to bite for each face. A successful
bite clamps down on the victim, drawing them closer to the
chakota. The target may make an opposed STR roll to break
free (inflicting the automatic loss of 1 damage per set of
clamped teeth): assume each bite has STR 5; total the number
of bites and use that sum as the total STR for the opposed roll
(do not use the chakota’s bodily strength). Note that those held
by the chakota’s mouths gain a bonus die to attacks against it.
Each successful bite attack inflicts 1 damage.

INT 0
HP 36
Luck: —

Bite		
30% (15/6), damage 1 point per
		successful bite
Dodge		
n/a

Wails of the Chakota: automatically affects everyone who can
hear its mouths weeping and shrieking; provoking a Sanity roll
for 1/1D6 loss of points when hearing them for the first time.

Armor: the chakota is immune to firearms and mundane
melee weapons, but fire, magic, and electricity can harm it.
If all the mouths are covered (perhaps submerged in water,
covered in tar, thick molasses, etc.), it can suffocate.
Spells: none.
Sanity loss: 1D4/2D4 Sanity points to see the chakota. An
additional 1D4 Sanity points are lost if an investigator sees
the face of a person known to them in the chakota, increasing
to 1D6 points if the person was a close friend or loved one.

Combat
Attacks per round: 1D8 bites per target

The Chakota’s Da
rk Spirit

172

AMERICA

CIIMBA, MONSTROUSLY STRONG UNDEAD HORRORS
STR
CON
SIZ

1

2

3

4

90

110

105

120

65

50

95

60

35

45

50

65

DEX

65

55

50

20

HP

15

8

11

11

POW

05

05

05

05

DB

+1D4

+1D4

+1D4

+1D6

Move

6

6

6

6

Build

1

1

1

2

Luck: —
Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Fighting		
Dodge		

Sanity loss: 0/1D8 Sanity points to see the ciimba. If the
ciimba was known in life to the investigator and is still
recognizable, the investigator loses an additional 1D2 Sanity
points whether the Sanity roll succeeds or fails.

30% (15/6), damage 1D4+DB
n/a (ciimba do not dodge)

Armor: major wounds delivered to a ciimba result in the loss
of a limb; otherwise, ignore damage except to the head (one
penalty die on rolls to target the head).

173

CHAPTER 2

s
S
h
E
o
R
o
P
t
E
i
N
T
n
O
g
d
F
e
Y
e
I
G
p
o
n
e
s

HIRELINGS

The following hirelings are provided should the investigators
decide to hire one or more criminals or to break into the
Carlyle Mansion. If desired, the players could take on these
roles temporarily to play through such a burglary—possibly
more fun than watching from the sidelines.
In addition, by changing the names and a few details,
these NPCs could be utilized later in any of the campaign’s
other locations, should the need arise.

Solomon “Solly” Reznik, 29, safecracker and thief

A Jewish Russian immigrant from the Lower East Side
who turned to crime after he lost everything in a fire at the
family’s cabinetmaking business.
STR 40
APP 80
DB: 0

CON 55
POW 60
Build: 0

SIZ 75
EDU 65
Move: 8

DEX 75
SAN 60
MP: 12

55% (27/11), damage 1D3
or crowbar 1D8
40% (20/8)

Pulp Combat
Brawl		
		
Dodge		

75% (37/15), damage 1D3
or crowbar 1D8
60% (30/12)

Clodagh Bannon, 36,
piano teacher, security expert, and occult dabbler

The daughter of a long line of policemen, who would be horrified
if they knew of Clo’s sideline as a criminal mastermind.
STR 50
APP 70
DB: 0

Languages
English 65%, Russian 20%.

CON 65
POW 70
Build: 0

SIZ 60
EDU 65
Move: 8

DEX 85
SAN 70
MP: 17

INT 85
HP 12
Luck: 42

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
.32 revolver		
Dodge		

45% (22/9), damage 1D3
40% (20/8), damage 1D8
45% (22/9)

Pulp Combat
Brawl		
.32 revolver		
Dodge		

65% (32/13), damage 1D3
60% (30/12), damage 1D8
65% (32/13)

Pulp Talents
Sharp Witted: bonus die to INT (but not Idea) rolls.

Gino Fabbri, 30,
former soldier and explosives expert

A second-generation Italian-American who learned his
skills with explosives on the frontlines during the Great War.
DEX 80
SAN 50
MP: 10

85% (42/17), damage 1D3+1D6
75% (32/15), damage 1D10+2
60% (30/12)

Languages
English 60%, Italian 60%.

Skills
Appraise 55%, Art/Craft (Cabinetmaking) 45%, Climb 40%,
Credit Rating 20%, Listen 70%, Locksmith 70%, Mechanical
Repair 50%, Persuade 40%, Sleight of Hand 60%, Spot Hidden
75%, Stealth 60%, Throw 45%.

SIZ 85
EDU 60
Move: 7

Pulp Combat
Brawl		
Colt .45 automatic
Dodge		

Skills
Climb 40%, Credit Rating 20%, Demolitions 70%, First Aid
50%, Intimidate 65%, Jump 40%, Mechanical Repair 60%,
Stealth 50%, Survival (Desert) 40%, Throw 60%.

Pulp Talents
Resourceful: may spend 10 luck points to find a certain useful
piece of equipment

STR 80
CON 65
APP 55
POW 50
DB: +1D6 Build: 2

65% (32/13), damage 1D3+1D6
60% (30/12), damage 1D10+2
40% (20/8)

Pulp Talents
Alert: never surprised in combat.

INT 80
HP 13
Luck: 30

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
		
Dodge		

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
Colt .45 automatic
Dodge		

Skills
Appraise 55%, Art/Craft (Piano) 55%, Charm 65%, Credit
Rating 25%, Drive Auto 30%, Listen 70%, Occult 35%,
Persuade 60%, Spot Hidden 75%, Stealth 70%, Throw 50%.

INT 70
HP 15
Luck: 25

Languages
English 65%.

174

AMERICA
Jessica Templeton, 26,
conwoman and pickpocket

Pulp Combat
Brawl		
Colt .45 revolver
Dodge		

You’d never know it to look at the fine “lady” she’s become, but
“Little Jessie” grew up in one of the poorest neighborhoods
in Yonkers.
STR 60
APP 80
DB: 0

CON 65
POW 50
Build: 0

SIZ 50
EDU 60
Move: 9

DEX 90
SAN 50
MP: 10

Pulp Talents
Heavy Hitter: may spend 10 Luck to add an additional
damage die during melee combat.

INT 85
HP 11
Luck: 25

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
.25 Derringer
Dodge		

25% (12/5), damage 1D3
40% (20/8), damage 1D6
45% (22/9)

Pulp Combat
Brawl		
.25 Derringer
Dodge		

35% (17/7), damage 1D3
60% (30/12), damage 1D6
65% (32/13)

Skills
Climb 35%, Credit Rating 15%, Drive Auto 70%, Intimidate
65%, Mechanical Repair 60%, Navigate 60%, Operate Heavy
Machinery 50%, Persuade 50%, Psychology 40%, Spot Hidden
65%, Stealth 50%, Throw 40%.
Languages
English 60%.

Fearghal Wong, 24, boxer and muscle for hire

As a half Chinese-half Irish child growing up in Chinatown,
Fearghal soon learned to be handy with his fists.

Pulp Talents
Master of Disguise: may spend 10 Luck points to gain a
bonus die to Disguise or Art/Craft (Acting) rolls.
Skills
Appraise 65%, Art/Craft (Acting) 65%, Charm 65%, Climb
60%, Credit Rating 30%, Fast Talk 70%, Law 15%, Listen
60%, Psychology 60%, Sleight of Hand 70%, Spot Hidden
60%, Stealth 50%, Throw 45%.
Languages
English 75%.

Beauford Jones, 21, muscle and getaway driver

Formerly from San Juan Hill (now known as Lincoln
Square) and currently resident in Harlem, Jones was once
a chauffeur for a wealthy Manhattan family before he was
fired for an illicit affair with his boss’ son.
STR 75
CON 80
APP 75
POW 60
DB: +1D4 Build: 1

SIZ 70
EDU 60
Move: 8

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
Colt .45 revolver
Dodge		

65% (32/13), damage 1D3+1D4
40% (20/8), damage 1D10+2
35% (17/7)

DEX 70
SAN 60
MP: 12

85% (42/17), damage 1D3+1D4
60% (30/12), damage 1D10+2
55% (22/11)

STR 70
CON 80
APP 60
POW 60
DB: +1D4 Build: 1

SIZ 60
EDU 50
Move: 9

DEX 85
SAN 60
MP: 12

INT 65
HP 14
Luck: 30

Combat
Attacks per round: 1
Brawl		
		
Dodge		

75% (37/15), damage 1D3+1D4
or pickaxe handle 1D8+1D4
60% (30/12)

Pulp Combat
Brawl		
		
Dodge		

95% (47/19), damage 1D3+1D4
or pickaxe handle 1D8+1D4
75% (37/15)

Pulp Talents
Tough Guy: may spend 10 points of Luck to shrug off 5
points of damage per combat round.

INT 75
HP 15
Luck: 30

Skills
Climb 50%, Credit Rating 15%, First Aid 45%, Intimidate
75%, Jump 60%, Psychology 40%, Spot Hidden 65%, Stealth
50%, Throw 50%.
Languages
Chinese (Mandarin) 50%, English 50%.

175

INTRODUCTION

S
E
R
P
E
N
T
O
F
Y
I
G

176

INTRODUCTION

ENGLAND
3

CHAPTER

I remember when Nyarlathotep came to my city—the great, the old, the terrible city of
unnumbered crimes. My friend had told me of him, and of the impelling fascination and
allurement of his revelations, and I burned with eagerness to explore his uttermost mysteries.
—H. P. Lovecraft, Nyarlathotep
London’s fog and gloom reap harrowing returns as
investigators cross paths with an all-but-untouchable magician
and learn secrets that will draw them to horrors waiting in
England’s green and pleasant countryside.
London is the nearest and perhaps the most logical place for
investigators to visit first, allowing them to retrace the steps
of Jackson Elias, as England was the last place he visited
before returning to America. The Carlyle Expedition also
spent time in England, so researching their English contacts
makes perfect sense.
London’s scholarly resources are vast, and its rulers also
govern Egypt, Kenya, and Shanghai in important ways.
Most happily, London’s natives (for the most part) are
friendly, and its street signs are in English. Here, the
shadows first encountered in New York City grow more
substantial. The investigators find themselves beset by a
cult, one other than the Bloody Tongue but, nevertheless,
connected to it. Clues found in England point to Egypt,
Kenya, Australia, and China. Along the way, anomalies
exist such as a mad artist and a village beset by a dark curse.
Give the players the feel of London—the fog and smoke,
the seeping chill of the rain, the crowds and the enormity of
the daytime bustle, the bohemian atmosphere of Chelsea, the
magnificent museums and galleries of Central London, as
well as the threatening byways of Limehouse and London’s
other less salubrious environs. Beyond the city, contrast
and compare city life to the rural charm and frightened
villagers of Lesser Edale, and the wilds of Essex where pagan
and monstrous rites take place hidden from public view.

PICKING UP THE TRAIL

The investigators come to England to follow the trail of
Carlyle and Elias. For most groups, London is the logical
destination following the events in New York. Should the

177

Opposite: The Death Ritual at the Egyptian stele

players decide to follow a different route, the England chapter
can be played later in the campaign but ideally before the
investigators head off to Kenya or China. In this event, if the
Keeper needs to insert extra incentive, communiqués from
Edward Gavigan or Zahra Shafik planted in the campaign’s
other chapters should be enough for the players to put
London in their sights.
For example, one of Edward Gavigan’s business cards
(Carlyle Papers America #2) is located in Omar al-Shakti’s
safe (The Safe, page 347, Egypt), and a picture of the
Cairene businessman with Zahra Shafik can also be found
in Omar al-Shakti’s home (A Dangerous Man, page 344,
Egypt). Should the investigators visit Shanghai before
London, then a letter from Edward Gavigan to Sir Aubrey
talking about Henson Manufacturing is hidden among
the paperwork in Sir Aubrey’s workshop on Gray Dragon
Island (Carlyle Papers China #10).
Leads given by Jonah Kensington in New York direct
the investigators to Mickey Mahoney, owner and editor of
The Scoop (page 190), who can steer them toward several
encounters including the artist Miles Shipley (The Chelsea
Serpent, page 215), The Derbyshire Horror (page 227),
and to the “Egyptian Murders” that Inspector Barrington
of Scotland Yard is pursuing (Slaughter in Soho, page 250).
A business card (Carlyle Papers America #2) at Elias’
murder scene directs the investigators to Edward Gavigan
and the Penhew Foundation. Note that Slaughter in Soho
also provides a route to Edward Gavigan, should the
investigators have missed the business card in New York.
During the course of their London excursion, the
investigators should be drawn to Gavigan, the Blue Pyramid
Club, Henson Manufacturing, and ultimately to the horrors
of Misr House. In tandem, the appearance of Zahra Shafik
presents a possible quandary: do the investigators agree
to an alliance with her to end Gavigan’s reign? And, if
so, can they trust her?

CHAPTER 3

S
E
R
P
E
N
T
O
F
Y
I
G

The Carlyle Expedition in London

Jackson Elias in London

Having arrived in London on April 14, 1919, Carlyle,
M’Weru, Huston, and Sir Aubrey set quickly to making
plans and organizing their expedition to Egypt. Sir Aubrey’s
protégé Edward Gavigan assisted, with the group spending a
great deal of time locked away in the secluded rooms of the
Penhew Foundation. Meanwhile, Hypatia Masters found
solace buying photographic equipment and outfitting herself
and the group for the expedition.
Zahra Shafik, an Egyptian national and an associate of
Gavigan, was hired to provide guidance to the expedition
members through a series of briefings on Egypt (local
laws, customs, politics, etc.), and also helped to arrange
local introductions for when the group arrived in Egypt.
Desperate to get underway, Carlyle and his companions
pulled out all the stops, and within the space of 14 days the
expedition was ready to depart for Cairo. Sir Aubrey handed
over the day-to-day control of the Penhew Foundation to
the ever-capable Gavigan. On April 28, 1919 the expedition
joined a ship headed for Egypt.

Elias arrived in London in late November 1924 and busily
accumulated leads, three of which (The Chelsea Serpent
(page 215), The Derbyshire Horror (page 227), and
Slaughter in Soho (page 250) he was unable to explore.
In early December, Elias arranged a meeting at the
Penhew Foundation with Edward Gavigan, to delve deeper
into the purpose and background of the Carlyle Expedition.
Elias saw through Gavigan’s lies and decided to return to
press the Foundation’s director further a few days later.
Despite Elias’ cunning, he was no match for Gavigan and
left empty-handed. Unfortunately, this second meeting
confirmed Gavigan’s suspicions about the journalist, and
Elias was marked by the Brotherhood of the Black Pharaoh
as a dangerous interloper. Gavigan’s minions dogged his
tracks, tailing Elias wherever he went.
By December 16, Elias had seen enough shadows
following him to know that “someone” was on his tracks.
Forced to flee the country before his researches could be
completed, Elias sent a telegram to Jonah Kensington in
New York letting him know he was heading back and,
on the following day, he boarded a freighter named the
Phalarope, headed for New York.

178

ENGLAND

RUNNING THIS CHAPTER

1957) when seeking inspiration for Edward Gavigan and
Misr House. As the chapter progresses, the heroes are first
watched and then pursued by the cult, whose members will
be happy to raid hotel rooms and set ambushes. Build the
encompassing sense of threat while posing the question:
who can the heroes trust? Let the formality of English
society both constrict and confound the heroes—they know
who the villains are but must catch them “in the act” lest
they face the weight of the law upon their shoulders.
Once at Misr House, frame the situation around a Grand
Rite to establish the set-up for an epic climax in which
the heroes must confront Gavigan, his horde of cultists,
and monsters from beyond. Take off the brakes and let the
heroes have at it! Reward risky endeavors and encourage
bold plans to deal with the Brotherhood of the Black
Pharaoh in England.

Except for the Brotherhood of the Black Pharaoh, most
of the menaces in England can be avoided or escaped by
the investigators. Once the investigators contact Edward
Gavigan, the eyes of the Brotherhood are upon them.
The episodes in England involve several potentially deadly
encounters. Allow the investigators to make their own choices,
but do not fail to present them with the opportunities. Two
clues lead to optional sidetrack scenarios—The Chelsea
Serpent and The Derbyshire Horror. Both are horrible
enough but unrelated to the unraveling of the mystery
surrounding the Carlyle Expedition and to Nyarlathotep’s
cruel plans for the planet. Sections relating directly to the
core campaign are (presented in likely narrative order):
• Initial Investigations: The Scoop (page 190), the
Penhew Foundation (page 196), and the Limehouse
Docks (page 208).
• Slaughter in Soho: the Egyptian Murders (page 250),
the Blue Pyramid Club (page 253), and Empire Spices
(page 256).
• Machinations of the Brotherhood: Henson
Manufacturing (page 262) and Misr House (page 269).

ARRIVING IN ENGLAND

As international air travel is not available for most of the 1920s,
an ocean voyage is required. The leading operators are the
White Star Line and Cunard Line, offering First, Second, and
Third Class accommodation, depending on the investigators’
funds. The crossing takes around nine days; as long as the
weather holds good, it can be as little as five days. On arrival
in Southampton (or Liverpool), passengers can catch a train
headed into London (taking half to a full day’s travel).

Note that Slaughter in Soho, while directly linked to the
core campaign, could (in a pinch) be missed, although it does
provide an additional clue trail to Misr House.

PULP CONSIDERATIONS

FIREARMS IN
THE UNITED KINGDOM

London presents a range of encounters that you can easily
dial up for pulp play. The initial stages focus on research,
most of which lead into face-to-face meetings that set
up some of the important NPCs and the key villain in
London—Edward Gavigan. Following the events of New
York, these early sequences in London help to slow the pace
for a while and establish local tensions, which should be
rapidly ratcheted up thereafter.
The two sidetrack scenarios lead into unexpected
encounters, both of which present very different villains:
one an evil genius with a crazed plan to usurp humanity, the
other a victim of a curse who could pose a moral quandary
for the heroes. For The Derbyshire Horror, draw inspiration
from John Landis’ masterpiece An American Werewolf in
London (1981). While for The Chelsea Serpent, look to
Hammer Horror’s The Reptile (Gilling, 1966). Both sidetrack
scenarios offer different flavors of classic horror tropes, and
the Keeper is advised to play these for maximum effect.
The Keeper could do worse than checking out The Devil
Rides Out (Fisher, 1968) and Night of the Demon (Tourneur,

Investigators entering the UK with firearms (not shotguns,
see below) should make a Luck roll: if failed, their bags have
been searched and any firearms found are confiscated if valid
paperwork is not in place—although kind Keepers might
forgo this to ensure the investigators are prepared for the
trouble they will encounter while in England’s green and
pleasant land.
Officials question travelers found with firearms about
their reasons for visiting the UK, and their paperwork (visa,
weapon import license) is checked to ensure its authenticity.
If a good reason can be explained, such as “I’m headed to
Africa on a hunting trip” (and, at the Keeper’s discretion,
a Persuade roll) the customs official might allow someone
with a good Credit Rating or social position to bring their
weapons into the UK.
Clever investigators who plan ahead, may discover that
firearms may be shipped with them if their travel documents
prove they are passing through Britain on their way to
another country (such as Africa or China). Of course,

179

CHAPTER 3

S
E
R
P
E
N
T
O
F
Y
I
G

SETTING INFORMATION:
LONDON

such investigators are reminded that their weapons must
remain secured and unused while in the UK.
British subjects and permanent residents may, of course,
bring firearms into the country providing they have been
issued with a firearms certificate by the chief constable
of their home district. Weapons (non-automatics) and
ammunition may be purchased at hunting and department
stores, specialist sellers, or on the black market. Reputable
sellers will ask to see the buyer’s firearms certificate (except
when buying shotguns).
Obtaining a firearms certificate is usually very timeconsuming for foreign visitors. It is unlikely that a tourist
would be issued a certificate; occasionally, a chief constable
might grant a certificate to an “upstanding foreigner” with
references from a reputable UK source, as long as they are
of “sound mind” and without a UK criminal record—a letter
of recommendation from a US law enforcement authority
may help, if provided within a suitable professional context.
Anything from a couple of days to two weeks might be
spent waiting for the paperwork to be approved and signed.

For generations, London and its suburbs have comprised the
greatest city known to man. Approximately seven and a half
million people live in the Greater London area. Not only the
largest, London is also the wealthiest city in the world. In
later generations, New York overtakes the sprawling city on
the Thames but, just now, London is the queen of civilization
and the heart of the British Empire—but the cracks are
beginning to show.
A dark scar lies beneath the fields of England. The Great
War claimed a generation, with most families losing two of
their number in the conflict. For many of the aristocracy,
heirs have been lost, servants no longer serve, and the
power once guaranteed by bloodline is being usurped by
nouveau riche industrialists. Behind the facade of the Roaring
Twenties, the British class system is slowly bleeding to
death. Laborers strike for more pay and better conditions,
and those going about London’s streets are likely to see
picket lines from time to time.
The County of London covers approximately 116 square
miles (300 square km). It is ridiculously easy to hide (and
get lost) in its warren-like streets. The wealthiest portions
of the city are north of the Thames: the West End and
most of Westminster, extending into Chelsea, Kensington,
Paddington, and Marylebone. Within Westminster rest the
palaces and government offices commonly thought of when
the word “London” is mentioned. The most fashionable
addresses include Mayfair (just east of Hyde Park), Belgravia
(south of Hyde Park), Kensington (west of Belgravia),
and Chelsea (to the south of Belgravia and Kensington).
The district of Soho, an area bounded by Oxford Street,
Regent Street, Charing Cross Road, and Piccadilly, is among
the most ethnically diverse areas of London. It is home
to the Berwick Street Market (one of the oldest street
markets in the capital), where flappers can find ready-made
dresses next to all manner of other items and produce. Truly
cosmopolitan, Soho is also beset with crime, prostitution,
and other urban vices.
The actual City of London covers about one square
mile just north of the Thames, within London’s medieval
walls. Rail terminals funnel commuters and travelers to the
commercial heart of the British Empire. Further north, the
districts are predominantly artisan or middle class. The
mean streets of the East End: Stepney, Bethnal Green,
Limehouse, Shoreditch, and so on, form a distinct and
abruptly contrasting poverty, a state also normal along the
south bank of the Thames from Battersea to Greenwich. A
writer of the time noted, “Even in the richest quarters, in
Westminster and elsewhere, small but well-defined areas
of the poorest dwellings occur...” Further south of the

Shotguns
Shotguns are not considered firearms under British law, so
they do not require firearms certificates and may be brought
into the country “for hunting game” without undue red tape.
Equally, tourists may purchase shotguns while in Great
Britain. Of course, a reckless investigator will be stopped
and probably arrested by the police if found walking around
Central London (or anywhere else, apart from a country
estate) with a shotgun cocked over their arm.

PULP: CUSTOMS WAIVER
The intricacies of UK immigration and customs
inspections can be ignored for pulp heroes, unless the
Keeper deems otherwise. Likewise, as long as the hero
can demonstrate good character, the police will issue
firearms certificates to hero tourists.

180

ENGLAND

GETTING ABOUT IN LONDON
AND FURTHER AFIELD

The investigators are spoilt for choice with the range of
transport services available to them. All of the following
provide relatively easy means to travel to anywhere in
London during daylight hours, although nighttime services
are often limited or non-existent.

MONEY
Great Britain’s currency is the Pound Sterling. One
pound (£) is divided into 20 shillings (s) or 240
pennies (d), with 12 pennies making 1 shilling. Prices
are quoted in pounds, shillings and pence, written as
£/s/d. For conversion, there are, roughly, $5 US dollars
to £1 (one pound).

Underground
The “Tube” offers a cheap and convenient method of travel
around London but note that the majority of stations are
closed between 1 a.m. and 5 a.m.
Omnibuses
Double-decker open-top buses run by competing
independent companies. Night buses to larger community
centers in London have been available for the last few years.
Such services are very rare outside of London.
Hackney Carriages
London’s famed motorized black taxicabs operate across
London. Taxis, able to carry four people, can be found in ranks
in high footfall areas or can be hailed from the street as they pass
by. Horse-drawn hansom cabs continue to offer an alternative
to the motorcar and can seat six people in relative comfort.
Electrified Trams
Convenient hop-on, hop-off transport running weekdays
only from 10 a.m. to 4 p.m.

Thames, the districts become progressively more middle
class and suburban.
The Great War interrupted the growth rate of London
but building construction and renovation has since renewed
despite ongoing labor unrest (that comes to a head in 1926
with the General Strike). The period between 1920 and
1930 sees rapid expansion and modernization of transport
networks, with the further development of the London
Underground and electrification of commuter railways.
War rationing has ended and nightclubs and cocktail bars
flourish, both frequented by the Bright Young Things.
While modernization grips London, the overall economic
position of England is not so good. Immediately following
the Great War the economy boomed but, by 1920, the
economy has slumped and industries like coal are in decline.
Unemployment rose when servicemen returning from the
front found no jobs, which only added to the general rise of
joblessness that would not dissipate until the onset of the
Second World War. Signs of unemployment and poverty
are most noticeable in the East End working-class areas
of London but the jobless may be seen on many London
streets, sometimes agitating for political change.

Car Hire
Automobiles may be hired from garages by the hour, day,
week, or month. On average, a week’s hire costs around
£35, while a month could cost £130. The number of cars
on Britain’s roads sees a rapid rise during the 1920s (over
a million by 1930), although horse-drawn carriages could
still be seen in most walks of life. Garages are rare and the
speed limit is 20 mph (not that anyone seems to take notice
of such restrictions). Hiring a car provides an extremely
convenient means of transport not only in London but also
for journeying beyond the capital.
Railways
Trains from London to other regions are operated by four
privately owned groups: the London, Midland, and Scotland
Railway (LMS), the London and North Eastern Railway
(LNER), the Great Western Railway (GWR), and Southern
Railway (SR). First (private compartment) or Third Class
tickets (communal seating) could be purchased. The rail
network crisscrosses the land and is the main (and cheapest)
method for traveling around the country.

181

CHAPTER 3

S
E
R
P
E
N
T
O
F
Y
I
G

CULT IN RESIDENCE:
BROTHERHOOD OF THE
BLACK PHARAOH (UK)

Accommodation

While in London, the investigators have a choice of highend to low-rent accommodation.
The cheapest rooms can be found in slum hotels, usually
in the heart of the poorest and least salubrious areas, where
crime is rife. Taking a room in such downtrodden places
offers the possibility of anonymity but risks being shoulder
to shoulder with all manner of criminals, ne’er-do-wells,
and others who would take advantage of gullible “tourists.”
An alternative could be the ubiquitous bed-and-breakfast
in the suburbs and countryside—one or more rooms in a
private residence (often advertised in newspapers or with
a card in a front window saying “B&B”). While discrete,
the investigators may have to comply with the landlady’s
rules (such as curfews and no guests) and be subjected to
all manner of nosy questions.
For investigators prepared to spend more, average to
grand hotels probably fit the bill. At the top of the scale
are the Ritz (150 Piccadilly), the Savoy Hotel (Strand),
Claridge’s and Brown’s Hotel (both Mayfair), and the
Waldorf (Aldwych), all of which are located in Central
London. Alternatively, the Cavendish, Grosvenor Court,
and Langham hotels offer good rooms without the glamor.

The Brotherhood of the Black Pharaoh operates in both
London and Cairo. While its membership was once
exclusively Egyptian, the British wing of the organization
now includes Indians, Arabs, and Europeans in equal
measure. Relatively small, its membership in England
numbers around 60 individuals. The name of the cult comes
from an Egyptian form of Nyarlathotep, who in Dynastic
Egypt was whispered to be a dark or invisible ruler who was,
like night, both everywhere and nowhere. For information
about the Brotherhood in Egypt, see The Cult in Residence:
The Brotherhood of the Black Pharaoh (Egypt), page 304.
In the UK, the Brotherhood primarily serves the Penhew
Foundation, founded and originally managed by Sir Aubrey
Penhew (who left to join the Carlyle Expedition). The cult’s
high priest in England is Edward Gavigan, the director of
the Foundation, who is assisted by the high priestess Zahra
Shafik. An Egyptian national sent to England by Omar
al-Shakti (A Dangerous Man, page 344) to support the
cult’s growth, Shafik runs day-to-day cult operations from
her spice shop in Soho (Empire Spices, page 256) and
from the Blue Pyramid Club (page 253). Both Gavigan
and Shafik are intelligent, dangerous, and insane.
The symbol of the cult is an inverted ankh, while its
characteristic ritual weapon is a short club embedded with a
single spike; in payment for certain crimes, cultists attempt
to break their victims’ bones with the club before driving
the spike into their heart. The use of guns by the London
branch of the Brotherhood is very rare, and they do not
tend to leave an identifying rune or mark on the bodies
of their victims.
The cult uses an outdoor location for its grand and
lesser rituals known as Misr House (page 269), which
stands on Edward Gavigan’s private country estate in
Essex. In London, the Blue Pyramid Club in Soho
serves as a key meeting point for Brotherhood
cultists. Outside of London, in Derby, Gavigan
owns a secretive manufacturing unit where special
components are fabricated and then sent to
Shanghai (Henson Manufacturing, page 262).
The cult has close ties to a shipping operation
located in the Limehouse Docks (page 208),
from which Mythos artifacts and fabricated
components are shipped onboard a vessel called
the Ivory Wind (page 210).

THE LONDON FOG
London in the 1920s is famous for its fogs, known as
“London peculiars,” caused by coal fires and factory
pollution. Also called “pea-soupers,” the fogs were often
so dense and unpredictable that people caught in them
found navigation very difficult, if not impossible. Due
to the industrial pollution, the fogs came in a range of
colors, from yellow-brown to green, as well as being damp
and cloying. While not recognized in the 1920s, it was
estimated (in 1954) that such fogs had actually claimed
the lives of around 12,000 people (total) due to the fatal
properties of the chemicals contained within them.
As the investigators are unlikely to spend prolonged
periods in the fog, its health consquences can be ignored,
although particularly harsh Keepers may call for a
CON roll if they deem a particular patch of fog to be
highly polluted. If failed, the investigator is partially
incapacitated by coughing for 1D6 rounds, with a penalty
die applied to skill rolls during this time.

182

Sigil of The Brot
herhood
of the Black Phar
aoh

ENGLAND
The day-to-day business of the cult, beyond the secret
and important work of Henson Manufacturing, consists of
the illegal trafficking of antiquities (Mythos in origin and
otherwise), the supply and distribution of drugs (such as
hashish and opium), and the recruitment of new members.
Investigators who find themselves captured by the
cult will be held at either the Blue Pyramid Club or the
Limehouse Docks before being transported to Essex to
take a special role in the cult’s next rite (Rites of the
Brotherhood, page 278).
Profiles for Average Brotherhood Cultists (England)
can be found on page 287 in the Characters and Monsters
section at the end of the chapter. In addition, the BiggerThan-Average Brotherhood Cultists (England) (page
286) serve as Gavigan’s bodyguards, henchmen, or when
a particular “tough” is needed.

Mahoney knows the city intimately and
has an extensive network of contacts from
the underbelly of London life. If the
investigators require the services of an
expert safecracker, need to contact a
shadowy underworld personality, or
want to know if Inspector Barrington
is an honest bloke, Mahoney is their
man. The editor won’t necessarily impart
such information freely, preferring a “you
scratch my back, I’ll scratch yours” approach
to business dealings.
Mahoney and his newspaper provide the
investigators with clues leading them into significant
sections of the England chapter, although two of these
are sidetracks. While the investigators can get by without
ever interacting with Mahoney, his presence and the clues
he can impart add great depth to the chapter and the
Keeper is encouraged to ensure the investigators meet
and befriend the man.
In contacting Mahoney the investigators may,
unwittingly, bring about the editor’s downfall. Should
Edward Gavigan (page 184) have sent cultists to keep
an eye on the investigators, they will be tracked to The
Scoop’s offices where the cultists ritually murder Mahoney.
Such hostility from the cult could expand into Mahoney’s
underworld contacts if the investigators have made use
of them—the investigators could be harassed by both the
criminal fraternity and the cult (something which may
work particularly well in Pulp Cthulhu games).

DRAMATIS PERSONAE:
ENGLAND

Key NPCs of the England chapter are gathered here for the
Keeper’s convenience. The following information includes
backstories, motivations, and plot considerations, while
their statistical profiles can be found in the Characters and
Monsters section at the end of this chapter. Backgrounds and
profiles for those NPCs featured in the sidetrack scenarios
The Chelsea Serpent and The Derbyshire Horror can be
found in situ.

• Description: overweight, with red hair and a wicked smile;
normally surrounded by cigar smoke.
• Traits: sharp and insightful, belligerent at times.
• Roleplaying hooks: useful source of information and leads;
the investigators may make him a potential victim of the
Brotherhood.

POTENTIAL ALLIES
Mickey Mahoney, 43, editor of The Scoop

• Link: Jonah Kensington directs the investigators to
Mahoney and The Scoop (Prospero House, page 128,
America).
• Link: if the investigators miss the link from Kensington,
they may recollect Mahoney’s name from previous
correspondence with Jackson Elias, or may simply come
across a copy of The Scoop while in London and become
intrigued with its sensational stories (a copy might be spied
on Inspector Barrington’s desk).

Inspector James Barrington,
53, lead on the “Egyptian Murders”

• Link: Jonah Kensington directs the investigators to
Inspector Barrington (Prospero House, page 128, America).
• Link: article in The Scoop mentions Barrington. If the
investigators miss this lead, Mickey Mahoney can mention
the article in connection to the spate of recent murders,
which may bring the detective to their attention (Carlyle
Papers England #3).

Mickey Mahoney is a red-haired, cigar-smoking, and grubby
journalist of Irish descent, who publishes The Scoop, a weekly
tabloid specializing in printing stories about gory murders,
sex scandals, and weird happenings. He is a cynical and
tough customer, ever on the lookout for suitably scandalous
stories to print.

Inspector Barrington is a weathered and seasoned policeman,
usually dressed in a slightly shabby suit. He is a methodical
man and plays by the book. He has been investigating the

183

CHAPTER 3

S
E
R
P
E
N
T
O
F
Y
I
G

ADVERSARIES

series of “Egyptian murders” for nearly a year,
since the disappearance of his predecessor
on the case (Inspector Munden).
Dependent on what the investigators
share with Barrington, his role in the
campaign is flexible. While he is an
unlikely replacement player character,
he could be a useful ally. If he witnesses
or hears about the investigators engaging
in dubious activities, he may warn them
that “excessive zeal” could put them in his
firing line. Certainly, if necessary, Barrington
isn’t beyond having the investigators picked up and
formally warned; especially those who are foreigners acting
like “cowboys,” who Barrington threatens with expulsion
from England if their antics don’t calm down.
If irrefutable evidence is presented in regard to the spate
of murders, Barrington acts and employs the full force of
the police, which may mean their heavy-handed tactics
destroy valuable information pertinent to the investigators
and their research. Once in police custody, key cult members
are essentially out of reach of the investigators’ questions,
so the players are best advised to think carefully before
turning everything over to the authorities.
Edward Gavigan is another matter. With compelling
evidence, Barrington may attempt to hold him for
questioning but Gavigan’s public standing and his solicitor,
who utilizes all the legal tricks he knows, mean that most
accusations are thrown out. Despite being unable to connect
Gavigan to the murders, Zahra Shafik may not fare so
well. Her position in society means that strong evidence
may get her sentenced and locked up—if the investigators
don’t end up in her clutches first!
Inspector Barrington is something of a wildcard to
be used as the Keeper desires to chastise or help the
investigators. Remember, though, that Barrington’s key
motivation is to solve the murders; anything else is
secondary to accomplishing that. His investigation works
in parallel with that of the investigators, which can either
operate in the background or lead him to crossing their path.

Edward Gavigan, 55,
high priest of the Black Pharaoh

• Link: business card in New York
(Carlyle Papers America #2) and
al-Shakti’s safe in Egypt directs the
investigators to the Penhew Foundation
and Edward Gavigan.
• Link: Inspector Barrington of the Yard
(page 183) mentions Gavigan helped with his
inquiries into the Egyptian murders.
• Link: Warren Besart’s statement (Carlyle Papers
Egypt #1) mentions shipping stolen artifacts to the Penhew
Foundation.
• Link: various letters from Edward Gavigan, addressed
from his Mayfair home, can be found in Robert Huston’s
headquarters in the City of the Great Race (Carlyle Papers
Australia #4) and Sir Aubrey’s workshop on Gray Dragon
Island (Carlyle Papers China #10).
• Link: mentioned by Jack Brady (Meeting Jack Brady, page
577, China).

An intelligent and polished man of the English upper class,
Gavigan is an astute and intelligent adversary. He is the
main threat and villain of the England chapter.
Outwardly to society, Gavigan is the director of the Penhew
Foundation and a respected academic in matters of ancient
Egyptian antiquities. Secretly, he is the high priest of the
London branch of the Brotherhood of the Black Pharaoh; a
formidable sorcerer, he runs the organization with an iron fist.
Though Gavigan is the epitome of an upper class and
wealthy Englishman, he was relatively poor as a young man
owing to a disagreement with his father, who withdrew
Gavigan’s allowance. His interest in Egyptology eventually
led him to the door of Sir Aubrey Penhew, where Gavigan
spent many years scheming and dealing his way into Sir
Aubrey’s confidence. Eventually, Sir Aubrey revealed to
Gavigan the majesty of the Black Pharaoh; Sir Aubrey told
Gavigan the return of the Black Pharaoh was imminent,
and that Gavigan would play a significant role in the Great
Plan. In time, Sir Aubrey departed with Roger Carlyle,
leaving Gavigan in his stead as director of the Foundation
and leader of the London Brotherhood. Gavigan defers
to his old master, Sir Aubrey, in all matters; more so than
in his dealings with Omar al-Shakti (A Dangerous Man,
page 344), who Gavigan is convinced despises him (true; alShakti doesn’t trust the Englishman and would prefer Zahra
Shafik to have total control of the London Brotherhood).
Gavigan’s father died a few years ago and finally his
inheritance, so long withheld, came to him. Now, he is

• Description: thin, with clipped mustache and weary eyes;
shabby suit.
• Traits: follows the law to the letter, unimaginative.
• Roleplaying hooks: provides leads to Edward Gavigan, the
Blue Pyramid Club, and Empire Spices (Zahra Shafik); a
wild card to help or hinder the investigators.
Keeper note: as an additional pulp option for the London
police, see Detective Inspector John Craig (page 286).

184

ENGLAND
Zahra Shafik, 36,
spice dealer and high priestess

independently wealthy and enjoys material life as much as
he enjoys being empowered by the gods; favoring Savile
Row tailored suits, elegant jewelry, and an expensive and new
wristwatch (still a relatively new item of personal adornment).
Relishing the power he commands as high priest, which
goes hand-in-hand with the authority he demands as the
Foundation’s director, Gavigan is well placed to ensure
that the essential activities of the Brotherhood remain
out of the public eye. The word of a respected academic
versus that of a gaggle of unwashed (and possibly foreign)
conspiracy theorists is a one-sided argument. At his word,
the investigators can be barred from learned institutions,
pilloried in newspapers, or named in libel lawsuits. If
he can tie them to disastrous events in another country
(New York City, or elsewhere if the investigators come to
London later in the campaign), he may leak biased and
very damaging stories about them to the press or police.
Should the investigators attempt to pin anything on
Gavigan, perhaps via Inspector Barrington (page 250),
he may be brought in by the police for questioning but
soon departs with his solicitor, who uses legal trickery and
Gavigan’s public standing to get any accusations thrown out.
Witness testimony is easily discounted for a man of Gavigan’s
stature (or witness evidence can be retracted with suitable
bribes or intimidation). While Barrington may believe the
investigators, the detective will, ultimately, be frustrated and
annoyed that the British legal system can’t make charges
stick to a man like Gavigan.
With enough incentive from the investigators, Gavigan
could declare all-out war against them—kidnapping, breakins, beatings, murder, and arson are all possibilities—that’s
before he even thinks to utilize Mythos magic.
Gavigan’s utter confidence may be his undoing. Focused
on the delivery of machine parts for Sir Aubrey’s rocket
(see the China chapter) and possibly distracted by the
nuisance created by the investigators, he is unlikely to
see the threat from Zahra Shafik (The Schemes of Zahra
Shafik, page 259).

• Link: Inspector Barrington of the Yard
(page 250) supplies a lead to Zahra
Shafik and Empire Spices.
• Link: Yalesha Essam mentions Shafik
(Blue Pyramid Club, page 253).
• Link: photograph of Zahra Shafik with
Omar al-Shakti (A Dangerous Man,
page 344, Egypt).
• Link: mentioned by Jack Brady (Meeting Jack
Brady, page 577, China).

High priestess of the London Brotherhood, Zahra Shafik
is a power-hungry rival to Edward Gavigan and a cunning
adversary for the investigators. From Empire Spices, her
spice shop in Soho, Shafik controls most of the day-to-day
operations of the London Brotherhood, essentially acting as
Gavigan’s mouthpiece and enacting his will.
Born and raised in Egypt, her talent for manipulation
and keen intellect brought her to the attention of Omar alShakti, who nurtured her and brought her into the worship
of the Black Pharaoh. In time, Shafik was sent to London
to be Edward Gavigan’s high priestess, while also acting
as al-Shakti’s eyes and ears. Occasionally, Shafik assists
the Penhew Foundation, providing briefings on Cairo and
Egyptian social customs for expeditions sponsored by the
Foundation. She has made London her home and continues
to monitor Gavigan and report back to al-Shakti, while
directing the day-to-day activities of the cult’s rank and
file from her store in Soho.
Not content with being subordinate to Gavigan, a man
she despises, Shafik aims to take control of the London
chapter, eliminating Gavigan in the process. For some
months, she has been recruiting followers loyal to her and
not Gavigan. While content to bide her time until the
moment is right to strike, she may see an opportunity with
the arrival of the investigators and attempt to use them
through guile and misdirection to achieve her goal. Shafik
is not beyond employing magic to change her appearance
to mislead, or to dominate the will of an investigator to
implant a command to kill Gavigan (The Schemes of Zahra
Shafik, page 259). While al-Shakti has not authorized
her to eliminate Gavigan, she is sure her true master will
approve of her initiative.
Shafik’s role in the campaign is a wild card, able to be
adjusted by the Keeper as necessary.

• Description: slim and superbly dressed, balding hair,
manicured nails, and clean-shaven.
• Traits: a mask of charm and grace, coupled with good
manners, hides an insane ego intent on the accumulation
of personal power.
• Roleplaying hooks: if he cannot dissuade the investigators
with outright lies and deception, he uses his cult minions
to follow and then deal with them. If necessary, he resorts
to magic and summons the Thing in the Fog (page 206).
If they intrigue him enough, he attempts to capture the
investigators to learn what they know before sacrificing them
to his dark god at Misr House (page 269), his Essex estate.

185

CHAPTER 3

S
E
R
P
E
N
T
O
F
Y
I
G

• Description: slender, with long dark hair and enchanting
green eyes; a great beauty (some liken her to Cleopatra).
Usually elegantly dressed in black. Note that she is often
disguised; her true identity may not be revealed to the
investigators until it’s too late.
• Traits: quick to anger, intolerant of failure, and highly
manipulative.
• Roleplaying hooks: wants to understand the investigators’
mission and whether they can be used to enact her will.
She attempts to manipulate the investigators to eliminate
Gavigan, leaving the way clear for her to assume full control
of the London Brotherhood.

• Description: average height and weight, with a bushy
mustache and a kind face (a mask he uses to lull others into
underestimating him). Usually wears a suit.
• Traits: greedy, cunning, and fearless (willing to take on
superior odds in combat).
• Roleplaying hooks: a link in the chain supplying rocket
parts from Edward Gavigan to the Pale Viper (Sir Aubrey)
in Shanghai; leads the investigators to the Ivory Wind (page
210).

Frank Marshall, 36, foreman and cultist

• Link: Edward Gavigan takes the train from London to Derby
to visit Henson Manufacturing once a month (Watching
Gavigan and the Penhew Foundation, page 204).
• Link: receipts for goods delivered to Henson Manufacturing
can be found in Gavigan’s secret room at the Penhew
Foundation (Secret Room (Basement), page 202).
• Link: ledger in Gavigan’s secret room at Misr House
(Carlyle Papers England #12).

Puneet Chaudhary,
44, Limehouse warehouse owner

• Link: trucks from the Penhew Foundation lead to
Chaudhary’s warehouse (Watching Gavigan and the
Penhew Foundation, page 204).
• Link: paperwork mentioning Chaudhary
may be found in the Penhew Foundation
(Secret Room (Basement), page 202).

Devoted to Edward Gavigan, Marshall is
a high-ranking member of the London
Brotherhood.
Having
previously
proved himself as reliable and calm
under pressure, Gavigan ordered him
to handpick a team to supervise a
secret operation in Derby (Henson
Manufacturing, page 262).
Marshall has an athletic physique, strong
in mind and body. If he lives long enough, he
will one day be favored by Nyarlathotep and may
even go on to take command of the London Brotherhood
(although Zahra Shafik will oppose this).
Marshall is the foreman at Henson Manufacturing but,
in reality, lets the engineers get on with their work while
he ensures the deliveries of components are conducted
without issue or delay. He will willingly give his life for
the cult and is relentless in his pursuit of those who wrong
his “brothers.”

Puneet Chaudhary owns a goods
warehouse on Queen Street near the
Limehouse Docks. He imports and
exports all manner of goods, including
illegal merchandise and off-the-book
items for Edward Gavigan and the
Brotherhood.
Chaudhary is not a member of the
Brotherhood and is uninterested in such matters:
he prefers the accumulation of money. The Brotherhood
pays him well to illegally transport machinery parts to
Shanghai, as well as relics and antiquities of interest to
the cult. He keeps his mouth shut, as to do anything else
would risk this lucrative business.
Chaudhary always carries a knife and a garrote. A
fearless and dangerous man if crossed, he has no remorse
in dispatching those who interfere with his business. Thus,
only if he believes the investigators to be a threat will he
act against them. If he believes he can profit from them,
he attempts to con investigators looking for information—
perhaps he offers, for a price, to “lose” a couple of the
Penhew Foundation’s crates; the crates will contain junk
and nothing of relevance. If sore investigators come back
looking to make trouble, Chaudhary has his men (see
Lascars, page 210) on hand to send them on their way.

• Description: tall and muscular, unkempt hair, with a scar
on his left cheek.
• Traits: calm under pressure, cunning.
• Roleplaying hooks: visitors to Henson Manufacturing
are unwelcome and all are turned away no matter what
“paperwork” the investigators try to use to gain entry. If the
investigators make their presence known, Marshall sends his
men to keep an eye on them and, if necessary, capture them
for questioning before sending them off to Misr House.

186
